This is a subtle affair because such alluring pleasures are really only concerned with lust, sexual desire and craving.
These instigate the mind to swerve out through the five senses after delightful objects remembered from before.
Long past impressions — whether good or bad — are conjured up, which we deludedly grasp at and sink ourselves in anguish and total sorrow.
To understand these myriad disease-carrying germs within yourself is difficult.
Although you may well discern and dispose of some of the more external problems, overall it's of little help.
Wherever they are concentrated together, this master- problem is stubborn and determined to remain master however much you may try to overcome it.
Remember that if your mindfulness and wisdom aren't yet strong enough, the battle will also upset the basic calmness of mind.
Dhamma practice requires a careful balancing — neither too tense nor too slack — so that you always strive with the appropriate response, which is the Middle Way.
You will have to notice in yourself the state of mind that is controlled by mindfulness and wisdom, and constantly support and sustain it with diligent attention.
This allows calm and stability to arise for longer periods until you become intimately acquainted with it.
At times you will recognize the need to put on extra pressure to force the results because, even though it may be hard to do, you can't just give up halfheartedly.
Weakness means there's no way to stop the mind drifting back into its old wilful ways, so you must apply force: strong mindfulness and wisdom, vigorous exertion to the point of sacrificing life if need be.
When the time comes to battle it out you'll have steadfastly to fight on, sometimes using a vow to fortify your resolve, until you can vanquish the mind's stubborn obsession with coarse pleasure and desire for things.
Otherwise the mind scrambles distractedly after whatever attracts and lures it through the senses.
Unable to resist, it becomes increasingly frantic and agitated.
The easy-going acceptance of whatever 'comes up' means that when it is desire that arises, you go overboard for it.
This then becomes a habitual attitude of giving free rein to your desires, because the defilements now know your weak spot and will continually tempt and provoke you.
It's like breaking an addiction to betel nut and cigarettes, or indulgence in meat eating.
Even though it's on a very coarse level such habits are still very difficult to break because craving constantly waits for its chance to tempt you.
“Just a little bit,” it invites, “it doesn't really matter… just a taste.” They entice like the bait on the hook, for as soon as the fish is bold enough to take one nibble, and then another, it's sure to be caught.
So whenever we fall for a pleasant taste, the defilements are waiting to draw in the line while we struggle helplessly, impaled on the baited hook.
You must realize that the overcoming of the defilements isn't a trivial affair, but requires steadfast practice.
Weakness won't do, but you must also consider and gauge your strength in this battle because the defilements have the power of a demon yet lie hidden deep within your personality.
How can you harass them to force them out?
In some cases, for instance in breaking an addiction, you can have a full-blooded fight and complete victory without also killing yourself in the process.
But an all out battle isn't always called for — especially in those deeper, more refined aspects that require a more subtle, gradual approach and need careful thinking out.
You must learn how steadily to undermine the defilements' roots so that they gradually weaken.
When your base of mindfulness and wisdom is strong enough, you'll then be able to turn the tide against them.
However, if you still find yourself out-manoeuvred you'll need carefully to analyze the situation.
Otherwise the defilements will frustrate your every effort, for when they decide they want something they'll brush mindfulness and wisdom aside and insist, “I must have that!
I won't listen to any objections!”.
They really are that stubborn.
So this isn't a trifling matter.
It's as if you are face to face with your enemy, confronted by a man-eater of a wild beast.
What will you do?
This confrontation with the defilements needs very careful handling.
If they should appear right before your eyes, are your mindfulness and wisdom sufficient to counter them?
This is the horde of the enemy come to offer battle, to burn and destroy.
How should we handle them?
What stratagem can we use to overcome them right there and then?
Confronted with bodily or mental pain or, worse still, with desired bodily or mental pleasure — what to do?
The pleasant feeling is a much more treacherous affliction because of its insidious ability to mislead us, without our even realizing it.
But you can be sure that nobody is seduced by unpleasant feeling because it's just too painful!
So how can you find in this present, existing confrontation a means of disengaging yourself from both the pleasant and the unpleasant?
It's not a matter of practicing and accepting the pleasant but rejecting the painful.
It's not like that at all.
You must see through to both characteristics and realize that both pleasure and pain are impermanent and therefore unsatisfactory.
If you don't discern this you will fall for the deception of craving that is only interested in pleasure, whether it's of the fleshly variety or whatever.
In every posture isn't there always an obsession with finding pleasure?
By trying to lose yourself in pleasure with its multifarious forms — it doesn't matter what as long as it gives only pleasure — you'll fall unaware into the mire of suffering.
You'll be stuck there because of a lack of investigation into impermanence, suffering and not-self.
You will be deceived into welcoming bodily and mental pleasure as beneficial, whereas on careful examination they are found to be suffering.
By understanding all of this, you'll start really to comprehend the truth of impermanence.
When the mind no longer continually insists on pleasure, your suffering and anguish will lighten.
Furthermore, you'll see that in reality there is no pleasure to grasp hold of anyway — but only suffering.
Your grasping should therefore start to come under control.
When we have chanted the scriptures together, it has been about this: “r pa, vedanaa, sanyaa…” — “form, feeling, perception… are all suffering”.
Yet you still fail to penetrate to the truth of this within yourself — which is made up of just these things.
Without a new perspective on true knowledge, you must fall into delusion, trying to attain pleasure, always pleasure.
When in fact all you get is suffering.
You shut your eyes and ears, and refuse to understand anything.
If you really did understand, the mind would become much more peaceful, calming down from its wild chasings after nonexistent pleasures.
Craving is an initiative that startles and frantically agitates the mind.
It arises from the desire for pleasure, so you will have to investigate to see that: such pleasure doesn't really exist; that the natural state is one of suffering; and that it isn't 'me' or 'mine'.
You will need to analyze and differentiate.
First, take the integrated body apart into its separate elements without allowing any of them to be seized on as being 'me' or 'mine'.
Continually go over and over it in this way, until you realize its truth.
The same idea is contained in the Recollection of Using the Requisites of Life that we chant together.
If we don't analyze and understand this properly, then we must fall into the delusion of loving and pining after this body — “it's me, it's mine!” We repeatedly seize upon it without quite realizing what we're doing, even though Dhamma teaching is ready and waiting and complete.
We may have tried in a cursory way to consider it all, yet only achieved a very vague understanding that tended to wander away into distraction.
Such investigation does not penetrate because the mind has no foundation and is not based in calm.
The mind chases after and fabricates various agitating concerns, yet never catches anything of real importance.
It's like a half-blind man seeing a blur and managing, as time flies by, just to snatch the odd idea or two.
Those who are unconcerned with pursuing Dhamma, who are indifferent about what is right and wrong, remain unquestioning and have no uncertainty or doubt.
They are enveloped in the darkness of ignorance.
When you start to examine Dhamma, any points not yet fully understood must naturally arise as doubts or queries: “What's this?
How should I understand that?
How can I dispose of this?”.
These questions need to be taken up and worked at.
If you don't, it plainly shows your lack of mindfulness and wisdom.
However, a cursory investigation, picking it up and then leaving it unfinished, means you will never be able to penetrate to the root principles of practice.
You'll know a little — and that's all.
With mindfulness and wisdom still underdeveloped and an exertion effort that's inadequate, you will lack the courage to penetrate into the Noble Truth.
Trying to estimate for oneself about what's right in one's practice may become self-deception, which will then make it impossible to overcome suffering.
If you happen to understand something, don't go out and brag about it or else it will turn and befuddle you in many inextricable ways.
Wise people and sages have always been careful to press on with their investigations — even if they really have gained some insight — never getting stuck and satisfied with their present level of practice.
They never boast about their accomplishments, for that would surely be the mark of a fool.
The clever person constantly searches out the obstacles ahead, which are always more subtle than those already overcome.
They never rest content with the present lucidity, but always want to penetrate further.
With the defilements still burning and scorching one, how can one afford to stop to brag of such and such an achievement — even if it might be a genuine insight?
Without a firm foundation, you'll always need to be careful and cautious about this.
In your investigations with mindfulness and wisdom, it's the danger of carelessness and heedlessness that takes on the greatest significance.
Only when heedful can you reckon to keep abreast with your life's span, the term of which is always ebbing away.
But what exactly is this heedfulness, this avoidance of negligence?
This is the vital question.
If you remain ignorant of it, however much tranquillity you may gain — by guarding the sense doors, for instance — will eventually falter and you're back with the old turmoil.
Be careful!
The defilements will provoke and force you to speak and bray; they won't allow you to keep your mouth closed and quiet.
Without understanding the underlying intentions and basic situation, you will only deceive yourself and end up going the rounds, bragging of your past attainments: “I attained calm for so many years…”.
It's a deceiving of both yourself and others.
For, in reality, you are still in bondage to stupidity, following the dictates of the defilements within yourself, without even realizing it.
Then, if anyone should offer praise, the ears prick up and you puff yourself out.
Instead of explaining about suffering and the harm of the defilements that you have managed to understand, you just boast about yourself.
You can't just bumble foolishly along, for this Way demands the alertness of mindfulness and wisdom.
After proper examination, you'll find there's nothing to be idly amused and preoccupied about; that both externally and internally it's all really one great deception.
It's like being alone in mid-ocean with no island or shore in sight.
Can you now afford just to sit back and relax, or make a temporary show of effort and then boast about it?
Of course not!
When a person's investigation penetrates through to ever more subtle levels of mind, they will steadily become both calmer and more reserved as well.
This is comparable to the increasing knowledge and mature circumspection of the child as it develops to become a teenager and then an adult.
Mindfulness and wisdom must be continually developed in this way so that you can discern, in whatever arises, what is right or wrong, true or false.
This will enable you to relinquish and let go of it all.
Attaining to this true Dhamma practice will make your path through life smooth and even.
Otherwise, you'll fall into boasting of temporary success in techniques of tranquillity practice and eventually find yourself in even greater distress.
This is where the defilements proliferate and one plunges headlong into their conflagration.
You'll elevate your head into a mass of internal fire!
Use the torch of mindfulness and wisdom to neutralize and extinguish the blaze of the defilements that sears your mind.
Do so with an increasing faith in your own efforts Don't allow the defilements a chance to insinuate their 'command post' with its various stratagems.
You must be alert and equal to them.
Be circumspect — don't fall for them!
Whatever rationale they come up with can only succeed when your mindfulness and wisdom are deficient.
The defilements lead you away by the nose, openly scorching you with their fire, yet you are still able to open your mouth to brag and boast!
Turn and inspect this in yourself.
Check every aspect, because right and wrong, truth and falsity, are all within.
It's not a matter of external observations.
Any external damage is nothing compared to the internal hurt from the defilements' blaze.
When 'I myself' raises its head, if you are not wholeheartedly committed to Dhamma practice, there's no way you can overcome suffering.
A little knowledge, a little renunciation, can't get to the root problem that lies buried deep down.
This must be dug out.
It's not just a matter of resting easy after some temporary and superficial success.
This won't do because the defilements lie deep in the basis of personality, which can only be searched out with the delicate but thorough examination of mindfulness and wisdom.
Otherwise, if you stay on the coarse level, you can practice until your body lies rotting in its coffin, but it won't have affected the basic personality problem.
Anyone with a careful and scrupulous manner of practice is able to see their own deficiencies and faults of character.
They will need to control and overturn pride in all its aspects, not allowing it to act big, to become inflated.
However, the actual elimination of this disease isn't so easy.
For those who haven't persevered with a rigorous enough self-inspection, the process may actually only increase their conceit, their bragging and 'teaching'.
Yet should they turn within and discern the conceit and deceit of self, a profound feeling of weariness and sadness will arise.
One will pity oneself for the stupidity of such self- deception.
So you must set yourself to battle on.
However much pain, however many tears — persevere!
Don't be only concerned with pleasure seeking.
Determine that, “Come what may, I will keep on with my striving, with my practice of chastity, throughout this life.
Don't grumble about the first small difficulty, that, “It's a waste of time.
I'm quite content with giving in to the defilements.” And then quit the task.
You must take just the opposite stance.
When temptations and provocations to 'grab this, take a lot of that' arise — don't indulge, don't take!
However marvellous it seems, give a firm refusal, “I don't want it.” This is the only way to withstand the snares and deceptions of the defilements.
They scare and trick in every manner of ways, so that even if you get wise to one stratagem they simply change to another, and another…
Acknowledge the situation:
“I have been continually and variously deceived by the wiles of the defilements, and I'm still ignorant of the truth inside myself.
Other people may fool me a little but the defilements do so all the time.
I fall for them and follow them the whole way.
My trust in the Lord Buddha is nothing compared to my belief in these defilements.
I'm a disciple of the demons of desire, passively allowing myself to be led ever deeper into their jungle wilderness.
If you can't see this for yourself then you really are out there, lost and being burned alive among the corpses of that jungle charnel ground.
There, the demons forever spit and roast you with desires and every form of distress.
Though you may have come to stay in a place void of distractions, these demons are still at work, persuading, tempting and trying to draw you away.
Just notice how the saliva flows when you come across any delicious object.
So you must make the decision to be either a warrior or a victim, and in your practice to struggle to overcome this horde of defilements and desires.
Be always on your guard, no matter which way they enter to seduce and deceive you.
Nobody else can come in to lead you away, but the demons of your own desires can and do so with relish.
You must break this bondage through scrupulous attention and examination of yourself and thereby attain freedom.
Strenuously develop your mindfulness and wisdom, gaining insight and letting go of everything, until all your suffering is extinguished.
Today, I wish to comment on the principles of Dhamma practice, because when applied properly they steadily offer insight into the truth and falseness within oneself.
This is valued highly because all of us must come to see in ourselves the Truths of Suffering, its Origin, its Cessation, and the Way Leading to its Cessation.
Whoever remains totally ignorant of this falls into the suffering of the world.
Even though they may reside in a monastery they won't gain any benefit from their vocation.
It's the same for those who live at home: all they possess there are precepts, because lack of true understanding means their practice will tend to wander away towards worldly pleasures and, finally, suffering.
The practice of investigation must continue until one comprehends suffering and its origin, the power base of defilements in the mind.
The steady elimination of these defilements is truly the Supreme Way.
Those who don't practice at all are left behind, blind and ignorant in the midst of defilements.
They are led unaware into suffering and, unless they find Dhamma and the way of practice, they are doomed to birth and death, making kamma for their next round of suffering.
When you catch sight — through your practice — of what suffering is really about, you will strive to overcome it and never again be heedless of the danger.
This means a constant struggle for victory, always cutting away at your faults until arriving at the more subtle aspects of suffering, craving and defilement.
A deep probing and a delicate examination are required, while a mere superficial inspection proves inadequate.
Therefore, the mind must be firmly established with mindfulness and focused inwards without any outside distractions.
When you do turn within, you will be able to see the truth of suffering and its origin, craving and the defilements.
You will then know their features and traits, and be able to destroy them.
Truly speaking, Dhamma practice is only concerned with one thing: it all comes down to suffering and its origin.
This is the central, pivotal point in human life, and even all the animals are in this same predicament.
Ignorance and wrong view insinuate a propensity to grab and consume every sort of thing, but right view will clearly reveal the truth of suffering and its origin.
You can also think of it in terms of fixing attention on seeing the truth, for without fixing on suffering you can only remain ignorant.
The unsecured mind will always tend to drift away, following and becoming absorbed in emotional objects.
Therefore, when you try to focus attention on Dhamma, the mind — which has been habitually allowed to wander away — may well resist and struggle.
You must then rely on repeated effort to secure the mind until you realize the way to tame it and bring it back under constant control.
It then becomes easier because the mind no longer tends towards distraction.
However stubborn a problem it may have appeared at first, it can now always be tamed and brought back to calm.
But never underestimate the strength of the defilements.
Should the mind prove intractable, you must apply maximum effort to seek out the reasons why it won't calm down.
A halfhearted approach won't succeed, for it needs a 'fight to the death' attitude.
If your only concern is for pleasure and comfort, then be assured you will never gain release from the domination of the defilements.
The mastery of the defilements envelops the whole of the basic personality structure, making it formidably hard for anyone to find out the truth about themselves.
A mere smattering of knowledge certainly won't stop you from going astray.
You'll thereby abandon the quest and involve yourself in various excursions, without recognizing the vital importance of Dhamma practice.
You'll no longer bother to be strict and vigorous in the Dhamma work, but instead will absorb yourself in grabbing things under the defilement's direction.
By weakly groping along like this the clear seeing of suffering is made all the more difficult by allowing the mind to abscond.
It is concerned only with swallowing the defilement's bait.
When the defilements announce their slight discomfort, you will quickly pander to them and take the lure.
You neither appreciate the power and mastery of craving, as it swerves away after sights, tastes, smells and sounds, nor the resulting harm of such obsessions.
This ceaseless activity means you will never be able to bring the mind to stillness.
It leaves one squarely sunk in suffering even though you may try to shut your eyes to it all.
Through Dhamma practice one gradually realizes one's situation, and this conveys a steady easing of the suffering — as long as you aren't heedless.
Whereas before you were always defeated and burned, now you prevail by turning the flame of mindfulness and wisdom back onto the defilements.
So abandon your delinquent and heedless ways, and realize for yourself the benefits of Dhamma.
When you take Dhamma to heart, it will keep the practice progressing, but inadequate effort will only reap you more and more misery.
Resolve to practice until your final breath!
Don't be feeble and easily led astray.
Those with mindfulness and wisdom will understand this advice, but those deficient and unpracticed will instead swallow the defilement's lures.
Rather than surmounting suffering, their practice will then regress to its former state.
Their attempt at skillfulness will mutate — through delusion — to become suffering and unskillfulness.
They will criticize Dhamma practice as being futile and bad.
If such a person submits to the defilements, Dhamma practice becomes impossible.
The practice of Dhamma involves great struggle and endurance.
It's comparable to rowing against the current, for one needs great exertion to succeed.
Going counter to the defilements is just as demanding, for they're always waiting their chance to drag one down to a lower level.
If you aren't alert and don't utilize the Lord Buddha's Dhamma in examining yourself, your strength will fail.
This is because mindfulness and wisdom remain weak and vacillating, especially when compared to the strength of the defilements.
If you go over and combine with these tempters and agitators, you will be led wildly astray into turbulent obsessions.
Dhamma practice is, then, a going against the current of suffering — because suffering is the crux of the problem.
This is where you must focus your practice, because it's only by actually seeing suffering that you will be drawn to discover its root source.
Wisdom will then be able to track down exactly where suffering springs from.
For those with mindfulness and wisdom the arising of suffering is taken as the ideal opportunity to search out its original source — to be able cut it off there.
Such investigation proceeds on many levels, from the coarse to the refined.
It therefore also requires consultation and advice, so that you won't stumble.
Otherwise you might fancy that you can figure it all out in your head.
And that won't do at all.
There are many principles of Dhamma that the Lord Buddha left for our examination.
However, it's not mandatory to learn about every one of them.
Taking up just some of the more important schemes, such as the five aggregates or name-and-form, will be of much value.
However, it does require a rigorous all-round examination, not just an occasional probe.
This will lead to the arising of a feeling of weariness with the whole situation, so that the shackles of lust are loosened.
Alertly guarding the sense-doors with tight supervision, will enable mindfulness to outdo any lapses into negligence.
Whether talking, acting or thinking, be aware of whatever leads you into error.
This persistent sustaining of mindfulness must continue with resolution, for it is the way to end your suffering.
Mindfulness and wisdom stay retarded because the concern and interest in you are still not sensitive and subtle enough.
The more refined and circumspect you become, the more mindfulness and wisdom are strengthened.
So the Lord Buddha said: “Develop yourselves fully.
Make mindfulness strong in the mind.
The development of your practice through daily tasks follows on from the examination and control of the mind.
This will become evident in its accomplishments and benefits, whether great or small.
Increase your effort and don't be so easily disheartened.
Don't forfeit such a golden opportunity, for your life is steadily dwindling and ebbing away.
The development of mindfulness and wisdom leads on to Dhamma maturity.
However, if your defilements are gross and your wisdom coarse, you will have to take extra special care when you arrive at old age — and that eventually comes to us all.
So grasp this moment to develop the faculties of faith, energy, mindfulness, samadhi and wisdom; all in balance together.
Keep up a steadfast scrutiny and investigation and you'll find that the temptations of the world have lost their appeal.
When you can see them as poisoned bait, the longing for worldly gains will cease.
Dhamma then becomes the refuge and beacon of your life.
With this assurance in yourself, you can only stride forward without any slipping back, while any uncertainty about the merit of Dhamma practice will make you waver and turn astray.
So be very careful that you aren't pulled away towards the chasm and pit of fire.
If you can't free yourself you will be tugged at from every direction, because the basic game plan is the tendency to be dragged down.
But for those who are more circumspect and have enough mindfulness and wisdom to discern suffering, there's no more falling away and no more worldly hardships to endure.
You will then feel a weariness and distaste for lust, and the temptations of the world will lose their color and attractiveness.
Your Dhamma practice will shake off whatever misled you into grasping at alluring objects.
You will recognize that death may come soon — it isn't so very far away — and then there'll be no concern for owning or supervising worldly treasures, however vast.
With such realization, a great disenchantment and coolness towards worldly pleasures will arise, and they will lose all their luster.
They will no longer be cherished and esteemed, however, whenever required for Dhamma they may still be of use.
Your ardour cools down.
After all, even this body that is perceived as 'me' and 'mine' is steadily wearing out and falling apart.
Defilement and desire stand ready with their troublemaking for any lapse into careless abandon.
They then stab and punch through with the suffering involved in name-and-form and the five aggregates.
When your investigation really penetrates, the gross external concerns about good and bad people or things are all swept away.
Your attention is then wholly fixed on insight to destroy this eminent self, this conceit of self.
External affairs fade in importance because the vital concern is the penetration to lucidity within, where the bright light arises.
This bright clarity of insight isn't the same as common or ordinary light.
You must know it for yourself, otherwise it evades description.
Mindfulness and wisdom will cleanse the mind: ejecting, renouncing, eliminating and liberating according to their ability.
Any lack of mindfulness and wisdom, with its scrutiny and renunciation, leaves one surrounded by internal darkness — a gloom permeated with fire.
The defilements conceal their poisonous fuel so that the internal fires always blaze fiercely — what can be more terrifying than this?
Even though this conflagration may lack substance, as soon as there is contact with objects it flares up.
The bombs dropped on people are nothing compared to the three bombs of lust, hatred and delusion.
These are perpetually tearing the mind apart, whereas an air raid brings death in just the one lifetime.
But until there is practice of Dhamma you won't be able to comprehend the gravity of the situation, which is like a slow roasting of the mind by the defilements whenever there is contact.
To catch sight of the defilement's cunning agility so that one can destroy them, requires proper tools and careful attention to avoid heedlessness.
Those who stay and practice here without the concerns and involvements of the world will find they can progress relatively quickly.
Depending on the proficiency of mindfulness and wisdom, they will be able to refine their investigation and reduce suffering.
Each one of you will know for yourself the extent to which a life dedicated to Dhamma practice is advancing towards the end of suffering.
People who can never find any free time to come and rest here, and those who come but don't truly leave their worldly concerns behind, will be lost in a fog of diversions and preoccupations.
They often like to claim: “It doesn't matter where you practice.
One can practice anywhere.” This is really just hot air.
In actual fact their practice is stuck in the groove of the defilements.
Yet they still manage to brag about being able to practice “anywhere at all”.
One might remark that their mind and mouth are out of alignment.
Their mind, though seething under the attack and heat of defilements and craving, isn't aware of their predicament.
It's as if something lives in filth and prefers to exist and die in that filth.
Those people whose mindfulness and wisdom remain quite coarse will quite happily play about in the mire of their sullied minds.
Those with a more mature and penetrating mindfulness and wisdom, will feel disgust at such filth.
As one's insight grows, so this feeling of revulsion deepens and intensifies.
One then sees the danger in preoccupations, delusions and desire, because they're entirely concerned with suffering.
One sees that it's all a matter of impermanence, suffering and not-self.
Then the questions: “What do I want from life?
What was I born for?” arise.
Those who are ignorant answer: “My life is for acquiring money and things to get rich.” But that sort of life is the same as falling into hell!
Anyone who understands the Dhamma of the Lord Buddha, realizes that there's absolutely nothing that is worth wishing for, or concerning oneself with.
Everything ought to be relinquished and released.
Those who are still attached to the five aggregates, thinking, 'they are my self,' must investigate to see that each of them really embraces suffering.
Alternatively, in a more condensed format, they should realize that name-and-form is suffering, or, even more broadly, that body and mind are suffering.
When you can see all of this from the coarse to the subtle level, you will be able to rise above pleasure and pain, for both are then given up.
However, without a full understanding you will still yearn for pleasure, and the more you desire the more you will suffer.
This also applies to any attachment based in the peace and happiness arising from tranquillity-meditation.
This then becomes almost like an addiction.
One craves and must consume the narcotic that, one considers, is able to bring one pleasure.
Insight into the nature of the continual craving and its concomitant suffering never occurs to the addict.
They want and they get the drug, and think themselves very happy and contented!
The feature that continually foils the addict's bid to break their habit, is that after taking the drug they feel quite content.
Thus it is with sensual desire: it is sated only to flare up again when the briefly assuaged appetite returns.
People think that the gratification of an intense longing brings even greater pleasure, without realizing the inherent danger and suffering it involves.
Such is the state of those with weak wisdom and gross defilements.
They don't see the turmoil of desire as suffering, and instead of extinguishing it, they try to allay it by taking poison.
This poison is the pandering to the craving so that it's briefly gratified, then having to do it again, and again, and again, until one is stupefied and deluded.
A person with mindfulness and wisdom focuses on the question: “Why must I repeatedly indulge my desires?”.
They realize that it's the craving itself that must be attacked, because by overcoming this one element, they will not only escape the frantic effort to satisfy the craving, but will also do away with future desire.
This is the way that enables one to transcend suffering.
However, the obsession with the pleasure taken in consuming things, makes the disowning of such desire an arduous task.
All one knows about is how to feed on the bait and this makes one afraid to forgo and stop.
It's the dread of the addict not getting his drug, or, on another level, the meat-eater not being able to give up their attachment to tastes.
It's all a matter of being a s]ave to desire.
If you can't overcome such gross cravings, how can you ever deal with the much more subtle longings rotting within yourself?
With just a little persuasion, off you go, swallowing the coarsest of baits, fussily arranging it to suit and satisfy.
You'll notice neither your exhaustion nor comprehend that the source of all the terrible suffering that deludes and dominates all creatures in the world is found right here in this process.
Even though the Lord Buddha's Teaching sets out the most appropriate way to investigate and meditate to get to the root of all this, you ignore it and continue to swallow the bait.
Staying immersed in pleasure, you can only apply yourself to follow defilements and desire.
Our practice here is concerned with going against the current of craving and the deviating mind.
It means a multifaceted supervision together with restraint regarding any sense-contacts — sight, sound, smell or taste, for example.
Such contacts arise to lure and obsess one into liking some object and then, swiftly tiring of it, racing frantically after something else.
Continuing on in this way can only lead to complete agitation.
The malignancies in the mind are many and if you don't know how to curb and eliminate them, you can't help but fall under their menacing power.
Those who have seen the nature of suffering will make it a life and death struggle.
Just as the Lord Buddha did, when he was prepared to give his life to overcome suffering.
Don't think it's something that can be done with ease and leisure.
In each of his lives the future-Buddha had to endure hardship and suffering to help himself and others.
We too must be willing to sacrifice all possessions and wealth, however great.
It just can't be done in comfort.
Dhamma practice is a battle and struggle, and whoever endures and perseveres will gain success and peerless victory.
This supreme victory means that any problem can be examined and then resolved.
So please keep on trying.
It's not a matter of gaining some limited success and then turning away to something else for after every successful encounter mindfulness and wisdom will be strengthened.
So you must be on your guard and inspect whatever arises through the sense doors — the eyes, ears, nose, tongue, body and mind.
With application, your mindfulness will become sharper and more penetrating, and you will start to understand about releasing and extinguishing.
It's similar to grasping a live, glowing coal and perceiving its heat — and therefore quickly releasing it.
Dhamma practice is of supreme worth, but victory over the might of the defilements is arduous and should never be underestimated.
Therefore, strenuously apply yourself to reinforcing mindfulness and wisdom, and the defilements will correspondingly lose their potency.
This is called progress in Dhamma, because it's the quenching of the suffering within.
So while you still have life and strength, apply it all to this task.
The Lord Buddha declared: “Whatever is still unclear, make it clear; whatever is not penetrated, pierce it through; whatever is not complete, finish it off”.
So don't be feeble and vacillating, always making excuses.
The leaving-home for 'ordination' is also considered a sacrifice.
In the Lord Buddha's time, people from every level of the householder's life — royalty, the very wealthy, the middle class, ordinary citizens — went forth, cutting themselves off from home and family and entering the Lord Buddha's clan, with no return.
He said that the falling-back into the former, petty life was bad.
The Lord Buddha's only concern was earnestly to pull people out of suffering.
So if we want to escape we must follow his example, cutting away worry and concern for former relatives by entering the lineage of the Lord Buddha.
This life and practice under the Lord Buddha's discipline is truly the supreme way and refuge.
Those who follow the principles and discipline of Dhamma will pledge their life to the Buddha, Dhamma and Sangha.
Even those who have only managed an occasional taste of its resulting peace, without penetrating to the whole truth, will make their commitment.
They realize that there is no alternative way that leads to freedom from suffering.
When their mindfulness and wisdom become more penetrating, they will see that on this shore there is only anguish, with a never-ending circle of birth and death.
They then become determined to cross to the farther shore, making unceasing effort to renounce self.
There is nothing mysterious about this 'crossing over to the farther shore'.
But first you must give up the view of self in the five aggregates, by investigating to see them all as suffering — none of them are 'me' or 'mine'.
Focus on not grasping or holding.
The Lord Buddha once spoke of the past as below, the future as above and the present as in the middle.
He also said that unskillfulness was below, skillfulness was above and neutrality a was in the middle.
To each of these characteristics he said: “Don't grasp them!”.
You should not even grasp at what you think is Nibbana, the farther shore.
Consider the scope of the true realization of non- attachment concerning any object.
Those of you who can't fathom why even Nibbana isn't to be grasped at, must reflect on this: Nothing must be either grasped or held.
This is set down as a Dhamma principle and is really the perfect summary of them all.
'Determined things' and 'non-determined things' submit to 'all things are not-self'.
They should not be grasped and held.
This summarizes the whole matter, including the investigation to see the Dhamma Truth in both the world and in the Teaching.
One's mindfulness and wisdom need to see through the world, penetrating from determined things to the non-determined, from the worldly to the world-transcending.
Yet this is all concerned with what's inside oneself, and not with anything external.
This insight into the essence of Dhamma requires a deep and profound understanding.
Then it's just a matter of releasing and letting go.
The dictum: 'Don't grasp', will suffice throughout your practice, from beginning to end.
By not holding to 'me' or 'mine', it can be said that you are truly following the Lord Buddha's Way, and will eventually win through to the complete cessation of all suffering.
Then mindfulness and wisdom will penetrate throughout, without attachment to matter, feeling, perception, conditions and consciousness.
The Lord Buddha explained about ignorance, about delusion concerning form, about craving that arises in the mind making it agitated, and about kamma, the action that seeks to obtain what is desired.
When you perceive this, your practice will be correctly aimed at eliminating desire and understanding yourself in both body and mind.
This needs a repeated examination to stop the concern and obsession with external things.
The deeper your understanding the more pathetic such desires appear.
They are simply not worth the total absorption they demand.
Such exuberant distractions originated in ignorance, resulting in a continued raving about people or involvements in the myriad things.
Your talk becomes pervaded with worldly concerns: “this is good, that is bad; she is good, he is bad.” In such a condition, you won't be able to see either the affliction of desire or the defilements within yourself.
The Lord Buddha resolved Mogharaja's Problem, by advising him to see the world as empty, as not-self, as being composed of elements and aggregates.
The aggregates must be stripped away, and concepts and assumptions such as 'person' or 'animal' must be disestablished.
The elements, aggregates, sense bases and concepts, need to be all exposed so that there's no more grasping at them.
What remains is the Deathless Dhamma.
This is without birth or death, and is also called the World-Transcending Dhamma or Nibbaana.
There are many names, but they all essentially refer to the same thing.
When mundane things are spurned, the result is the Transcendent Dhamma, the Non-Determined Dhamma, Pure Dhamma.
Just consider the running-on, the coursing-on from birth to death, from death to birth in the different realms of existence.
Then decide if Nibbana is really worth attaining.
On that farther shore, there's no suffering, no birth or death, because the 'King of Death' can't reach there.
Yet because we can't fathom this out, we persist in repeatedly choosing to be born on this nether shore, amidst its endless suffering.
With true understanding about suffering, your course will become firmly set straight for the farther shore, where all desires and defilements are extinguished.
Insight allows the penetration to see the common characteristics of impermanence, suffering and not-self in the aggregates.
Those with mindfulness and wisdom must concentrate on annihilating the defilements, for should its 'germ' remain, it will lead to renewed suffering.
Therefore, steadily investigate, release and eliminate — this is certainly the right way to proceed.
But do you care about any of this?
It's not as if there's some mystery involved; every one of you, whether woman or man, can come to accomplish it.
So develop yourselves through right moral behavior, through calming and stabilizing the mind, and through mindfulness and wisdom.
Then you will realize its true worth.
The stupid person enjoys dismissing Dhamma with: “Why should I bother?”.
Such a person can neither safeguard precepts, nor bring the mind to calm, and they turn away from that greatest of all tasks, the resolute striving to end suffering.
It is these people who are crazily rushing around, snatching and consuming, competing together until they all lie rotting in their coffins.
Exactly where is the value in any of this?
We've gone astray for far too long already, our lives almost spent after spanning the years.
It doesn't matter which generation you come from.
The air you breathe isn't just for your convenience and comfort, but for you to learn about suffering and the way to extinguish your suffering.
Don't imagine that your family and relatives are anything fundamental — you are alone.
You came alone and you'll go alone.
It's the same for all of us.
Only when there isn't any self to go, is Dhamma-insight achievable.
If there is still a self to be born, then you are stuck in the orbit of suffering.
So it's up to each one of you to investigate for a way of escape.
Those who trust in the Lord Buddha will have to go the same Dhamma way.
Those who would rather count on the demons and defilements will thrust themselves down into the mire.
They may then try to bully and be assertive, but their only gain will be more suffering.
True understanding on the other hand, leads to a profound weariness and a loosening of the bonds of lust.
However, if people appear to understand while still going out following after desires, then they truly are a disciple of the demons.
They declare a weariness and fatigue with it all, but really their mind isn't at all tired and finds it still very attractive.
It still wants to get, to have, to possess.
Yet insight can still arise through self-inspection of mind, and then the stupidity and delusion start to diminish.
They will come to their senses, from misguided delusions, and will realize the foolishness of self-praise and conceit.
This is the way steadily to rid oneself of such folly.
Your investigations must always be directed within, As self-inspection steadily becomes increasingly subtle and penetrating, your investigations must always be directed within.
It's not concerned with expert knowledge in external affairs, but with the seeing within yourself of all that's impermanent, suffering and not-self.
Ignorance stands as the source of any misguided attraction, but you've already closed your eyes and ears, and even tried to show off your presumed knowledge.
You won't be able to blame anyone else though, for you'll see that it's all due to your own foolishness.
This means that you must strive to clear up such backwardness before you die.
Don't waste your breath in gratifying desires, to get, to be and generally to make merry.
For this is being possessed by the demons of the defilements, with their multifarious mania to procure and become great and famous.
Focusing on this conceit will subdue it, and it will then withdraw until its death; for you'll start to realize that 'more conceit means more suffering.'
When your practice spins fully within yourself, you will be able steadily to clean out the defilements and find your reward in the emptied mind.
But if you continue to connive with the conceits, they will sweep away any Dhamma virtue you may have.
Then, only the demons will keep you company; for it's only when they are all driven out that their antithesis, the virtuous ones, will enter in.
Turmoil and unrest are the manifestations of your possession by demons, while freedom, serenity and peace demonstrate your fellowship with the virtuous.
Will all of you please go and check how many of these demons have been driven out.
Is the situation improving?
When they show their faces, point your finger at them and accuse them of being demons and devils, come to eat your heart and drink your blood.
Previously you've allowed them in, but now you can stop them and reduce your suffering.
The former bloated self shrivels as the demons lose their power.
Conceit of self withers away.
It's like administering antitoxin to someone bitten by a rabid dog, for by fixing one's attention back on to the disease one eliminates it.
The mind is then undisturbed and at peace, because the dictum, 'Don't grasp or hold anything', has been followed to the final cessation of suffering.
Those who practice Dhamma by developing mindfulness and wisdom will come truly to understand the way to extinguish suffering.
If they should ever lapse into heedlessness and grasp on to something, their steady training in controlling the mind will quickly notice and check the situation.
This, in itself, is of great benefit.
The important point about defilements and suffering is that they lie deep down in the personality structure; thus one must probe and examine within oneself.
We are all intimately acquainted with observing external things and should realize that they bring unrest and they clutter the mind.
We must therefore aim to achieve a condition of mind characterized by centeredness, and a stability of mindfulness.
You should notice in yourself the extent of the mind's restraint under various circumstances and whether mindfulness is sustained in every posture.
How should we handle the mind as it loses its balance through its habitual tendency to allow thoughts to proliferate out of control?
How can we bring it back under control?
You must realize that the mind without calm is full of endless imaginings and thought fabrications.
It is all aimed at acquiring and obtaining, and that this is suffering.
You must continually examine within yourself to see that such things are all impermanent, subject to change, to arising and ceasing, and are suffering.
This must be seen clearly and distinctly.
When we understand this arising and ceasing — by turning to examine such conditions inside oneself — we will realize that it's neither something good nor bad.
It is just a natural process of arising, persisting and ceasing.
Try to penetrate and see this.
The regular cleansing of the mind will show up any impurity, like dirt in an otherwise tidy room.
Each moment you should clean out any attachment.
Whatever should arise, persist and then cease — don't grasp and hold onto it!
Take this principle of 'not wanting, not grasping' deeply to heart, for then the mind will be undisturbed and free.
This is such a worthwhile realization.
It doesn't involve extensive knowledge — we just penetrate to see the impermanence in form, feeling, perception, conditions and consciousness.
Alternatively, you can examine the continually changing emotions within yourself, as they arise and cease.
Even if you don't go astray by chasing after these moods, perceptions and notions, you should still carefully stabilize the mind so that it doesn't grasp after anything — including any memory or thought which may arise.
Just concentrate on doing this and you will sweep clean the mind, wiping out whatever suffering is present.
Every condition arises and then ceases, comes and disappears.
Don't go and grasp hold of anything, thinking it's good or bad, or taking it as oneself.
Stop all such thinking and conceptualizing.
When you understand this, the mind will calm down of itself; it will naturally become free.
Whatever thoughts arise, see that they just come and will go, so don't grasp at them.
Then there's not much else to do.
Just carefully scrutinize and detach yourself from any entanglements within.
There are then no fantasies and thought fabrications about the past or future.
They've all stopped.
Things arise and cease — just that.
When you truly penetrate to see the present, with its arisings and ceasings, it's really no great affair at all.
Whatever one thinks about will naturally come to a close.
But if you can't foresee its cessation, then whatever comes up will be grasped and held, plunging you into turmoil and continuing thought proliferations.
You must stop this stream of conceivings and imaginings.
Cut it off!
Secure mindfulness and fix your total attention on the mind, and the chain of thought and fantasy — which had become an obsession — can be broken and stopped.
You can do this at any time and the mind will always release its hold and become still and free.
This must then be guarded as the normal state of mind by repeatedly keeping the thought proliferations in check.
Whenever they run out of control you must be aware of the situation and stop them.
You should practice like this until you become skilled, until the mind is no longer stuck in its obsessions.
Take the driver of a motor car as a model.
Whenever he or she wants to stop, the brakes can immediately be applied.
It's the same with the runaway mind, for when mindfulness is in attendance it will brake at once.
Whatever the situation, with mindfulness firmly established, you will be able to stop, disengage and free the mind.
This is by far the quickest and easiest way to deal with any circumstance that may arise.
Any other way is not quick enough to cope.
This method of self- reflection and self-knowledge is very worthwhile, because anyone can apply it at any time.
Even right here where there is speaking and listening, always bring the mind back to its normal state.
Before we knew anything about all this, we allowed the mind to go chasing after concerns and fantasies, spinning a web to trap ourselves in all kinds of difficulties.
Whatever meditation technique we tried wasn't really able to stop the confused dreaming.
Don't underestimate this method because of its apparent simplicity.
Please train yourself to become skillful in its application to combat any emotion that may intrude or any opinion that may interject itself.
When such opinions and conceits issue forth, cry: “Halt!
First stop and listen to what I have to say.” But the self and such conceits will immediately counter with their own arguments, even before you've finished telling them.
This is similar to suddenly encountering a wild animal, such as a tiger or poisonous snake.
Lacking any escape route you will have to stop and radiate loving-kindness.
Likewise, this will be able to quench the defilements and the self, which is ever ready to emerge and show its face.
You must be able to hold back the defilements, otherwise they will vastly expand their power.
By enduring and holding them back you will allow mindfulness time to adapt to the situation.
Then, if a halt is called, it will be able to stop it all immediately, without any resistance.
If you sit in meditation for one hour it must be in order to know the state of the mind with mindfulness, not just for pleasure-seeking.
By realizing the mind's condition you can make it firmly established; and then you will lose interest in pleasant feelings or desires.
Even if painful feeling should arise, don't commit your attention to it.
Keep mindfulness constantly established, not allowing the mind to swerve away dependent on what pleases or displeases.
Detach yourself from everything; for it's all just suffering involved with the aggregates, which are all impermanent.
Feeling is impermanent; the body is impermanent.
That's the way it is.
Craving is characterized by wanting pleasure: by being fully satisfied in any pleasurable feeling that arises; by abandoning oneself to entrancement with that pleasure; and by wanting that pleasure to last as long as possible.
But what about the suffering and pain that stand opposed to it?
If one sits a long time the body becomes stiff and painful, and the mind becomes agitated as the craving insists one change position.
It suggests one should do this or that, but instead you must train yourself to become detached and see it as merely the suffering involved in the aggregates.
Then the mind's agitation and anxiety will be allayed.
If this can't be fully achieved, never mind, just make sure there's no struggle to change the situation.
You must restrain and extinguish the desire and agitation.
If the mind is still very agitated and frantic, don't change your posture even if it is extremely painful.
Wait and calmly observe the extent of the pain and catch the right moment to change positions.
Carefully straighten out your leg, with the mind remaining firmly concentrated and unattached.
This may last for five minutes, after which the pain should have subsided.
However, you should remain in complete control of the mind so that one's centeredness is not disturbed by attraction towards the pleasant feeling that has replaced the pain.
This control needs to be established in all postures, and especially when pleasant feeling arises because there will then be a tendency to become entranced by it.
Even the feeling of equanimity — when there's neither pain nor pleasure — can be entrancing, so mindfulness must always be in attendance.
You should realize that, in truth, feeling is impermanent and suffering.
There's really no happiness involved at all.
You will need to examine to see both pleasant and unpleasant feeling in the same light.
This should be repeated until you are no longer enamoured with pleasant feeling.
Otherwise it will lead to great suffering because craving wants only unalloyed pleasure, which simply does not exist in this world of suffering.
If the mind can go beyond pleasure, pain and feeling, then it is truly going the transcendent way.
But please understand right here that if you haven't truly transcended feeling, there will still be desire for pleasure, and therefore grasping and holding onto suffering.
So this is something you must check out, should you consider yourself detached from all feeling.
You should thoroughly train yourself to deal with the feeling that arises from bodily pain.
However, the pleasant feeling, stemming from the subtle form of sensual desire, isn't so easily understood and you may then take it for happiness.
You will want to obtain happiness and this is where craving comes in.
It's therefore always taught that wanting and lust must be abandoned and given up.
Lust here means wanting only pleasure.
Satisfaction in lust or dissatisfaction in lust indicate that the mind is helplessly entangled in the tastes of both bodily and mental feeling.
Sometimes bodily feeling can manifest as great pain and anguish, and mindfulness should be used to find relief through stopping and detaching from the mind's frantic struggling.
Then, even though the body is upset, the mind doesn't follow after it.
However, this needs to be practiced first under moderate conditions before the situation becomes critical.
If you eagerly gather up the sensations stemming from the defilements, your load of suffering will increase more and more.
To think that it's all very comfortable and trouble-free is falling into enchantment with feeling.
Don't do it!
You must carefully follow through with every type of feeling to see it all as impermanent, suffering and not-self.
If you can disengage from feeling you will become totally disenchanted with the pleasant feeling involved in the five aggregates.
When you don't investigate and aren't circumspect enough, you will fall into desire and pining; just notice whether the mind is free or not.
The mind entangled and satiated in its desires is obviously dirty and sullied.
This occurs because the mind deludedly grasps after things, which brings struggle and extreme agitation.
If the mind is still attached to feeling — whether pleasant, unpleasant or neither pleasant nor unpleasant — it must endure suffering.
You should investigate to see impermanence, suffering and not-self in both body and mind, and not grasp or hold onto anything.
Whether looking out or in, you will then not be attached to anything and realize that this is indeed freedom.
The deeper you penetrate, the more you will realize that non-attachment is the overcoming of suffering.
This is the easiest way to end suffering, but if you don't properly understand, it really is the hardest way.
It is therefore imperative to train and investigate so that you can detach yourself and gain true release from the mind and its grasping.
Then, when you command the mind to stop and detach, to release and be free, it truly does find freedom.
This way of knowing the mind is of the greatest value, yet we never seem concerned enough to be as resourceful as possible in ridding ourselves of suffering.
With such a relaxed and intermittent effort you will never understand exactly where and how to remedy, to eliminate and relinquish.
You will whirl around with attachments and suffering.
You must know how to find your way to the end of suffering and not just sit back, taking it easy.
Look around and use mindfulness and wisdom as the means to free yourself from such conceits as 'me' and 'mine' and from all attachments.
If you are lacking in mindfulness and wisdom you will never be able to extinguish suffering, for each and every defilement is stubborn and difficult to overcome.
You need to understand how each of the sixteen defilements arises; although they won't all arise simultaneously.
By seeing the characteristics of their birth you will then be able to detach yourself from them.
Initially, you must clearly recognize them all as being 'hot and bothersome.' When one is discontented this is relatively easy, but when one is happy and contented it's much more difficult.
You have to find the normal state of mind, body and speech.
Normal here means being disinterested and impartial, and involves the keeping of pure precepts.
In guarding the sense doors this normality becomes an important indicator of failed vigilance when, for example, one is being attracted or repelled by an object that contacts the senses.
If you become careless and indulge in desire, then it's no longer just a small lapse but a very damaging failure that stains one's precepts and virtue.
The result is always agitation and distress.
So even in apparently minor affairs don't carelessly dismiss any desire as negligible, thinking it doesn't matter.
Always be mindful, with wisdom ready to remedy and eliminate.
By assiduous investigation even a very dangerous situation can be relieved and put down, and such incidents will then become more and more infrequent.
The intermediate defilements, such as the five hindrances, must be similarly considered.
The first hindrance is sensual desire: the satisfaction in sights, sounds, smells, tastes and tangibles.
The dissatisfaction in such sense experience is aversion.
Both attraction and repulsion sully the mind making it agitated and frantic, unable to come to calm.
The important point to recognize here is that when the mind is dominated by the five hindrances, it is in a state of distress and suffering.
Can you recognize these intermediate defilements that shroud your mind?
The hindrance of sensual desire can be likened to dye which clouds clear water, making it murky; and this turbidity equates with suffering.
Aversion as a hindrance is irritability and dissatisfaction, and the hindrance of sloth-and-torpor is a state of drowsiness and lassitude.
This is a condition of burying oneself in sleep and childish forgetfulness.
All the hindrances — including the final two; restless thought proliferations that interminably burden the mind, and sceptical doubt — cloak and cloud the mind in darkness.
You must therefore forcefully struggle to investigate these hindrances so that they, and every form of defilement from the gross to the subtle level, are weakened and ejected.
The practice of Dhamma is a very subtle and profound task requiring mindfulness and wisdom to probe and comprehend body and mind.
Repeatedly strive to see the truth of the body that is impermanent, suffering and composed of mere elements.
If you don't practice in this way to achieve insight, you will be left vainly groping about with no chance of extricating yourself from the mass of suffering.
The mind is full of intrigue and trickery that can adapt and expand in myriad ways.
Sometimes you may gain some insight through mindfulness and wisdom, becoming calm, clear and free, only to find the defilements intruding to spoil and cloak the mind in total darkness.
Then thought obsessions becloud your lucidity.
Each one of you must find a special means or stratagem to employ in understanding about yourself so that you don't get lost in a maze of distractions.
The obsessional thought proliferations together with heedlessness are of vital concern.
To become disheartened and indifferent to this danger means that your enemies effectively bar your way, thwarting your penetration to Dhamma.
You must find a way to destroy them and this needs proper attention — a resourceful, clever and ingenious attack.
Carefully probe to see how they originated and how they cease.
Repeatedly attend to the characteristics of impermanence, suffering and not-self.
When you truly see impermanence you will also know how to put down the defilements and craving, or at least how to weaken and thin them out.
It's as if we take up a broom and sweep out whatever attachments arise until eventually there's nothing left to grasp at, because everything was found to be tainted with impermanence and swept away.
By persevering in your investigation to see impermanence, suffering and not-self you will gain relief and ease, for you will be far from attachments.
This is the wonder of Dhamma: ease of body and mind and complete freedom from entanglement in the defilements.
It's nescience that enshrouds the mind and causes one to wander about entranced by sights and sounds, a victim under the tyranny of craving and the defilements.
Mindfulness and wisdom will break your entrancement by seeing that really there's no self involved in any of it, only things that arise and cease.
Such insight sweeps away every trace of 'me' and 'mine', leaving pure Dhamma with neither pleasure nor suffering.
The Lord Buddha declared, “Sabbe dhammaa anattaa” — All things are not-self.”… There's just Dhamma that is essential but not-self.
This doesn't mean the wrong view of complete annihilationism, but the extinction of all attachment and holding 'me' and 'mine'.
There's only that which is called the Undying Dhamma — without birth, without aging, without pain and without death.
Only the defilements and suffering are annihilated.
This is also known as 'Sunyo', the voidness of a substantial self.
This Undying Dhamma is the true marvel that the Lord Buddha discovered and expounded to awaken us.
Shouldn't we therefore hurry to penetrate through the impermanence, suffering and not-self in the five aggregates, to that condition of Dhamma that is without birth, old age, illness and death?
This is also called Nibbaana, Sunyataa and the Undetermined Dhamma.
They are really the same but have been given various mundane names and titles.
Don't grasp at them!
Just stay in the condition of mind free of self.
The Path, Fruit and Nibbaana are not something to hope for in a future life by developing a vast heap of Perfections.
Some people like to point out that the Lord Buddha had to accumulate so many, many virtues — but what about yourself?
You don't consider how many lives have passed, yet you still haven't attained to the Goal.
It's all because of your stupidity in ever devising excuses.
The Lord Buddha expounded principles of Dhamma such as the Four Foundations of Mindfulness, the Four Noble Truths and the Three Marks.
These are to be found inside yourself, so probe and examine and search out the defilements within.
Then disengage and eject them and all their concerns for 'me' and 'mine', to overcome all suffering.
It's not a case of excusing oneself from exertion by relying on the miraculous powers of some object or by building up the perfections.
Bring the mind back to the present defilements — is it better to eliminate them or fall in with them?
Does that lead to suffering?
You must find out the truth within yourself about getting rid of stupidity and the delusion that living in the structure of suffering is really happiness.
Each one of us is stuck in such delusion because we won't open our eyes to the predicament.
You must discuss together, gain advice and dig out the truth so that mindfulness and wisdom can lead to self-knowledge.
This acknowledgement and seeing of the defilements and suffering within yourself brings great benefits.
But you must also consult about this to learn the basic truths of suffering, its origin and the way of investigating body, mind and Dhamma to extinguish that suffering.
Then your suffering will diminish because mindfulness and wisdom probe and extract the defilements that burn in the mind.
With correct Dhamma practice and insight your suffering will decline.
This will, of itself, encourage and attract other people to follow your example without having to go out to proclaim your success.
Here, there's nothing like: “I received this diploma or that degree.” Our talk is all about suffering, defilements and not-self.
True penetration using mindfulness and wisdom can scrape away all the defilements; but only if you persevere and take advantage of this opportune moment to achieve such results in yourself.
Don't abandon your life to the service of the defilements and craving.
You must constantly adjust your exertion to make it increasingly effective in destroying craving and extinguishing suffering.
The renouncing of self and defilements is essential because of the resulting state of peace and freedom in the mind.
You must concern yourself with this, otherwise the defilements will never be destroyed and, together with every other ignorant person in the world, you will only find vexation and suffering.
Maara, the Evil One, attempted to stop the Lord Buddha's exertion by telling him that within seven days he was to become a World Ruling Monarch.
But the Lord Buddha was wise to such deceptions and trickery and answered, “I know that already!”.
The Lord Buddha had the ability instantly to know such things for himself, so Maara was continually defeated.
But what about us?
Are you a disciple of the Lord Buddha or still a follower of Maara?
When a temptation appears — there you go, following him the whole way, never wearying of the lust involved.
Disciples of the Lord Buddha must turn against the stream of craving and establish themselves in pure precepts and virtue, the perfect qualities of self control.
By exertion, from the level of precepts to that of developing calm and wisdom to see impermancnce, suffering and not-self, they attain to the end of suffering.
This level of not-self is also where high-wisdom must be brought to bear.
But the essential point is never to believe the wiles of the defilements.
Whether it's the canker of nescience or of craving, you must establish mindfulness and wisdom to check, clear and renounce.
Temptations will then fail and stop because you reject their offers.
One doesn't want, one relinquishes.
If you accept and follow their lure, then you will fall for more and more desire until the mind is frantic and aflame.
But by steadily turning away and resisting, such cravings lessen and diminish until finally they cease.
The training of the mind takes desire for its battlefield.
Otherwise it is like an addict who, with no intention to beat his habit, becomes inescapably a slave to his own craving.
You must establish mindfulness as your rampart, and wisdom as the weapon you use to break through and destroy.
You can then make steady progress, penetrating to an ever deepening awareness of the structure of craving.
By self-penetration you will be able to destroy the defilements and realize the escape route used by all the Noble Disciples.
You will then see that it was because of one's own previous blindness that one felt able to assert that Nibbana didn't exist.
The true elimination of suffering is only concerned with yourself in this present moment.
By being mindful you can stop and disengage yourself, so that suffering is relieved.
As your Dhamma practice develops, the defilements steadily lose strength.
It's Ehipassiko — inviting one to come and see — because everyone is capable of extinguishing suffering.
By discerning the impermanence, suffering and not-self in everything, and breaking off all attachments, the mind is free, becoming Dhamma.
There's no need to rush out to follow anyone else, whether heavenly protectors or miracle men, because success is wholly found within the mind.
One penetrates thoroughly, clearing out all attachments, making the mind worthy of Ehipassiko.
But if the mind is still full of defilements, one's invitation is to come and see oneself being burned alive!
Therefore such an invitation always has a double edge.
When craving and attachments are entirely quenched, one knows right there and then that one is free.
So come and see this liberated mind right now!
You are perfectly capable of realizing this for yourself.
It's not so difficult.
To enter and examine the mind is easy because it's evident in every posture and at every moment.
You don't have to take any trip by car or boat to see the various forms of truth and falsehood within yourself.
But if you only learn about external things by studying mundane affairs as worldly people do, you can never gain insight.
You must turn within to learn about Dhamma, truly penetrating to the impermanence, suffering and not-self of body, feeling, mind and mind-objects.
One sees each thing as: impermanent — it arises, persists and ceases; suffering, therefore one doesn't grasp it; and it's all free of self.
It all comes together in this state of Dhamma and then, if one has true insight, it's simple for the mind to gain freedom.
But if you understand wrongly — it's like switching an electric light off instead of on.
With proper understanding one flicks the switch and all is light, while wrong understanding plunges one into instant darkness.
It's the same with the mind: insight brings light and improper understanding brings darkness.
You need to examine to see why there is a constant wanting of things.
Such concerns are all suffering based in ignorance, wishful thinking and fantasizing about self, people and possessions.
It's all frantic and nonstop news and information gathering.
But by concentrating the mind within you will find there's no problem or concern.
It's just a detaching and emptying.
Dhamma arises here as easily as the defilements can develop on the opposite side.
So you must choose: either the bright or dark side; to stop and be free or to continue rushing frantically about.
Make this decision within yourself.
Dhamma insight is remarkable, for, if one begins by seeing correctly, it leads on to full penetration.
If one becomes snagged on any obstacle, one must then probe and examine to see where one's attachment still lies.
Then it will all become clear.
You have learned and followed the ways of the defilements long enough.
Now turn and use mindfulness and wisdom to investigate them.
Don't continue conniving with them!
Resist their advances and refuse to follow them!
When you understand this, you will find that all desire and delinquency, all love and hatred, are completely swept away.
But without insight the self inflates with desires for this and that, masterly arranging its banquet fantasies.
Just consider the following: People are just like actors in a large theater.
It's a drama of life with a cast of Maara and demons, and hero and heroine — all contained within yourself!
You must rip away the conventional forms to reveal the pure Dhamma that remains.
This is freedom from self and everything will end there.
The language used in these talks is that of Forest Dhamma.
This means that apart from some Paali quotations — usually taken from the chants that many of the listeners would be familiar with, and most of the monks would have learned by heart — it is usually ordinary Thai.
Many Thai words are rooted in Paali and this can be seen in their spelling.
However, both the present pronunciation and the meaning of the word have often been transformed.
Forest Dhamma therefore should not be treated as if it was classical Paali, and scholars should beware of trying to track definitions through the text.
It's important to remember that this is an oral teaching, which afterwards was warmed up between pages.
As this book is mainly concerned with meditation, here are some Sutta passages with descriptions of generosity and moral precepts.
Daana: Generosity
In contrast to the modern emphasis on consuming and possessing, the Lord Buddha spoke of the virtue of giving and being content with whatever one has.
There are always circumstances where one can give.
For instance, one can offer one's time, help and sympathy.
And one can for-give.
If one has wealth, he explained the use of possessions; the benefits which one should get from wealth; reasons for earning and having wealth:
ii) to share this happiness and comfort with one's friends.
iii) to make oneself secure against all misfortunes.
iv) to make the fivefold offering:
to guests, by receiving them.
to the departed, by dedicating merit to them.
to the king, by paying taxes and duties and so on.
to the deities, i.e., those beings who are worshipped according to one's faith.
v) to support those monks and spiritual teachers who lead a pure and diligent life.
Sappurisa Daana: Gifts of a good man
ii) to give choice things.
iii) to give at fitting times.
iv) to give suitable things.
v) to give with discretion.
vi) to give repeatedly or regularly.
vii) to calm one's mind on giving.
viii) to be glad after giving.
The basic guidelines for the actions and speech of any Buddhist can be appreciated by anyone, of any religion or none.
There is no dogma involved, it is a plain and simple way of living without harming or hurting any creature.
The other feature to bear in mind is that it is accepted voluntarily by the individual.
This is not something that one is commanded to receive.
It is the individual's volition that changes a list of precepts into a way of living.
With that change, the appreciation and mindfulness of one's actions and speech become more subtle and which automatically leads on to meditation.
There are the basic Five Precepts and these become more refined with the Eight Precepts.
Everyone who listened to the original Dhamma talks would be keeping the Eight Precepts.
These Precepts can be received by simply saying:
“I undertake the training rule/precept…
ii) to abstain from taking what is not given.
iii) to abstain from sexual misconduct.
iv) to abstain from false speech.
v) to abstain from intoxicants causing heedlessness.
vi) to abstain from untimely eating.
vii) to abstain from dancing, singing, music and unseemly shows, from wearing garlands, smartening with scents, and embellishment with unguents.
viii) to abstain from the use of high and large luxurious couches.
When it comes to the Dhamma, we have to understand that our opinions are one thing; the Dhamma is something else.
As for the practice, start out by establishing your powers of endurance and then contemplate.
Contemplate your activities, your comings and goings.
Contemplate what you're up to.
Whatever arises, the Buddha has us know all around.
Whatever direction things come in from, he has us know all around.
If we know all around, whatever comes at us from this way, we see it.
Whatever comes at us from that way, we see it.
Right we know.
Wrong we know.
Happy we know.
Glad we know.
We know all around.
But our minds, when they contemplate, aren't yet all around.
We know just this side but leave that side wide open.
It's like putting a fence around a field or a house but it doesn't go all around.
If we put it up just on this side, thieves will come in that side, the side that the fence hasn't gone around.
Why is that?
We haven't closed the gate.
Our fence isn't yet good.
It's normal that they'll have to come through that opening.
So we contemplate again, adding more fence, closing things off, continually.
Putting up a fence means establishing mindfulness and always being alert.
If we do this, the Dhamma won't go anywhere else.
It'll come right here.
Good and bad, the Dhamma we should see and should know, will arise right here.
As for whatever we don't need to know, we let it go for the time being.
We don't waste our time with the logs we aren't yet strong enough to lift.
Wait until we have a tractor or a ten-wheel truck before trying to move them.
Focus for the time being just on the things you can lift.
Keep at it, using your powers of endurance, bit by bit.
If you stick with this steadily, your happy moods and sad moods, your desirable moods and undesirable moods, will all come in right there.
That's when you get to watch them.
Your moods and preoccupations are one thing; the mind is something else.
They're two different kinds of things.
Usually when a mood hits, one that we like, we go running after it.
If it's one we don't like, we turn our backs on it.
When this is the case, we don't see our own mind.
We just keep running after our moods.
The mood is the mood; the mind is the mind.
You have to separate them out to see what the mind is like, what the mood is like.
As when we're sitting here still: We feel at ease.
But if someone comes along and insults us, we go running after the mood.
We've left our spot.
The mind that gets deluded by the mood goes running after the mood.
We become a moody person, a person who panders to his moods.
You have to understand that all your moods are lies.
There's nothing true to them at all.
They're far from the Buddha's teachings.
All they can do is lie to us about everything of every sort.
The Buddha taught us to meditate to see their truth — the truth of the world.
The world is our moods, our preoccupations.
Our preoccupations are the world.
If we aren't acquainted with the Dhamma, aren't acquainted with the mind, aren't acquainted with our preoccupations, we grab onto the mind and its preoccupations and get them all mixed up.
“Whew!
My mind feels no ease.” It's like you have many minds, and they're all in a turmoil.
Actually, that's not the case.
You don't have many minds.
You have many moods and preoccupations.
We're not acquainted with our own mind, so we keep running after our preoccupations.
If you sit meditating like that, things just keep running along in that way.
The Buddha taught us to look at things right there, right where they arise.
When they arise, they don't stay.
They disband.
They disband and then they arise.
When they arise, they disband — but we don't want them to be that way.
When the mind is quiet, we want it to keep on being quiet.
We don't want it to get stirred up.
We want to be at our ease.
Our views are in opposition to the truth.
The Buddha taught us first to see these things all around, from all sides.
Only then will the mind really be quiet and still.
As long as we don't know these things, as long as we don't understand our moods, we become a moody person.
We lay claim to our moods.
This turns into stubbornness and pride.
When we see this happening, the Buddha tells us to turn our attention to contemplating right there: “This kind of thinking is thinking; this kind of knowing is knowing; when things are like this, they're like this.” Tell yourself that these things simply follow their own nature.
This is what moods are like.
This is what the mind is like.
When this is the way things are, what can you do to be at your ease?
What can you do to be at your ease?
Well, just contemplate right there.
We don't want things to be like that: That's the reason for our discomfort.
No matter where you go to run away from these things, they're still just like that.
So we should understand that these things are just the way they are, that's all.
That's the truth.
To put it simply, that's the Buddha, but we don't see him there.
We think it's Devadatta, not the Buddha at all.
The inconstancy of the Dhamma — inconstancy, stress, and not-self: There's nothing wrong with these things.
They're just the way they are.
We place too many labels and intentions on them.
When you can see that happening, it's really good.
To put in simple terms: Suppose that when you sit in concentration today the mind is still.
You think to yourself, “Mmm.
This is really nice.” Just sitting there, you feel at ease.
This keeps up for two or three days.
“Mmm.
I really like this.” Then the next day when you sit down to meditate, it's like sitting on a red ants' nest.
You can't stay seated.
Nothing works.
You're all upset.
You ask yourself, “Why isn't it like the other day?
Why was it so comfortable then?” You can't stop thinking about the other day.
You want it to be like the other day.
Right there is where you're deluded.
Preoccupations change.
They're not constant or sure; they're not stable.
They just keep following their nature.
The Buddha taught us to see that that's the way they are.
Whatever arises is just old stuff coming back.
There's nothing to it, but we fix labels and make rules about things: “This I like.
This I don't like.” Whatever we like makes us happy — happy because of our delusion: happy because of our delusion, not happy because it's right.
When the mind is quiet, the Buddha tells us not to be intoxicated by it.
When it's distracted, he tells us not to be intoxicated by it.
Things happen in all kinds of ways.
There's addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division.
That's how we can calculate numbers, but we want there to be just multiplication so that we can have lots of everything.
We want to do away with addition, do away with subtraction, do away with division — and our calculations will all be stupid.
If we had nothing but multiplication, would we have any space to put everything?
If that's how we think, we'll stay in a turmoil.
The Buddha said that that sort of thinking has no discernment.
Stillness of mind — tranquility — comes from being far away from preoccupations.
If you don't hear much of anything, the mind settles down and is still.
To get this kind of stillness, you have to go off into seclusion, to a place that's quiet and still.
If you can get away from your preoccupations, not seeing this, not knowing about that, the mind can settle down.
But that's like a disease, a disease like cancer.
There's a swelling but it doesn't yet hurt.
It's not yet tormenting us, it doesn't yet hurt, so we seem to be well — as if there were no defilements in the mind.
That's what the mind is like at times like that.
As long as you stay there, it's quiet.
But when it comes out to look at sights and hear sounds, that's the end of it.
It's not at its ease anymore.
How can you keep on staying alone like that so as not to see sights, hear sounds, smell aromas, taste flavors, or touch tactile sensations?
Where can you go?
There's no place in the world like that at all.
The Buddha wanted us to see sights, hear sounds, smell aromas, taste flavors, or touch tactile sensations: hot, cold, hard, soft.
He wanted us to be acquainted with everything.
He didn't want us to run away and hide.
He wanted us to look and, when we've looked, to understand: “Oh.
That's the way these things are.” He told us to give rise to discernment.
How do we give rise to discernment?
The Buddha said that it's not hard — if we keep at it.
When distractions arise: “Oh.
It's not for sure.
It's inconstant.” When the mind is still, don't say, “Oh.
It's really nice and still.” That, too, isn't for sure.
If you don't believe me, give it a try.
Suppose that you like a certain kind of food and you say, “Boy, do I really like this food!” Try eating it every day.
How many months could you keep it up?
It won't be too long before you say, “Enough.
I'm sick and tired of this.” Understand?
“I'm really sick and tired of this.” You're sick and tired of what you liked.
We depend on change in order to live, so just acquaint yourself with the fact that it's all inconstant.
Pleasure isn't for sure; pain isn't for sure; happiness isn't for sure; stillness isn't for sure, distraction isn't for sure.
Whatever, it all isn't for sure.
Whatever arises, you should tell it: “Don't try to fool me.
You're not for sure.” That way everything loses its value.
If you can think in that way, it's really good.
The things you don't like are all not for sure.
Everything that comes along isn't for sure.
It's as if they were trying to sell you things, but everything has the same price: It's not for sure — not for sure in any way at all.
In other words, it's inconstant.
It keeps moving back and forth.
To put it simply, that's the Buddha.
Inconstancy means that nothing's for sure.
That's the truth.
Why don't we see the truth?
Because we haven't looked to see it clearly.
“Whoever sees the Dhamma sees the Buddha.” If you see the inconstancy of each and every thing, you give rise to nibbida: disenchantment.
“That's all this is: no big deal.
That's all that is: no big deal.” The concentration in the mind is — no big deal.
When you can do that, it's no longer hard to contemplate.
Whatever the preoccupation, you can say in your mind, “No big deal,” and it stops right there.
Everything becomes empty and in vain: everything that's unsteady, inconstant.
It moves around and changes.
It's inconstant, stressful, and not-self.
It's not for sure.
It's like a piece of iron that's been heated until it's red and glowing: Does it have any spot where it's cool?
Try touching it.
If you touch it on top, it's hot.
If you touch it underneath, it's hot.
If you touch it on the sides, it's hot.
Why is it hot?
Because the whole thing is a piece of red-hot iron.
Where could it have a cool spot?
That's the way it is.
When that's the way it is, we don't have to go touching it.
We know it's hot.
If you think that “This is good; I really like it,” don't give it your seal of guarantee.
It's a red-hot piece of iron.
Wherever you touch it, wherever you hold onto it, it'll immediately burn you in every way.
So keep on contemplating.
Whether you're standing or walking or whatever — even when you're on the toilet or on your almsround: When you eat, don't make it a big deal.
When the food comes out the other end, don't make it a big deal.
Whatever it is, it's inconstant.
It's not for sure.
It's not truthful in any way.
It's like touching a red-hot piece of iron.
You don't know where you can touch it because it's hot all over.
So you just stop touching it.
“This is inconstant.
That's inconstant.” Nothing at all is for sure.
Even our thoughts are inconstant.
Why are they inconstant?
They're not-self.
They're not ours.
They have to be the way they are.
They're unstable and inconstant.
Boil everything down to that.
Whatever you like isn't for sure.
No matter how much you like it, it isn't for sure.
Whatever the preoccupation, no matter how much you like it, you have to tell yourself, “This isn't for sure.
This is unstable and inconstant.” And keep on watching…
Like this glass: It's really pretty.
You want to put it away so that it doesn't break.
But it's not for sure.
One day you put it right next to yourself and then, when you reach for something, you hit it by mistake.
It falls to the floor and breaks.
It's not for sure.
If it doesn't break today, it'll break tomorrow.
If it doesn't break tomorrow, it'll break the next day — for it's breakable.
We're taught not to place our trust in things like this, because they're inconstant.
Things that are inconstant: The Buddha taught that they're the truth.
Think about it.
If you see that there's no truth to things, that's the truth.
That's constant.
For sure.
When there's birth, there has to be aging, illness, and death.
That's something constant and for sure.
What's constant comes from things that aren't constant.
We say that things are inconstant and not for sure — and that turns everything around: That's what's constant and for sure.
It doesn't change.
How is it constant?
It's constant in that that's the way things keep on being.
Even if you try to get in the way, you don't have an effect.
Things just keep on being that way.
They arise and then they disband, disband and then arise.
That's the way it is with inconstancy.
That's how it becomes the truth.
The Buddha and his noble disciples awakened because of inconstant things.
When you see inconstancy, the result is nibbida: disenchantment.
Disenchantment isn't disgust, you know.
If you feel disgust, that's wrong, the wrong kind of disenchantment.
Disenchantment isn't like our normal disgust.
For example, if you live with your wife and children to the point where you get sick and tired of them, that's not disenchantment.
It's actually a big defilement; it squeezes your heart.
If you run away from things like that, it's being sick and tired because of defilement.
That's not nibbida.
It's actually a heavy defilement, but we think it's disenchantment.
Suppose that you're kind to people.
Whatever you have, you want to give to them.
You sympathize with them, you see that they're pretty and lovely and good to you.
Your defilements are now coming around from the other side.
Watch out!
That's not kindness through the Dhamma; it's selfish kindness.
You want something out of them, which is why you're kind to them.
It's the same with disenchantment.
“I'm sick and tired of this.
I'm not going to stay any longer.
I'm fed up.” That's not right at all.
It's a big defilement.
It's disenchantment only in name.
The Buddha's disenchantment is something else: leaving things alone, putting them down.
You don't kill them, you don't beat them, you don't punish them, you're not nice to them.
You just put them down.
Everything.
The same with everything.
That's how it has to be.
Only then can you say that your mind has let go, that it's empty: empty of clinging, empty of attachment.
Emptiness doesn't mean nobody exists.
Or like this glass: It's not the case that it has to not exist for us to say that it's empty.
This thermos exists; people exist; everything exists, but those who know feel in their hearts that these things are truths, they're not for sure, they simply follow their conditions: They're dhammas that arise and disband, that's all.
Take this thermos: If we like it, it doesn't react or say anything.
The liking is all on our side.
Even if we hate it and throw it into the woods, it still doesn't react.
It doesn't respond to us.
Why?
Because it's just the way it is.
We like it or dislike it because of our own attachment.
We see that it's good or no good.
The view that it's good squeezes our heart.
The view that it's no good squeezes our heart.
Both are defilements.
So you don't have to run away from things like this.
Just understand this principle and keep contemplating.
That's all there is to it.
The mind will see that these things are no big deal.
They're just the way they are.
If we hate them, they don't respond.
If we like them, they don't respond.
We're simply crazy of our own accord.
Nothing disturbs us, but we get all worked up.
Try to see everything in this way.
It's the same with the body; it's the same with the mind; it's the same with the moods and preoccupations that make contact: See them as inconstant, stressful, and not-self.
They're just the way they are.
We suffer because we don't want them to be that way.
We want to get things that we simply can't get.
Is there something you want?
“I guess it's like when I want concentration.
I want the mind to be quiet.
Okay, it's true that you want that.
But what's the cause that keeps your mind from being quiet?
The Buddha says that all things arise from causes, but we want just the results.
We eat watermelons but we've never planted any watermelons.
We don't know where they come from.
We see when they're sliced open and they're nice and red: “Mmm.
Looks sweet.” We try eating them, and they taste good and sweet, but that's all we know.
Why watermelons are the way they are, we have no idea.
That's because we aren't all-around.
All-around in what way?
It's like watering vegetables.
Wherever we forget to water doesn't grow.
Wherever we forget to give fertilizer doesn't grow.
Contemplate this principle and you'll give rise to discernment.
When you've finished with things outside, you look at your own mind.
Look at the affairs of your body and mind.
Now that we're born, why do we suffer?
We suffer from the same old things, but we haven't thought them through.
We don't know them thoroughly.
We suffer but we don't really see suffering.
When we live at home, we suffer from our wife and children, but no matter how much we suffer, we don't really see suffering — so we keep on suffering.
It's the same when the mind doesn't get concentrated.
We don't know why it won't get concentrated.
We don't really see what's actually arising.
The Buddha told us to look for the causes of what's arising.
All things arise from causes.
It's like putting water in a bottle and giving it to someone to drink.
Once he's finished drinking it, he'll have to come back and ask for more — for the water isn't water in a spring.
It's water in a bottle.
But if you show the spring to the person and tell him to get water there, he can sit there and keep on drinking water and won't ask you for any more, for the water never runs out.
It's the same when we see inconstancy, stress, and not-self.
It goes deep, for we really know, we know all the way in.
Ordinary knowledge doesn't know all the way in.
If we know all the way in, it never grows stale.
Whatever arises, it's already right.
When it disbands, it's already right.
As a result, it's right without stop.
The view that says, “That's the way it is.
It's right the way it is”: That's when you've got it.
That's when you're skilled and at ease.
You don't have to suffer.
The problems that we get involved with and cling to will gradually unravel.
As the Buddha said, see simply that things arise and then disband, disband and then arise, arise and then disband.
Keep watching this Dhamma constantly, doing it constantly, developing it constantly, cultivating it constantly, and you'll arrive at a sense of disenchantment.
Disenchanted with what?
Disenchanted with everything of every sort.
The things that come by way of the ears, we already understand them; by way of the eyes, we already understand them; by way of the nose, we already understand them; by way of the tongue, we already understand them.
The things that arise at the mind, we already understand them.
They're all the same sort of thing — all of them, the same sort of thing: eko dhammo, one Dhamma.
This Dhamma is inconstant, stressful, and not-self.
You shouldn't cling to anything at all.
That way, disenchantment will arise.
When the eye sees a form, you already understand it.
When the ear hears a sound, you already understand it.
You understand all about it.
These things will sometimes make us happy, sometimes sad, sometimes make us feel love, sometimes make us feel hatred.
We already know all about these sorts of things.
If we cling to them, they turn into issues.
If we let them go — let forms go the way of forms, sounds the way of sounds — if we send them back and let them go their own way: When we can stay at this level, the Buddha said that we'll see all about inconstancy.
Whatever the preoccupations that arise, they're all empty and in vain.
They're all deceptions.
When we see through the things that used to deceive us — when we're intent on staying at ease, mindful, alert, and discerning — it's not that we see anything else.
We simply see that all the preoccupations that arise are simply the way they are.
Even if, while we're sitting perfectly still, the mind thinks about this or that, it doesn't matter.
It's just an affair of thinking.
You don't have to believe what it's thinking about.
If the mind is peaceful and you feel, “Ah, it's nice and peaceful,” the peace doesn't matter, either.
Peace is inconstant, too.
There's nothing but things that are inconstant.
You can sit and watch the Dhamma right there.
Discernment arises: What reason is there to suffer?
We suffer over things that never amount to much.
We want to get this, we want it to be like that, we want to be something.
If you want to be an arahant, you immediately suffer, right here and now.
Arahants have stopped wanting to be like this or like that, but we want to get this and get that, to be this and be that — so we're sure to suffer.
If you see that this spot is good or that spot is excellent, it all comes out of you.
If you see yourself, that's the end of saying things like that.
I'll give you a simple comparison.
This food is good.
This tray is worth this many hundreds; that tray, this many tens.
They're all nothing but good things.
When they're on plates: “This is mine.
This is yours.” But when they've gone into the stomach and come out the other end, nobody argues over whose is whose — or would you still want to argue?
That's what it's like.
When you're willing to admit the way things are, that's just what it's like.
If we don't really understand, we argue over what's mine and what's yours.
But when they all come together as the same sort of thing, nobody lays any claims.
They're simply the condition they are.
No matter how wonderful the food might be, when it comes out the other end, if you wanted to give it as a gift to your brothers and sisters, no one would want it — or would you still want it?
Nobody would fight over it at all.
For this reason, if we gather things together as eko dhammo — one single dhamma — and see that their characteristics are all the same, it gives rise to disenchantment.
This disenchantment isn't disgust.
The mind simply loosens its grip, it's had enough, it's empty, it's sobered up.
There's no love, no hatred, no fixating on anything.
If you have things, okay.
If you don't, it's still okay.
You're at ease.
At peace.
Nibbana is the ultimate happiness.
Nibbana is the ultimate peace, emptiness.
Listen carefully.
Worldly happiness isn't the ultimate happiness.
Worldly emptiness isn't the ultimate emptiness.
The ultimate emptiness is empty of clinging.
The ultimate happiness is peace.
There's peace and then there's emptiness, the ultimate emptiness.
At the moment, though, the mind is at peace but it's not ultimate.
It's happy, but it's not ultimate.
This is why the Buddha described nibbana as the ultimate emptiness, its happiness as the ultimate happiness.
It changes the nature of happiness to be peace.
It's happy but not fixated on any object.
Pains still exist, but you see the pains and pleasures that arise as equal to each other.
They have the same price.
The objects we like and don't like are equal to each other.
But as for us right now, these things aren't equal.
The objects we like are really pleasing.
The objects we don't like, we want to smash.
That means they're not equal.
But their reality is that they're equal.
So think in a way that makes them equal.
They're not stable.
They're not constant — like the food I mentioned just now.
“This is good.
That's wonderful.” But when they're all brought together, they're equal.
Nobody says, “Give me a little more.
I didn't get enough.” It's all been brought together to the way it is.
If we don't drop the principles of inconstancy, stress, and not-self, we're on the path.
We see with every moment.
We see the eye, we see the mind, we see the body.
Like when you sit in meditation.
After a moment the mind goes off in a flash, so you pull it back.
No matter what you do, it won't stay.
Try holding your breath.
Will it go away then?
Yyb!
It goes, but not far.
It's not going to go now.
It circles around right here — because your mind feels like it's about to die.
The same with sounds.
I once stuffed my ears with beeswax.
Noises bothered me, so I stuffed my ears.
Things were totally quiet, with just the sound from within my ears themselves.
Why did I do it?
I contemplated what I was doing; I didn't torment myself just out of stupidity.
I thought about the matter.
“Oh.
If people could become noble ones from not hearing anything, then every deaf person would be a noble one.
Every blind person would be a noble one.
They'd all be arahants.” So I listened to my thoughts, and — Oh!
— discernment arose.
“Is there any use in stuffing your ears?
In closing your eyes?
It's self-torment.” But I did learn from it.
I learned and then stopped doing it.
I stopped trying to close things off.
Don't go wrestling and attacking, don't go cutting down the trunks of trees that have already died.
It gets you nowhere.
You end up tired and stand there looking like a fool.
They were such a waste, such a real waste, my early years as a meditator.
When I think about them, I see that I was really deluded.
The Buddha taught us to meditate to gain release from suffering, but I simply scooped up more suffering for myself.
I couldn't sit in peace, couldn't lie down in peace.
The reason we live in physical seclusion is to get the mind in mental seclusion from the objects that stir up its moods.
These things are synonyms that follow one after the other.
Upadhi-viveka refers to seclusion from our defilements: When we know what's what, we can pull out of them; we pull out from whatever the state the mind is in.
This is the only purpose of physical seclusion.
If you don't have any discernment, you can create difficulties for yourself when you go off into physical seclusion.
When you go live in the wilderness, don't get stuck on the wilderness.
If you get stuck on the wilderness, you become a monkey.
When you see the trees, you miss the trees.
You start jumping around just like the monkey you were before.
The Buddha never taught us to be this or be that.
When you live in a peaceful place, the mind becomes peaceful.
“Mmm.
Peace at last.
The mind is at peace.” But when you leave the wilderness, is the mind at peace?
Not any more.
So what do you do then?
The Buddha didn't have us stay in the wilderness.
He had us use the wilderness as a place to train.
You go to the wilderness to find some peace so that your meditation will develop, so that you'll develop discernment.
That's so that when you go into the city and deal with people, with sights, sounds, smells, tastes, and tactile sensations, you'll have strength, you'll have your strategies.
You'll have your firm foundation for contemplating things, to see how they're not for sure.
Going to the wilderness in this way is something that can really help give you strength.
If you think that you can live anywhere, that you can live with lots of people, it's like a knife with a double-edged blade.
If you don't have inner strength, you can create difficulties for yourself.
It's like monks who study the Abhidhamma.
They say that when you study the Abhidhamma you don't have to cling to anything, don't have to fixate on anything.
It's nice and easy.
You don't have to observe the precepts.
You just focus right on the mind.
That's what monks who study the Abhidhamma say.
“As for women, what's the matter with getting near them?
Women are just like our mothers.
We ourselves were born right out of that spot.” That's bragging too much.
They ordained just yesterday and yet they refuse to be careful around women.
That's not the real Abhidhamma.
That's not what the Abhidhamma says.
But they say that the Abhidhamma is on a level higher than the human level.
“When you're that high, it doesn't matter whether you're near someone or not.
There's no near, no far.
There's nothing to be afraid of.
Women are people just like us.
Just pretend that they're men.
That way you can get near them, touch them, feel them.
Just pretend that they're men.
But is that the sort of thing you can pretend?
It's a double-edged blade.
If we were talking genuine Abhidhamma, there wouldn't be a problem.
But this Abhidhamma is fake.
The Buddha taught us to live in the wilderness.
The proper way, when a monk goes into the wilderness, is to stay in a quiet place; to wander in the quiet wilderness; not to be entangled with friends and companions and other sorts of things.
That's the right way to do it.
But most of us don't follow the right way.
We live in a quiet place and get attached to the quiet.
As soon as we see a form, it gives rise to defilement.
In our ears there's nothing but defilement.
That's going too far.
It lacks discernment.
If you bring things together, they come together at the path — the right path, or right view.
That's where things come together.
If you have right view, you can live with a large group of people and there's no problem.
You can live with a small group of people and there's no problem.
You can live in the forest or in a cave and there's no problem.
But this is something you can't just attain without any effort.
You have to get so that's the way the mind really is.
Make the mind know the Dhamma.
When it knows the Dhamma, make it see the Dhamma.
Practice the Dhamma so that the mind is Dhamma.
You don't want to be able just to speak about the Dhamma.
It's something very different.
The Buddha taught all the way to the truth, but we only go halfway, in half measures.
That's why progress is difficult.
If we come to live in the wilderness, we get to train ourselves — like training ourselves to grow rice.
Once we plant it, it grows gradually.
If nothing eats it, it's okay.
But what happens?
As soon as the rice grains begin to appear, a baby water buffalo comes to eat them.
We chase it away and look after the plant, but as soon as more grains appear the baby water buffalo comes to eat them again, keeps on eating as soon as the grains begin to fill out.
If that's the case, how are we going to get any rice?
The strategies you'll need will grow from within the mind.
Whoever has discernment gains intuitive knowledge.
Whoever has intuitive knowledge gains discernment.
That's the way it is.
Are intuitive knowledge and discernment different from each other?
If you say they aren't, why are there two different words?
One is called intuitive knowledge; one is called discernment.
Can you have only intuitive knowledge?
No.
You need to have discernment, too.
Can you have only discernment?
No.
You need to have intuitive knowledge, too.
Whoever has discernment gains intuitive knowledge.
Whoever has intuitive knowledge gains discernment.
These things arise from your own experience.
You can't go looking for them in this book or that.
They arise in your own mind.
Don't be timid.
I once read in a Jataka tale about our Buddha when he was still a bodhisatta.
He was like you: He had ordained and encountered a lot of difficulties, but when he thought of disrobing he was ashamed of what other people would think — that he had ordained all these years and yet still wanted to disrobe.
Still, things didn't go the way he wanted, so he thought he'd leave.
He came across a squirrel whose baby had been blown into the ocean by the wind.
He saw the squirrel running down to the water and then back up again.
He didn't know what it was doing.
It ran down to the water and stuck its tail in the water, and then ran up to the beach and shook out its tail.
Then it ran down and stuck its tail in the water again.
So he asked it, “What are you doing?
“Oh, my baby has fallen into the water.
I miss it and I want to fetch it out.
“How are you going to do that?
“I'm going to use my tail to bail water out of the ocean until it's dry so that I can fetch my baby out.
“Oho.
When will the ocean ever go dry?
“That's not the issue.
This is the way it is with the practice.
You keep bailing out the water, bailing out the water, and don't care whether it ever goes dry.
When you're going to be a Buddha, you can't abandon your efforts.
When the bodhisatta heard this, it flashed in his heart.
He got up and pushed through with his efforts.
He didn't retreat.
That's how he became the Buddha.
It's the same with us.
Wherever things aren't going well, that's where they will go well.
You make them happen where they aren't yet happening.
Wherever you're deluded, that's where knowledge will arise.
If you don't believe me, spit right here.
That'll make it dirty.
But when you wipe it away, it'll be clean right here — right where it's dirty.
It won't become clean out there in the grounds of the monastery.
Keep coming back to the same place over and over again.
Ajahn Thongrat once said to me, “Chah, drill the hole right in line with the dowel.
That's all he said.
I had just started practicing and didn't understand what he was saying.
“If it comes low, jump over its head.” That's what he said.
“If it comes high, slip under it.
I didn't know what he was saying.
So I went off to meditate and kept contemplating it.
Actually, he was telling me how to solve my problems.
“Drill the hole right in line with the dowel” means, “Wherever the problem arises, contemplate right there; wherever you're deluded, contemplate right there.
If you're attached to a sight, contemplate the sight.
Right around right there.” That's what it means, “Drill the hole right in line with the dowel.” Don't go drilling far away.
Drill right there at the dowel.
It's the same as when we step on a thorn.
You take a needle and probe right there where the thorn is.
Don't go probing anywhere else.
Probe right where the thorn is stuck in your foot.
Even if it hurts, you have to endure it.
Keep probing all around it and then pry it out.
That's how you get the thorn out.
If the thorn is stuck in your foot, but you go probing around your rear, when will you ever be done with it?
So I contemplated this.
“Oh.
Teachers meditate in line with the language of their own minds.
They don't go groping around in the formulations in the books the way we do.
Their own formulations arise from reality.
So what comes low and what comes high?
“If it comes low, jump over its head.
If it comes high, slip under it.” I kept contemplating this.
Here he was talking about my moods and preoccupations.
Some of them come low; some of them come high.
You have to watch them to see how you can avoid them.
If they come low, jump over their heads.
If they come high, slip under them.
Do what you can so that they don't hit you.
This is the practice.
You contemplate right where you're deluded so that you'll know right there.
Any other issue is just duck shit and chicken shit.
You don't have to go groping after it.
That's how you have to take things on in meditation.
But actually, it's not a matter of taking.
You take them on by abandoning them.
This is how the suppositions of language have things all backwards.
You let things go.
You practice letting go.
You don't have to become a stream-winner or a once-returner.
You don't have to make those suppositions.
You don't have to be those things.
If you are anything, it's a turmoil.
If you are this or are that, you are a problem.
So you don't have to be anything.
There's nothing but letting go — letting go and then knowing in line with what things do.
When you know in line with what things do in every way, there's no more doubt.
And you aren't anything.
Think about it in a simple way.
If someone yells at you but you don't rear up in response, that's the end of the matter.
It doesn't reach you.
But if you grab hold of it and won't let go, you're in bad shape.
Why put their words into yourself?
If they yell at you, just leave it at that.
But if they yell at you over there in the ordination hall and you bring it into your ears while you're sitting here, it's as if you like to suffer.
This is called not understanding suffering.
You stir things up with your thinking and give rise to all kinds of issues.
The practice is actually something short, and not at all long.
If you say it's long, it's longer than long.
If you say it's short, it's shorter than short.
When it comes to the practice, you can't use your ordinary ways of thinking.
You need to have patience and endurance.
You need to make an effort.
Whatever happens, you don't have to pick it up and carry it around.
When things are a certain way, that's all they are.
When we see the Dhamma in this way, we don't hold onto anything.
Pleasure we know.
Pain we know.
The Buddha and his arahant disciples, when they gain awakening: It's not the case that coconut-milk sweets aren't sweet for them.
They're sweet in the same way they're sweet for us.
When the noble ones eat a sour tamarind, they squeeze their eyes shut just like us.
Do you understand?
Things are just the same way they were before, simply that noble ones don't hold onto them or get fixated on them.
If you argue with them that the tamarind is sour, they'll say, “Sour is fine.
Sweet is fine.
Neither sour nor sweet is fine.” That's what they'll say.
The same principle applies here.
When people come and say wrong things, we can hear them and it doesn't matter.
We just leave it at that.
If you can do this, then even though you're as old as you are now, you can be young.
You can get a lot younger.
You don't have to carry these things over your shoulder.
I've seen some old monks wandering dhutanga-style, but I don't know what they're going for.
They carry huge umbrella tents.
Old monks don't like small umbrella tents the way young monks do, you know.
They like to carry around big umbrella tents.
In the morning they fold up their umbrella tents.
As soon as the sun comes up, they fold up their tents.
They can't leave them up in the open fields to protect themselves from the wind, for the tents won't stand up to the wind.
So they fold up their tents and carry them off under the hot sun.
Then in the evening they put their umbrella tents up again.
I don't know why — there's no more sun.
They wake up the next day and fold up their tents and carry them off under the hot sun again.
I did this sort of thing until I got sick and tired of it.
I went wandering dhutanga-style but ended up suffering in the jungle.
Then I realized that it wasn't for the purpose of suffering in the jungle, so I kept finding my way out of the jungle.
That's why I became a find-your-way-out-of-the-jungle monk.
Actually, the reason why the Buddha taught us to go into the wilderness is for us to gain discernment.
You encounter suffering, you encounter reality, so that you can see and understand it, and eventually you get tired of the actions that cause it.
It's not that going into the wilderness isn't good.
It is good.
It gives rise to discernment.
Speaking of dhutanga, it's not a matter of slinging your bowl and umbrella tent over your shoulder, exposing yourself to the sun and wind until you're about to die, the way farmers go to sell water buffaloes in the Central Plains.
It's a matter of the practice.
You learn to be content with little.
You learn a sense of moderation in eating, a sense of moderation in sleep.
You get to grow thin, to make things shrink, make them shorter, gather them in well.
It's like casting a net for fish.
You gather one end firmly under your belt and then you gradually gather the net in, gather it in, gradually, gradually.
You tie off one end and then, when you've got your fish, you quickly tie off the other.
Tie up the fish behind the gills and you've got it.
You don't have to look elsewhere.
You don't have to read a lot of books.
Watch your own mind.
The basic principles lie right here.
This way you can meditate without getting deluded.
If people speak to you in a way that grates against your ears, that makes you mad, tell yourself, “It's not for sure.
It's inconstant.” If you eat something delicious and think, “Mmm.
It's really good,” remind yourself that it's not for sure.
Whatever comes your way, tell yourself, “It's not for sure.” Why?
Because that's where the Dhamma lies.
Gather things in, in the direction of the Buddha, the direction of inconstancy.
Inconstancy — that things aren't for sure: That's the Buddha on the level of the mind.
If you really see inconstancy, you see the Dhamma.
Why wouldn't you see it?
— for the truth lies right there.
If you see the Dhamma, you see the Buddha.
These things go in both directions.
If you see the Buddha, you see the Dhamma.
When you see in this way, you can live anywhere at all.
When you sit, the Buddha is giving you a sermon.
When you lie down, he's giving you a sermon.
Whatever you do, he's giving you a sermon.
The Dhamma arises and the Dhamma looks after those who practice it, so that they don't fall into the evil path.
When the Dhamma is in charge, the mind is always aware of things.
It knows that “This is wrong.
This is right.
This is good.
This is evil.
This is suffering.
This is the cause of suffering.
This is the disbanding of suffering.
This is the practice that reaches the disbanding of suffering.
That's the path.
Everything gathers into the path.
As you strengthen the path, your defilements decrease.
The defilements are like an army, you know.
If they increase, the path decreases.
If the path gets strengthened, the defilements gradually go away, go away.
Their strength decreases.
You stay only with what's right.
Whatever's wrong, you give it up, give it all up, and the wrong path peters out.
That's when the right path gets established, and you can live wherever you want.
Gaining is the same as losing; losing, the same as gaining.
There's no problem any more.
The mind is at peace — at peace through discernment.
When you see in this way, you're not fixated on this or that.
If someone brings you something to trade this for that, you're not interested.
You don't believe them.
That's when things are for sure.
Remember this point well.
It's like knowing fruits: This is an olive, this is a guava, this is a mango.
Once you know them, people can pour them all into a tray and someone can pick them up one by one and ask you what they are.
“What's this?
“A guava.
“What's this?
“An olive.
“What's this?
“A mango.
The person can keep doing this for a hundred trays of fruit, a thousand trays of fruit, and you won't be deceived by any of them.
You see a mango as a mango, a guava as a guava — whatever it is, you see it for what it is.
That's when things are for sure.
Nobody can deceive you.
You can't wander off the path, for everything in the mind is the right path.
When you're sitting, you have right view.
When you're walking, you have right view.
When you're lying down, you have right view.
The mind is all the same, always like it has been: at ease, at peace.
These sorts of things are hard to describe.
Pleasure isn't the highest level of Dhamma.
It's peace because it's no longer disturbed by pleasure or pain.
It's empty.
It stays unfixated, unattached.
Wherever you go, it keeps staying that way.
For instance, if somebody's mood comes to hit you — “You know, venerable father, you're just like a dog” — you stay at your ease.
Once you're sure of yourself, that's the way it is.
But if they call you a dog and you really become a dog, biting them, that shows you're not sure of yourself.
You're not for sure.
Once you're for sure, you're not anything.
Why would you want to be anything?
Venerable Father Sii, Venerable Father Saa, Venerable Father Maa: It's not the case that you've had these names all along.
They were given to you not all that long ago.
Like that eight-precept man over there: Where did he come from?
Was he born with a label affixed to him?
His parents gave him a name just a little while ago.
If they call you a person, what's there to get so happy about?
If they call you a dog, what's there to get so upset about?
Isn't that a sign you're already in sad shape?
So we keep on contemplating, keep on looking, until we keep on getting it right, getting it right.
You get it right while you're sitting down, right while you're lying down.
Whatever you do, it's right.
It keeps on staying right.
But if you start arguing about the Dhamma, you can't escape suffering.
It's like the piece of iron that's red-hot all over.
It doesn't have any cool spot.
If you touch it on top, it's hot.
If you touch it underneath, it's hot.
If you touch it on the sides, it's hot.
Why is it hot?
Because the whole thing is a piece of red-hot iron.
Where would it be cool?
It's the same here.
Once you latch onto anything — whatever it is — you're immediately wrong.
Everything is wrong, everything is suffering.
If you latch onto what's evil, you suffer.
If you latch onto what's good, you suffer.
For the most part, the good things are what lead people to be very deluded.
They're deluded by what's good.
When good isn't just right, it's not good, you know.
Have you noticed the rainfall this year?
It was so good that it went past just right, flooding people's houses.
This is what happens when good goes past just right.
The Buddha taught us to be intelligent.
“If it comes high, slip under it.
“If it comes low, jump over its head.
“Drill the hole right in line with the dowel.
Take these three principles with you.
Focus right there, and the problem won't get away from you.
This is the genuine truth.
This is what it's like.
Don't focus on whether you're old or young, or how many days and nights have passed, or which day of the week it is.
Just keep working on your mind in this way.
In practicing, don't think that you have to sit in order for it to be meditation, that you have to walk back and forth in order for it to be meditation.
Don't think like that.
Meditation is simply a matter of practice.
Whether you're giving a sermon, sitting here listening, or going away from here, keep up the practice in your heart.
Be alert to what's proper and what's not.
Don't decide that it's okay to observe the dhutanga practices during the Rains retreat and then drop them when the retreat is over.
It's not okay.
Things don't balance out in that way.
It's like clearing a field.
We keep cutting away, cutting away, and then stop to rest when we're tired.
We put away our hoe and then come back a month or two later.
The weeds are now all taller than the stumps.
If we try to clear away the area we cleared away before, it's too much for us.
Ajaan Mun once said that we have to make our practice the shape of a circle.
A circle never comes to an end.
Keep it going continually.
Keep the practice going continually without stop.
I listened to him and I thought, “When I've finished listening to this talk, what should I do?
The answer is to make your alertness akaliko: timeless.
Make sure that the mind knows and sees what's proper and what's not, at all times.
It's like the water in this kettle.
If you tilt it so that there's a long time between the drops — glug… glug — those are called water drops.
If you tilt it a little further, the drops become more frequent: glug-glug-glug.
If you tilt it a little bit further, the water flows in a stream.
What does the stream of water stream come from?
It comes from the drops of water.
If they're not continuous, they're called drops of water.
The water here is like our awareness.
If you accelerate your efforts, if your awareness is continuous, your mindfulness will become full.
Both by day and by night, it'll keep staying full like that.
It becomes a stream of water.
As we're taught, the noble ones have continuous mindfulness.
The water is a stream of water.
Make your awareness continuous.
Whenever there's anything wrong or lacking in any way, you'll know immediately.
Your awareness will be a circle, all around.
That's the shape of the practice.
It's not that you have to drive yourself really hard.
Some people get really earnest when they sit in concentration: “Let my blood drain away, let my skin split open, if I don't gain awakening I'm willing to die.” They've read that in the biography of the Buddha, but when it comes to them, the body starts pulsating in pain all the way up to the base of the skull.
Their determination gradually deflates, until they finally open their eyes to look at the incense stick burning in front of them.
“Gosh, I thought it'd be almost burned out, but there's still a lot left!
So they take a deep breath and make the determination that as long as the incense stick hasn't burned all the way out, they won't open their eyes no matter what.
But after a while the pain gets really heavy and dull at the base of the skull, so they open their eyes.
“Gosh, I thought it'd be all burned out, but there's still a lot left!
Eventually, they give up even before the incense has burned out.
Later they sit and think, “I'm really a sad case.” They don't know who to get mad at, so they get mad at themselves.
“I'm not true to my word.” They curse themselves.
“There's no hope for me.
I'm making a lot of bad kamma.
I'm a denizen of hell.” All kinds of things.
“Why should I stay on as a monk if I can't even do this?
All my bad kamma is going to eat up my head.” They've given themselves a reason to jump ship.
“Wouldn't it be better to live as a layperson and observe the five precepts?” They think to themselves and don't tell anyone else.
The more they think, the more convinced they are.
Why should we set goals for ourselves like that?
The Buddha taught that when we meditate, we should have a sense of ourselves.
Like merchants when they put merchandise into their carts: They have a sense of what they're doing — how many oxen they have, how big and strong the oxen are, how big their carts are.
They know that sort of thing: how many sacks of rice they can put in each cart.
They know how much to put in, in line with the strength of their oxen and the strength of their carts.
When you practice, it has to be in line with your own strength.
Here you have a single cart and your ox is the size of your fist, and yet you want the cart to carry as much as a ten-wheeled truck.
You see ten-wheeled trucks passing you on the road and you want to be like them.
But you're not a ten-wheeled truck.
You're just a cart.
It's sure to break down.
You're what's called a fruit that's ripe even before it's half-ripe, food that's burned even before it's cooked.
So in the end those earnest meditators end up disrobing.
After they've disrobed, they start thinking again.
“You know, back when I was ordained things were going a lot better than they are now.
Maybe I should ordain again.
That path was a lot brighter.
It wasn't as dark as this.” After they think about it for a while, they ordain again.
Make a fresh start.
At first they look like they're going to do well, like a new boxer who doesn't yet need water.
Their strength is good, they're diligent, they make good progress.
But then they gradually grow weaker, weaker.
“It looks like I'm going to fail again.
This is my second time around and still it looks like I won't make it.
If I stay in the robes, I'm going to break down even more.
I'd better disrobe.
I'm not going to get anywhere.
Some of the Buddha's disciples ordained and disrobed up to seven times.” They're now taking those who ordained and disrobed seven times as their model.
Don't take their bad example as your model.
“They had to wait until their seventh time before they gained awakening.
Maybe if I give it my all seven times I'll gain awakening like them.” They keep on talking nonsense.
There's nothing in the Dhamma taught by the Buddha that lies beyond human capabilities.
Don't go focusing on things you can't see: heaven or nibbana up there in the sky.
All the Dhammas we need to know and see, the Buddha explained in full.
As for things you can't see, don't pay them any mind.
Don't pay them any attention.
Look instead at the present.
How are you leading your life?
If suffering arises, why is there suffering?
What's going on?
How can you settle the problem right there?
What are you stuck on?
It's attachment and fixation.
You grasp at the idea that you're better than other people, or equal to other people, or worse than other people.
All kinds of things.
When you live with other people, you get disgusted with them.
“This person is acting badly.
That person is acting badly.” You go off to live by yourself and don't know who to get disgusted with, so you end up disgusted with yourself.
Just like you said.
The clarion call of our present age is, without doubt, the call for freedom.
Perhaps at no time in the past history of mankind so much as at present has the cry for freedom sounded so widely and so urgently, perhaps never before has it penetrated so deeply into the fabric of human existence.
In response to man's quest for freedom, far-reaching changes have been wrought in almost every sphere of his activity — political, social, cultural and religious.
The vast empires which once sprawled over the earth, engulfing like huge mythical sea-monsters the continents in their grasp, have crumbled away and disintegrated, as the peoples over whom they reigned have risen up to repossess their native lands — in the name of independence, liberty and self-rule.
Old political forms such as monarchy and oligarchy have given way to democracy — government by the people — because every man demands the right to contribute his voice to the direction of his collective life.
Long-standing social institutions which kept man enthralled since before the dawn of history — slavery, serfdom, the caste-system — have now disappeared, or are rapidly disappearing, while accounts of liberation movements of one sort or another daily deck the headlines of our newspapers and crowd the pages of our popular journals.
The arts, too, bear testimony to this quest for greater freedom: free verse in poetry, abstract expression in painting, and atonal composition in music, are just a few of the innovations which have toppled restrictive traditional structures to give the artist open space in his drive for self-expression.
Even religion has not been able to claim immunity from this expanding frontier of liberation.
No longer can systems of belief and codes of conduct justify themselves, as in the past, on the grounds that they are commanded by God, sanctified by scripture, or prescribed by the priesthood.
They must now be prepared to stand out in the open, shorn of their veils of sanctity, exposed to the critical thrust of the contemporary thinker who assumes himself the right to free inquiry and takes his own reason and experience for his court of final appeal.
Freedom of speech, freedom of the press, and freedom of action have become the watchwords of our public life, freedom of thought and freedom of conscience the watchwords of our private life.
In any form in which it obtains, freedom is guarded as our most precious possession, more valuable than life itself.
“Give me liberty or give me death,” an American patriot exclaimed two hundred years ago.
The succeeding centuries have echoed his demand.
As though in response to mankind's call for wider frontiers of freedom, the Buddha offers to the world His Teaching, the Dhamma, as a pathway to liberation as applicable today as it was when first proclaimed twenty-five centuries ago.
“Just as in the great ocean there is but one taste — the taste of salt — so in this Doctrine and Discipline there is but one taste — the taste of freedom”: with these words the Buddha vouches for the emancipating quality of His doctrine.
Whether one samples water taken from the surface of the ocean, or from its middling region, or from its depths, the taste of the water is in every case the same — the taste of salt.
And again, whether one drinks but a thimble-full of ocean water, or a glass-full, or a bucket-full, the same salty taste is present throughout.
Analogously with the Buddha's Teaching, a single flavor — the flavor of freedom — pervades the entire Doctrine and Discipline, from its beginning to its end, from its gentle surface to its unfathomable depths.
Whether one samples the Dhamma at its more elementary level — in the practice of generosity and moral discipline, in acts of devotion and piety, in conduct governed by reverence, courtesy, and loving-kindness; or at its intermediate level — in the taintless supramundane knowledge and deliverance realized by the liberated saint, in every case the taste is the same — the taste of freedom.
If one practices the Dhamma to a limited extent, leading a house-hold life in accordance with righteous principles, then one experiences in return a limited measure of freedom; if one practices the Dhamma to a fuller extent, going forth into the homeless state of monkhood, dwelling in seclusion adorned with the virtues of a recluse, contemplating the rise and fall of all conditioned things, then one experiences a fuller measure of freedom; and if one practices the Dhamma to its consummation, realising in this present life the goal of final deliverance, then one experiences a freedom that is measureless.
At every level the flavor of the Teaching is of a single nature, the flavor of freedom.
It is only the degree to which this flavor is enjoyed that differs, and the difference in degree is precisely proportional to the extent of one's practice.
Practice a little Dhamma and one reaps a little freedom, practice abundant Dhamma and one reaps abundant freedom.
The Dhamma brings its own reward of freedom, always with the exactness of scientific law.
Since the Dhamma proposes to provide a freedom as complete and perfect as any the modern world might envisage, a fundamental congruence appears to obtain between man's aspiration for expanding horizons of liberty and the possibilities he might realize through the practice of the Buddha's Teaching.
Nevertheless, despite this concordance of ends, when our contemporaries first encounter the Dhamma they often find themselves confronted at the outset by one particular feature which, clashing with their familiar modes of thought, strikes them intellectually as a contradiction and emotionally as a stumbling block.
This is the fact that while the Dhamma purports to be a pathway to liberation, a Teaching pervaded throughout by 'the taste of freedom,' it yet requires from its followers the practice of a regimen that seems the very antithesis of freedom — a regimen built upon discipline, restraint, and self-control.
“On the one hand we seek freedom,” our contemporaries object, “and on the other we are told that to reach this freedom our deeds, words, and thoughts must be curbed and controlled.” What are we to make of this astonishing thesis the Buddha's Teaching appears to advance: that to achieve freedom, freedom must be curtailed?
Can freedom as an end really be achieved by means that involve the very denial of freedom?
The solution to this seeming paradox lies in the distinction between two kinds of freedom — between freedom as license and freedom as spiritual autonomy.
Contemporary man, for the most part, identifies freedom with license.
For him, freedom means the license to pursue undisturbed his impulses, passions and whims.
To be free, he believes, he must be at liberty to do whatever he wants, to say whatever he wants and to think whatever he wants.
Every restriction laid upon this license he sees as an encroachment upon his freedom; hence a practical regimen calling for restraint of deed, word, and thought, for discipline and self-control, strikes him as a form of bondage.
But the freedom spoken of in the Buddha's Teaching is not the same as license.
The freedom to which the Buddha points is spiritual freedom — an inward autonomy of the mind which follows upon the destruction of the defilements, manifests itself in an emancipation from the mold of impulsive and compulsive patterns of behavior, and culminates in final deliverance from samsara, the round of repeated birth and death.
In contrast to license, spiritual freedom cannot be acquired by external means.
It can only be attained inwardly, through a course of training requiring the renunciation of passion and impulse in the interest of a higher end.
The spiritual autonomy that emerges from this struggle is the ultimate triumph over all confinement and self-limitation; but the victory can never be achieved without conforming to the requirements of the contest — requirements that include restraint, control, discipline and, as the final price, the surrender of self-assertive desire.
In order to bring this notion of freedom into clearer focus, let us approach it via its opposite condition, the state of bondage, and begin by considering a case of extreme physical confinement.
Suppose there is a man locked away in a prison, in a cell with dense stone walls and sturdy steel bars.
He is tied to a chair — his wrists bound together by rope behind his back, his feet locked in shackles, his eyes covered by a blindfold and his mouth by a gag.
Suppose that one day the rope is unfastened, the shackles loosened, the blindfold and gag removed.
Now the man is at liberty to move about the cell, to stretch his limbs, to speak, and to see.
But though at first he might imagine that he is free, it would not take him long to realize that true freedom is still as distant as the clear blue sky beyond the stoned and steel bars of his cell.
But suppose, next, that we release the man from prison, set him up as a middle-class householder, and restore to him his full body of rights as a citizen of the state.
Now he can enjoy the social and political freedom he lacked as a prisoner; he can vote, work, and travel as he likes, can even hold public office.
But there still remains — in the form of his responsibilities, his burden of duties, his limitations of power, pleasure, and prestige — a painful discrepancy between the freedom of mastery for which he might personally yearn, and the actuality of the situation which circumstances has doled out to him as his drearisome lot.
So let us, as a further step, lift our man up from this middle-class routine, and install him, to his pleasant surprise upon the throne of a world monarch, a universal emperor exercising sovereignty over all the earth.
Let us place him in a magnificent palace, surrounded by a hundred wives more beautiful than lotus-flowers, possessed of limitless resources of gold, land, and gems, endowed with the most sublime pleasures of the five senses.
All power is his, all enjoyment, fame, glory, and wealth.
He needs only express his will for it to be taken as command, need only utter a wish for it to be translated into deed.
No obstruction to his freedom of license remains.
But still the question stands: is he truly free?
Let us consider the issue at a deeper level.
Three kinds of feelings have been pointed out by the Buddha: pleasant feeling, painful feeling, and neutral feeling, i.e., feeling which is neither pleasant nor painful.
These three classes exhaust the totality of feeling, and one feeling of one class must be present on any given occasion of experience.
Again, three mental factors have been singled out by the Buddha as the subjective counterparts of the three classes of feeling and described by him as anusaya, latent tendencies which have been lying dormant in the subconscious mental continua of sentient beings since beginningless time, always ready to crop up into a state of manifestation when an appropriate stimulus is encountered, and to subside again into the state of dormancy when the impact of the stimulus has worn off.
These three mental factors are lust, repugnance, and ignorance, psychological equivalents of the unwholesome roots of greed, hatred, and delusion.
When a worldling, with a mind untrained in the higher course of mental discipline taught by the Buddha, experiences a pleasant feeling, then the latent tendency to lust springs up in response — a desire to possess and enjoy the object serving as stimulus for the pleasant feeling.
When a worldling experiences a painful feeling, then the latent tendency to repugnance comes into play, an aversion toward the cause of the pain.
And when a worldling experiences a neutral feeling, then the latent tendency to ignorance — present but recessive on occasions of lust and aversion — rises to prominence, shrouding the worldling's consciousness in a cloak of dull apathy.
On whatever occasion the three latent tendencies to lust, repugnance, and ignorance are provoked by their corresponding feelings from their dormant condition into a state of activity, if a man does not make an effort to dispel them, does not strive to restrain, remove, and abandon them and bring them to nought, then they will persist in consciousness.
If, as they persist in consciousness, he repeatedly yields to them, endorses them, and continues to cling to them, they will gather momentum, come to growth, and like a ball of flame flung upon a haystack, flare up from their initial phase as feeble impulses into powerful obsessions which usurp from a man his capacity for self-control.
Then, even if a man be, like our hypothetical subject, an emperor over the earth, he is inwardly no longer his own master but a servant at the bidding of his own defilements of mind.
Under the dominance of lust he is drawn to the pleasant, under the dominance of hate he is repelled by the painful, under the dominance of delusion he is confused by the neutral.
He is bent up by happiness, bent down by sorrow, elated by gain, honor, and praise, dejected by loss, dishonor, and blame.
Even though he perceives that a particular course of action can lead only to his harm, he is powerless to avoid it; even though he knows that an alternative course of action is clearly to his advantage, he is unable to pursue it.
Swept on by the current of unabandoned defilements, he is driven from existence to existence through the ocean of samsara, with its waves of birth and death, its whirlpools of misery and despair.
Outwardly, he may be a ruler over all the world, but in the court of consciousness he is still a prisoner.
In terms of license he may be completely free, but in terms of spiritual autonomy he remains a victim of bondage in its most desperate form: bondage to the workings of a defiled mind.
Spiritual freedom, as the opposite of this condition of bondage, must therefore mean freedom from lust, hatred, and delusion.
When lust, hatred, and delusion are abandoned in a man, cut off at the root so that they no longer remain even in latent form, then a man finds for himself a seat of autonomy from which he can never be dethroned, a position of mastery from which he can never be shaken.
Even though he be a mendicant gathering his alms from house to house, he is still a king; even though he be locked behind bars of steel, he is inwardly free.
He is now sovereign over his own mind, and as such over the whole universe; for nothing in the universe can take from him that deliverance of heart which is his inalienable possession.
He dwells in the world among the things of the world, yet stands in perfect poise above the world's ebb and flow.
If pleasant objects come within range of his perception he does not yearn for them, if painful objects come into range he does not recoil from them.
He looks upon both with equanimity and notes their rise and fall.
Toward the pairs of opposites which keep the world in rotation he is without concern, the cycle of attraction and repulsion he has broken at its base.
A lump of gold and a lump of clay are to his eyes the same; praise and scorn are to his ears empty sounds.
He abides in the freedom he has won through long and disciplined effort.
He is free from suffering, for with the defilements uprooted no more can sorrow or grief fall upon his heart; there remains only that perfect bliss unsullied by any trace of craving.
He is free from fear, from the chill of anxiety which even kings know in their palaces, protected by bodyguards inside and out.
And he is free from disease, from the sickness of the passions vexing and feverish that tie the mind in knots, from the sickness of samsara with its rounds of defilement, action, and result.
He passes his days in peace, pervading the world with a mind of boundless compassion, enjoying the bliss of emancipation, or teaching fellow way-farers the path he himself has followed to the goal, in the calm certain knowledge that for him the beginningless trail of repeated births and deaths has been brought to a close, that he has reached the pinnacle of holiness and effected the cessation of all future becoming.
In its fullness, the freedom to which the Buddha points as the goal of His Teaching can only be enjoyed by him who has made the realization of the goal a matter of his own living experience.
But just as salt lends its taste to whatever food it is used to season, so does the taste of freedom pervade the entire range of the Doctrine and Discipline proclaimed by the Buddha, its beginning, its middle, and its end.
Whatever our degree of progress may be in the practice of the Dhamma, to that extent may the taste of freedom be enjoyed.
It must always be borne in mind, however, that true freedom — the inward autonomy of the mind — does not descend as a gift of grace.
It can only be won by the practice of the path to freedom, the Noble Eightfold Path.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
These days people are going all over the place looking for merit.
And they always seem to stop over in Wat Ba Pong.
If they don't stop over on the way, they stop over on the return journey.
Wat Ba Pong has become a stop over point.
Some people are in such a hurry I don't even get a chance to see or speak to them.
Most of them are looking for merit.
I don't see many looking for a way out of wrongdoing.
They're so intent on getting merit they don't know where they're going to put it.
It's like trying to dye a dirty, unwashed cloth.
Monks talk straight like this, but it's hard for most people to put this sort of teaching into practice.
It's hard because they don't understand.
If they understood it would be much easier.
Suppose there was a hole, and there was something at the bottom of it.
Now anyone who put their hand into the hole and didn't reach the bottom would say the hole was too deep.
Out of a hundred or a thousand people putting their hands down that hole, they'd all say the hole was too deep.
Not one would say their arm was too short!
There are so many people looking for merit.
Sooner or later they'll have to start looking for a way out of wrongdoing.
But not many people are interested in this.
The teaching of the Buddha is so brief, but most people just pass it by, just like they pass through Wat Ba Pong.
For most people that's what the Dhamma is, a stop-over point.
Only three lines, hardly anything to it: Sabba papassa akaranam: refraining from all wrong doing.
That's the teaching of all Buddhas.
This is the heart of Buddhism.
But people keep jumping over it, they don't want this one.
The renunciation of all wrongdoing, great and small, from bodily, verbal and mental actions… this is the teaching of the Buddhas.
If we were to dye a piece of cloth we'd have to wash it first.
But most people don't do that.
Without looking at the cloth, they dip it into the dye straight away.
If the cloth is dirty, dying it makes it come out even worse than before.
Think about it.
Dying a dirty old rag, would that look good?
You see?
This is how Buddhism teaches, but most people just pass it by.
They just want to perform good works, but they don't want to give up wrongdoing.
It's just like saying “the hole is too deep.” Everybody says the hole is too deep, nobody says their arm is too short.
We have to come back to ourselves.
With this teaching you have to take a step back and look at yourself.
Sometimes they go looking for merit by the busload.
Maybe they even argue on the bus, or they're drunk.
Ask them where they're going and they say they're looking for merit.
They want merit but they don't give up vice.
They'll never find merit that way.
This is how people are.
You have to look closely, look at yourselves.
The Buddha taught about having recollection and self- awareness in all situations.
Wrongdoing arises in bodily, verbal and mental actions.
The source of all good, evil, weal and harm lies with actions, speech and thoughts.
Did you bring your actions, speech and thoughts with you today?
Or have you left them at home?
This is where you must look, right here.
You don't have to look very far away.
Look at your actions, speech and thoughts.
Look to see if your conduct is faulty or not.
People don't really look at these things.
Like the housewife washing the dishes with a scowl on her face.
She's so intent on cleaning the dishes, she doesn't realize her own mind's dirty!
Have you ever seen this?
She only sees the dishes.
She's looking too far away, isn't she?
Some of you have probably experienced this, I'd say.
This is where you have to look.
People concentrate on cleaning the dishes but they let their minds go dirty.
This is not good, they're forgetting themselves.
Because they don't see themselves people can commit all sorts of bad deeds.
They don't look at their own minds.
When people are going to do something bad they have to look around first to see if anyone is looking… “Will my mother see me?” “Will my husband see me?” “Will my children see me?” “Will my wife see me?” If there's no-one watching then they go right ahead and do it.
This is insulting themselves.
They say no-one is watching, so they quickly finish the job before anyone will see.
And what about themselves?
Aren't they a “somebody”?
You see?
Because they overlook themselves like this, people never find what is of real value, they don't find the Dhamma.
If you look at yourselves you will see yourselves.
Whenever you are about to do something bad, if you see yourself in time you can stop.
If you want to do something worthwhile then look at your mind.
If you know how to look at yourself then you'll know about right and wrong, harm and benefit, vice and virtue.
These are the things we should know about.
If I don't talk of these things you won't know about them.
You have greed and delusion in the mind but don't know it.
You won't know anything if you are always looking outside.
This is the trouble with people not looking at themselves.
Looking inwards you will see good and evil.
Seeing goodness, we can take it to heart and practice accordingly.
Giving up the bad, practicing the good… this is the heart of Buddhism.
Sabba papassa akaranam — Not committing any wrongdoing, either through body, speech or mind.
That's the right practice, the teaching of the Buddhas.
Now “our cloth” is clean.
Then we have kusalassupasampada — making the mind virtuous and skillful.
If the mind is virtuous and skillful we don't have to take a bus all over the countryside looking for merit.
Even sitting at home we can attain to merit.
But most people just go looking for merit all over the countryside without giving up their vices.
When they return home it's empty-handed they go, back to their old sour faces.
There they are washing the dishes with a sour face, so intent on cleaning the dishes.
This is where people don't look, they're far away from merit.
We may know of these things, but we don't really know if we don't know within our own minds.
Buddhism doesn't enter our heart.
If our mind is good and virtuous it is happy.
There's a smile in our heart.
But most of us can hardly find time to smile, can we?
We can only manage to smile when things go our way.
Most people's happiness depends on having things go to their liking.
They have to have everybody in the world say only pleasant things.
Is that how you find happiness?
Is it possible to have everybody in the world say only pleasant things?
If that's how it is when will you ever find happiness?
We must use Dhamma to find happiness.
Whatever it may be, whether right or wrong, don't blindly cling to it.
Just notice it then lay it down.
When the mind is at ease then you can smile.
The minute you become averse to something the mind goes bad.
Then nothing is good at all.
Sacittapariyodapanam: Having cleared away impurities the mind is free of worries… peaceful, kind and virtuous.
When the mind is radiant and has given up evil, there is ease at all times.
The serene and peaceful mind is the true epitome of human achievement.
When others say things to our liking, we smile.
If they say things that displease us we frown.
How can we ever get others to say things only to our liking every single day?
Is it possible?
Even your own children… have they ever said things that displease you?
Have you ever upset your parents?
Not only other people, but even our own minds can upset us.
Sometimes the things we ourselves think of are not pleasant.
What can you do?
You might be walking along and suddenly kick a tree stump… Thud!… “Ouch!”… Where's the problem?
Who kicked who anyway?
Who are you going to blame?
It's your own fault.
Even our own mind can be displeasing to us.
If you think about it, you'll see that this is true.
Sometimes we do things that even we don't like.
All you can say is “Damn!”, there's no-one else to blame.
Merit or boon in Buddhism is giving up that which is wrong.
When we abandon wrongness then we are no longer wrong.
When there is no stress there is calm.
The calm mind is a clean mind, one which harbors no angry thoughts, which is clear.
How can you make the mind clear?
Just by knowing it.
For example, you might think, “Today I'm in a really bad mood, everything I look at offends me, even the plates in the cupboard.” You might feel like smashing them up, every single one of them.
Whatever you look at looks bad, the chickens, the ducks, the cats and dogs… you hate them all.
Everything your husband says is offensive.
Even looking into your own mind you aren't satisfied.
What can you do in such a situation?
Where does this suffering come from?
This is called “having no merit.” These days in Thailand they have a saying that when someone dies his merit is finished.
But that's not the case.
There are plenty of people still alive who've finished their merit already… those people who don't know merit.
The bad mind just collects more and more badness.
Going on these merit-making tours is like building a beautiful house without preparing the area beforehand.
In no long time the house will collapse, won't it?
The design was no good.
Now you have to try again, try a different way.
You have to look into yourself, looking at the faults in your actions, speech and thoughts.
Where else are you going to practice, other than at your actions, speech and thoughts?
People get lost.
They want to go and practice Dhamma where it's really peaceful, in the forest or at Wat Ba Pong.
Is Wat Ba Pong peaceful?
No, it's not really peaceful.
Where it's really peaceful is in your own home.
If you have wisdom wherever you go you will be carefree.
The whole world is already just fine as it is.
All the trees in the forest are already just fine as they are: there are tall ones, short ones, hollow ones… all kinds.
They are simply the way they are.
Through ignorance of their true nature we go and enforce our opinions onto them… “Oh, this tree is too short!
This tree is hollow!” Those trees are simply trees, they're better off than we are.
That's why I've had these little poems written up in the trees here.
Let the trees teach you.
Have you learned anything from them yet?
You should try to learn at least one thing from them.
There are so many trees, all with something to teach you.
Dhamma is everywhere, in everything in Nature.
You should understand this point.
Don't go blaming the hole for being too deep… turn around and look at your own arm!
If you can see this you will be happy.
If you make the merit or virtue, preserve it in your mind.
that's the best place to keep it.
Making merit as you have done today is good, but it's not the best way.
Constructing buildings is good, but it's not the best thing.
Building your own mind into something good is the best way.
This way you will find goodness whether you come here or stay at home.
Find this excellence within your mind.
Outer structures like this hall here are just like the “bark” of the “tree,” they're not the “heartwood.
If you have wisdom, wherever you look there will be Dhamma.
If you lack wisdom, then even the good things turn bad.
Where does this badness come from?
Just from our own minds, that's where.
Look how this mind changes.
Everything changes.
Husband and wife used to get on all right together, they could talk to each other quite happily.
But there comes a day when their mood goes bad, everything the spouse says seems offensive.
The mind has gone bad, it's changed again.
This is how it is.
So in order to give up evil and cultivate the good you don't have to go looking anywhere else.
If your mind has gone bad, don't go looking over at this person and that person.
Just look at your own mind and find out where these thoughts come from.
Why does the mind think such things?
Understand that all things are transient.
Love is transient, hate is transient.
Have you ever loved your children?
Of course you have.
Have you ever hated them?
I'll answer that for you, too… Sometimes you do, don't you?
Can you throw them away?
No, you can't throw them away.
Why not?
Children aren't like bullets, are they?
Bullets are fired outwards, but children are fired right back to the parents.
If they're bad it comes back to the parents.
You could say children are your kamma.
There are good ones and bad ones.
Both good and bad are right there in your children.
But even the bad ones are precious.
One may be born with polio, crippled and deformed, and be even more precious than the others.
Whenever you leave home for a while you have to leave a message, “Look after the little one, he's not so strong.” You love him even more than the others.
You should, then, set your minds well — half love, half hate.
Don't take only one or the other, always have both sides in mind.
Your children are your kamma, they are appropriate to their owners.
They are your kamma, so you must take responsibility for them.
If they really give you suffering, just remind yourself, “It's my kamma.” If they please you, just remind yourself, “It's my kamma.” Sometimes it gets so frustrating at home you must just want to run away.
It gets so bad some people even contemplate hanging themselves!
It's kamma.
We have to accept the fact.
Avoid bad actions, then you will be able to see yourself more clearly.
This is why contemplating things is so important.
usually when they practice meditation they use a meditation object, such as Bud-dho, Dham-mo or Sang-gho.
But you can make it even shorter than this.
Whenever you feel annoyed, whenever your mind goes bad, just say “So!” When you feel better just say “So!… It's not a sure thing.” If you love someone, just say “So!” When you feel you're getting angry, just say “So!” Do you understand?
You don't have to go looking into the Tipitaka.
Just “So!” This means “it's transient.” Love is transient, hate is transient, good is transient, evil is transient.
How could they be permanent?
Where is there any permanence in them?
You could say that they are permanent insofar as they are invariably impermanent.
They are certain in this respect, they never become otherwise.
One minute there's love, the next hate.
That's how things are.
In this sense they are permanent.
That's why I say whenever love arises, just tell it “So!” It saves a lot of time.
You don't have to say “Aniccam, dukkham, anatta.” If you don't want a long meditation theme, just take this simple word… If love arises, before you get really lost in it, just tell yourself “So!” This is enough.
Everything is transient, and it's permanent in that it's invariably that way.
Just to see this much is to see the heart of the Dhamma, the True Dhamma.
Now if everybody said “So!” more often, and applied themselves to training like this, clinging would become less and less.
People would not be so stuck on love and hate.
They would not cling to things.
They would put their trust in the truth, not with other things.
Just to know this much is enough, what else do you need to know?
Having heard the teaching, you should try to remember it also.
What should you remember?
Meditate… Do you understand?
If you understand, the Dhamma clicks with you, the mind will stop.
If there is anger in the mind, just “So!”… and that's enough, it stops straight away.
If you don't yet understand then look deeply into the matter.
If there is understanding, when anger arises in the mind you can just shut it off with “So!
It's impermanent!
Today you have had a chance to record the Dhamma both inwardly and outwardly.
Inwardly, the sound enters through the ears to be recorded in the mind.
If you can't do this much it's not so good, your time at Wat Ba Pong will be wasted.
Record it outwardly, and record it inwardly.
This tape recorder here is not so important.
The really important thing is the “recorder” in the mind.
The tape recorder is perishable, but if the Dhamma really reaches the mind it's imperishable, it's there for good.
And you don't have to waste money on batteries.
This Rains Retreat I don't have much strength, I'm not well, so I've come up to this mountain here to get some fresh air.
People come to visit but I can't really receive them like I used to because my voice is just about had it, my breath is just about gone.
You can count it a blessing that there is still this body sitting here for you all to see now.
This is a blessing in itself.
Soon you won't see it.
The breath will be finished, the voice will be gone.
They will fare in accordance with supporting factors, like all compounded things.
The Lord Buddha called it khaya vayam, the decline and dissolution of all conditioned phenomena.
How do they decline?
Consider a lump of ice.
Originally it was simply water… they freeze it and it becomes ice.
But it doesn't take long before it's melted.
Take a big lump of ice, say as big as this tape recorder here, and leave it out in the sun.
You can see how it declines, much the same as the body.
It will gradually disintegrate.
In not many hours or minutes all that's left is a puddle of water.
This is called khaya vayam, the decline and dissolution of all compounded things.
It's been this way for a long time now, ever since the beginning of time.
When we are born we bring this inherent nature into the world with us, we can't avoid it.
At birth we bring old age, sickness and death along with us.
So this is why the Buddha said khaya vayam, the decline and dissolution of all compounded things.
All of us sitting here in this hall now, monks, novices, laymen and laywomen, are without exception “lumps of deterioration.” Right now the lump is hard, just like the lump of ice.
It starts out as water, becomes ice for a while and then melts again.
Can you see this decline in yourself?
Look at this body.
It's aging every day… hair is aging, nails are aging… everything is aging!
You weren't like this before, were you?
You were probably much smaller than this.
Now you've grown up and matured.
From now on you will decline, following the way of nature.
The body declines just like the lump of ice.
Soon, just like the lump of ice, it's all gone.
All bodies are composed of the four elements of earth, water, wind and fire.
A body is the confluence of earth, water, wind, and fire, which we proceed to call a person.
Originally it's hard to say what you could call it, but now we call it a “person.” We get infatuated with it, saying it's a male, a female, giving it names, Mr., Mrs., and so on, so that we can identify each other more easily.
But actually there isn't anybody there.
There's earth, water, wind and fire.
When they come together in this known form we call the result a “person.” Now don't get excited over it.
If you really look into it there isn't anyone there.
That which is solid in the body, the flesh, skin, bones and so on, are called the earth element.
Those aspects of the body which are liquid are the water element.
The faculty of warmth in the body is the fire element, while the winds coursing through the body are the wind element.
At Wat Ba Pong we have a body which is neither male or female.
It's the skeleton hanging in the main hall.
Looking at it you don't get the feeling that it's a man or a woman.
People ask each other whether it's a man or a woman and all they can do is look blankly at each other.
It's only a skeleton, all the skin and flesh are gone.
People are ignorant of these things.
Some go to Wat Ba Pong, into the main hall, see the skeletons… and then come running right out again!
They can't bear to look.
They're afraid, afraid of the skeletons.
I figure these people have never seen themselves before.
Afraid of the skeletons… they don't reflect on the great value of a skeleton.
To get to the monastery they had to ride in a car or walk… if they didn't have bones how would they be?
Would they be able to walk about like that?
But they ride their cars to Wat Ba Pong, go into the main hall, see the skeletons and run straight back out again!
They've never seen such a thing before.
They're born with it and yet they've never seen it.
It's very fortunate that they have a chance to see it now.
Even older people see the skeletons and get scared… What's all the fuss about?
This shows that they're not at all in touch with themselves, they don't really know themselves.
Maybe they go home and still can't sleep for three or four days… and yet they're sleeping with a skeleton!
They get dressed with it, eat food with it, do everything with it… and yet they're scared of it.
This shows how out of touch people are with themselves.
How pitiful!
They're always looking outwards, at trees, at other people, at external objects, saying “this one is big,” “that's small,” “that's short,” “that's long.” They're so busy looking at other things they never see themselves.
To be honest, people are really pitiful.
They have no refuge.
In the ordination ceremonies the ordinees must learn the five basic meditation themes: kesa, head hair; loma, body hair; nakha, nails; danta, teeth; taco, skin.
Some of the students and educated people snigger to themselves when they hear this part of the ordination ceremony… “What's the Ajahn trying to teach us here?
Teaching us about hair when we've had it for ages.
He doesn't have to teach us about this, we know it already.
Why bother teaching us something we already know?” Dim people are like this, they think they can see the hair already.
I tell them that when I say to “see the hair” I mean to see it as it really is.
See body hair as it really is, see nails, teeth and skin as they really are.
That's what I call “seeing” — not seeing in a superficial way, but seeing in accordance with the truth.
We wouldn't be so sunk up to the ears in things if we could see things as they really are.
Hair, nails, teeth, skin… what are they really like?
Are they pretty?
Are they clean?
Do they have any real substance?
Are they stable?
No… there's nothing to them.
They're not pretty but we imagine them to be so.
They're not substantial but we imagine them to be so.
Hair, nails, teeth, skin… people are really hooked on these things.
The Buddha established these things as the basic themes for meditation, he taught us to know these things.
They are Transient, Imperfect and Ownerless; they are not “me” or “them.” We are born with and deluded by these things, but really they are foul.
Suppose we didn't bathe for a week, could we bear to be close to each other?
We'd really smell bad.
When people sweat a lot, such as when a lot of people are working hard together, the smell is awful.
We go back home and rub ourselves down with soap and water and the smell abates somewhat, the fragrance of the soap replaces it.
Rubbing soap on the body may make it seem fragrant, but actually the bad smell of the body is still there, temporarily suppressed.
When the smell of the soap is gone the smell of the body comes back again.
Now we tend to think these bodies are pretty, delightful, long lasting and strong.
We tend to think that we will never age, get sick or die.
We are charmed and fooled by the body, and so we are ignorant of the true refuge within ourselves.
The true place of refuge is the mind.
The mind is our true refuge.
This hall here may be pretty big but it can't be a true refuge.
Pigeons take shelter here, geckos take shelter here, lizards take shelter here… We may think the hall belongs to us but it doesn't.
We live here together with everything else.
This is only a temporary shelter, soon we must leave it.
People take these shelters for refuge.
So the Buddha said to find your refuge.
That means to find your real heart.
This heart is very important.
People don't usually look at important things, they spend most of their time looking at unimportant things.
For example, when they do the house cleaning they may be bent on cleaning up the house, washing the dishes and so on, but they fail to notice their own hearts.
Their heart may be rotten, they may be feeling angry, washing the dishes with a sour expression on their face.
That their own hearts are not very clean they fail to see.
This is what I call “taking a temporary shelter for a refuge.” They beautify house and home but they don't think of beautifying their own hearts.
They don't examine suffering.
The heart is the important thing.
The Buddha taught to find a refuge within your own heart: Attahi attano natho — “Make yourself a refuge unto yourself.” Who else can be your refuge?
The true refuge is the heart, nothing else.
You may try to depend on other things but they aren't a sure thing.
You can only really depend on other things if you already have a refuge within yourself.
You must have your own refuge first before you can depend on anything else, be it a teacher, family, friends or relatives.
So all of you, both laypeople and homeless ones who have come to visit today, please consider this teaching.
Ask yourselves, “Who am I?
Why am I here?” Ask yourselves, “Why was I born?” Some people don't know.
They want to be happy but the suffering never stops.
Rich or poor, young or old, they suffer just the same.
It's all suffering.
And why?
Because they have no wisdom.
The poor are unhappy because they don't have enough, and the rich are unhappy because they have too much to look after.
In the past, as a young novice, I gave a Dhamma discourse.
I talked about the happiness of wealth and possessions, having servants and so on… A hundred male servants, a hundred female servants, a hundred elephants, a hundred cows, a hundred buffaloes… a hundred of everything!
The laypeople really lapped it up.
But can you imagine looking after a hundred buffaloes?
Or a hundred cows, a hundred male and female servants… can you imagine having to look after all of that?
Would that be fun?
People don't consider this side of things.
They have the desire to possess… to have the cows, the buffaloes, the servants… hundreds of them.
But I say fifty buffaloes would be too much.
Just twining the rope for all those brutes would be too much already!
But people don't consider this, they only think of the pleasure of acquiring.
They don't consider the trouble involved.
If we don't have wisdom everything round us will be a source of suffering.
If we are wise these things will lead us out of suffering.
Eyes, ears, nose, tongue, body and mind… Eyes aren't necessarily good things, you know.
If you are in a bad mood just seeing other people can make you angry and make you lose sleep.
Or you can fall in love with others.
Love is suffering, too, if you don't get what you want.
Love and hate are both suffering, because of desire.
Wanting is suffering, wanting not to have is suffering.
Wanting to acquire things… even if you get them it's still suffering because you're afraid you'll lose them.
There's only suffering.
How are you going to live with that?
You may have a large, luxurious house, but if your heart isn't good it never really works out as you expected.
Therefore, you should all take a look at yourselves.
Why were we born?
Do we ever really attain anything in this life?
In the countryside here people start planting rice right from childhood.
When they reach seventeen or eighteen they rush off and get married, afraid they won't have enough time to make their fortunes.
They start working from an early age thinking they'll get rich that way.
They plant rice until they're seventy or eighty or even ninety years old.
I ask them.
“From the day you were born you've been working.
Now it's almost time to go, what are you going to take with you?” They don't know what to say.
All they can say is, “Beats me!” We have a saying in these parts, “Don't tarry picking berries along the way… before you know it, night falls.” Just because of this “Beats me!” They're neither here nor there, content with just a “beats me”… sitting among the branches of the berry tree, gorging themselves with berries… “Beats me, beats me… When you're still young you think that being single is not so good, you feel a bit lonely.
So you find a partner to live with.
Put two together and there's friction!
Living alone is too quiet, but living with others there's friction.
When children are small the parents think, “When they get bigger we'll be better off.” They raise their children, three, four, or five of them, thinking that when the children are grown up their burden will be lighter.
But when the children grow up they get even heavier.
Like two pieces of wood, one big and one small.
You throw away the small one and take the bigger one, thinking it will be lighter, but of course it's not.
When children are small they don't bother you very much, just a ball of rice and a banana now and then.
When they grow up they want a motorcycle or a car!
Well, you love your children, you can't refuse.
So you try to give them what they want.
Problems… Sometimes the parents get into arguments over it… “Don't go and buy him a car, we haven't got enough money!” But when you love your children you've got to borrow the money from somewhere.
Maybe the parents even have to go without to get the things their children want.
Then there's education.
“When they've finished their studies, we'll be right.” There's no end to the studying!
What are they going to finish?
Only in the science of Buddhism is there a point of completion, all the other sciences just go round in circles.
In the end it's real headache.
If there's a house with four or five children in it the parents argue every day.
The suffering that is waiting in the future we fail to see, we think it will never happen.
When it happens, then we know.
that kind of suffering, the suffering inherent in our bodies, is hard to foresee.
When I was a child minding the buffaloes I'd take charcoal and rub it on my teeth to make them white.
I'd go back home and look in the mirror and see them so nice and white… I was getting fooled by my own bones, that's all.
When I reached fifty or sixty my teeth started to get loose.
When the teeth start falling out it hurts so much, when you eat it feels as if you've been kicked in the mouth.
It really hurts.
I've been through this one already.
So I just got the dentist to take them all out.
Now I've got false teeth.
My real teeth were giving me so much trouble I just had them all taken out, sixteen in one go.
The dentist was reluctant to take out sixteen teeth at once, but I said to him, “Just take them out, I'll take the consequences.” So he took them all out at once.
Some were still good, too, at least five of them.
Took them all out.
But it was really touch and go.
After having them out I couldn't eat any food for two or three days.
Before, as a young child minding the buffaloes, I used to think that polishing the teeth was a great thing to do.
I loved my teeth, I thought they were good things.
But in the end they had to go.
The pain almost killed me.
I suffered from toothache for months, years.
Sometimes both my gums were swollen at once.
Some of you may get a chance to experience this for yourselves someday.
If your teeth are still good and you're brushing them everyday to keep them nice and white… watch out!
They may start playing tricks with you later on.
Now I'm just letting you know about these things… the suffering that arises from within, that arises within our own bodies.
There's nothing within the body you can depend on.
It's not too bad when you're still young, but as you get older things begin to break down.
Everything begins to fall apart.
Conditions go their natural way.
Whether we laugh or cry over them they just go on their way.
It makes no difference how we live or die, makes no difference to them.
And there's no knowledge or science which can prevent this natural course of things.
You may get a dentist to look at your teeth, but even if he can fix them they still eventually go their natural way.
Eventually even the dentist has the same trouble.
Everything falls apart in the end.
These are things which we should contemplate while we still have some vigor, we should practice while we're young.
If you want to make merit then hurry up and do so, don't just leave it up to the oldies.
Most people just wait until they get old before they will go to a monastery and try to practice Dhamma.
Women and men say the same thing… “Wait till I get old first.” I don't know why they say that, does an old person have much vigor?
Let them try racing with a young person and see what the difference is.
Why do they leave it till they get old?
Just like they're never going to die.
When they get to fifty or sixty years old or more… “Hey, Grandma!
Let's go to the monastery!” “You go ahead, my ears aren't so good any more.” You see what I mean?
When her ears were good what was she listening to?
“Beats me!”… just dallying with the berries.
Finally when her ears are gone she goes to the temple.
It's hopeless.
She listens to the sermon but she hasn't got a clue what they're saying.
People wait till they're all used up before they'll think of practicing the Dhamma.
Today's talk may be useful for those of you who can understand it.
These are things which you should begin to observe, they are our inheritance.
They will gradually get heavier and heavier, a burden for each of us to bear.
In the past my legs were strong, I could run.
Now just walking around they feel heavy.
Before, my legs carried me.
Now, I have to carry them.
When I was a child I'd see old people getting up from their seat… “Oh!” Getting up they groan, “Oh!” There's always this “Oh!” But they don't know what it is that makes them groan like that.
Even when it gets to this extent people don't see the bane of the body.
You never know when you're going to be parted from it.
what's causing all the pain is simply conditions going about their natural way.
People call it arthritis, rheumatism, gout and so on, the doctor prescribes medicines, but it never completely heals.
In the end it falls apart, even the doctor!
This is conditions faring along their natural course.
This is their way, their nature.
Now take a look at this.
If you see it in advance you'll be better off, like seeing a poisonous snake on the path ahead of you.
If you see it there you can get out of its way and not get bitten.
If you don't see it you may keep on walking and step on it.
And then it bites.
If suffering arises people don't know what to do.
Where to go to treat it?
They want to avoid suffering, they want to be free of it but they don't know how to treat it when it arises.
And they live on like this until they get old… and sick… and die…
In olden times it was said that if someone was mortally ill one of the next of kin should whisper “Bud-dho, Bud-dho” in their ear.
What are they going to do with Buddho?
what good is Buddho going to be for them when they're almost on the funeral pyre?
Why didn't they learn Buddho when they were young and healthy?
Now with the breaths coming fitfully you go up and say, “Mother… Buddho, Buddho!” Why waste your time?
You'll only confuse her, let her go peacefully.
People don't know how to solve problems within their own hearts, they don't have a refuge.
They get angry easily and have a lot of desires.
Why is this?
Because they have no refuge.
When people are newly married they can get on together all right, but after age fifty or so they can't understand each other.
Whatever the wife says the husband finds intolerable.
Whatever the husband says the wife won't listen.
They turn their backs on each other.
Now I'm just talking because I've never had a family before.
Why haven't I had a family?
Just looking at this word “household” I knew what it was all about.
What is a “household”?
This is a “hold”: If somebody were to get some rope and tie us up while we were sitting here, what would that be like?
That's called “being held.” Whatever that's like, “being held” is like that.
There is a circle of confinement.
The man lives within his circle of confinement, and the woman lives within her circle of confinement.
When I read this word “household”… this is a heavy one.
This word is no trifling matter, it's a real killer.
The word “hold” is a symbol of suffering.
You can't go anywhere, you've got to stay within your circle of confinement.
Now we come to the word “house.” This means “that which hassles.” Have you ever toasted chilies?
The whole house chokes and sneezes.
This word “household” spells confusion, it's not worth the trouble.
Because of this word I was able to ordain and not disrobe.
“Household” is frightening.
You're stuck and can't go anywhere.
Problems with the children, with money and all the rest.
But where can you go?
You're tied down.
There are sons and daughters, arguments in profusion until your dying day, and there's nowhere else to go to no matter how much suffering it is.
The tears pour out and they keep pouring.
The tears will never be finished with his “household,” you know.
If there's no household you might be able to finish with the tears but not otherwise.
Consider this matter.
If you haven't come across it yet you may later on.
Some people have experienced it already to a certain extent.
Some are already at the end of their tether… “Will I stay or will I go?” At Wat Ba Pong there are about seventy or eighty huts.
when they're almost full I tell the monk in charge to keep a few empty, just in case somebody has an argument with their spouse… Sure enough, in no long time a lady will arrive with her bags… “I'm fed up with the world, Luang Por.” “Whoa!
Don't say that.
Those words are really heavy.” Then the husband comes and says he's fed up too.
After two or three days in the monastery their world-weariness disappears.
They say they're fed up but they're just fooling themselves.
When they go off to a kuti and sit in the quiet by themselves, after a while the thoughts come… “When's the wife going to come and ask me to go home?” They don't really know what's going on.
What is this “world-weariness” of theirs?
They get upset over something and come running to the monastery.
At home everything looked wrong… the husband was wrong, the wife was wrong… after three days' quiet thinking… “Hmmm, the wife was right after all, it was I who was wrong.” “Hubby was right, I shouldn't have got so upset.” They change sides.
This is how it is, that's why I don't take the world too seriously.
I know its ins and outs already, that's why I've chosen to live as a monk.
I would like to present today's talk to all of you for homework.
Whether you're in the fields or working in the city, take these words and consider them… “Why was I born?
What can I take with me?” Ask yourselves over and over.
If you ask yourself these questions often you'll become wise.
If you don't reflect on these things you will remain ignorant.
Listening to today's talk, you may get some understanding, if not now, then maybe when you get home.
Perhaps this evening.
When you're listening to the talk everything is subdued, but maybe things are waiting for you in the car.
When you get in the car it may get in with you.
When you get home it may all become clear… “Oh, that's what Luang Por meant.
I couldn't see it before.
I think that's enough for today.
If I talk too long this old body gets tired.
Now determine in your mind to listen respectfully to the Dhamma.
While I am speaking, be as attentive to my words as if it was the Lord Buddha himself sitting before you.
Close your eyes and make yourself comfortable, composing your mind and making it one-pointed.
Humbly allow the Triple Gem of wisdom, truth and purity to abide in your heart as a way of showing respect to the Fully Enlightened One.
Today I have brought nothing of material substance to offer you, only the Dhamma, the teachings of the Lord Buddha.
You should understand that even the Buddha himself, with his great store of accumulated virtue, could not avoid physical death.
When he reached old age he ceded his body and let go of the heavy burden.
Now you too must learn to be satisfied with the many years you've already depended on the body.
You should feel that it's enough.
Like household utensils that you've had for a long time — cups, saucers, plates and so on — when you first had them they were clean and shining, but now after using them for so long, they're starting to wear out.
Some are already broken, some have disappeared, and those that are left are wearing out, they have no stable form.
And it's their nature to be that way.
Your body is the same… it's been continually changing from the day you were born, through childhood and youth, until now it's reached old age.
You must accept this.
The Buddha said that conditions, whether internal, bodily conditions or external conditions, are not self, their nature is to change.
Contemplate this truth clearly.
This very lump of flesh lying here in decline is reality.
The facts of this body are reality, they are the timeless teaching of the Lord Buddha.
The Buddha taught us to contemplate this and come to terms with its nature.
We must be able to be at peace with the body, no matter what state it is in.
The Buddha taught that we should ensure that it's only the body that is locked up in jail and not the mind be imprisoned along with it.
Now as your body begins to run down and wear out with age, don't resist, but also don't let your mind deteriorate along with it.
Keep the mind separate.
Give energy to the mind by realizing the truth of the way things are.
The Lord Buddha taught that this is the nature of the body, it can't be any other way.
Having been born it gets old and sick and then it dies.
This is a great truth that you are presently witnessing.
Look at the body with wisdom and realize this.
If your house is flooded or burnt to the ground, whatever the threat to it, let it concern only the house.
If there's a flood, don't let it flood your mind.
If there's a fire, don't let it burn your heart.
Let it be merely the house, that which is outside of you, that is flooded or burned.
Now is the time to allow the mind to let go of attachments.
You've been alive a long time now.
Your eyes have seen any number of forms and colors, your ears have heard so many sounds, you've had any number of experiences.
And that's all they were — experiences.
You've eaten delicious foods, and all those goods tastes were just good tastes, nothing more.
The bad tastes were just bad tastes, that's all.
If the eye sees a beautiful form that's all it is… a beautiful form.
An ugly form is just an ugly form.
The ear hears an entrancing, melodious sound and it's nothing more than that.
A grating, discordant sound is simply that.
The Buddha said that rich or poor, young or old, human or animal, no being in this world can maintain itself in any single state for long.
Everything experiences change and deprivation.
this is a fact of life about which we can do nothing to remedy.
But the Buddha said that what we can do is to contemplate the body and mind to see their impersonality, that neither of them is “me” nor “mine.” They have only a provisional reality.
It's like this house, it's only nominally yours.
You couldn't take it with you anywhere.
The same applies to your wealth, your possessions and your family — they're yours only in name.
they don't really belong to you, they belong to nature.
Now this truth doesn't apply to you alone, everyone is in the same boat — even the Lord Buddha and his enlightened disciples.
They differed from us only in one respect, and that was their acceptance of the way things are.
They saw that it could be no other way.
So the Buddha taught us to probe and examine the body, from the soles of the feet up to the crown of the head, and then back down to the feet again.
Just take a look at the body.
What sort of things do you see?
Is there anything intrinsically clean there?
Can you find any abiding essence?
This whole body is steadily degenerating.
The Buddha taught us to see that it doesn't belong to us.
It's natural for the body to be this way, because all conditioned phenomena are subject to change.
How else would you have it?
In fact there is nothing wrong with the way the body is.
It's not the body that causes suffering, it's wrong thinking.
When you see things in the wrong way, there's bound to be confusion.
It's like the water of a river.
It naturally flows downhill, it never flows uphill.
That's it's nature.
If a person was to go and stand on the river bank and want the water to flow back uphill, he would be foolish.
Wherever he went his foolish thinking would allow him no peace of mind.
He would suffer because of his wrong view, his thinking against the stream.
If he had right view he would see that the water must inevitably flow downhill, and until he realized and accepted that fact he would be bewildered and frustrated.
The river that must flow down the gradient is like your body.
Having been young your body's become old and is meandering towards its death.
Don't go wishing it were otherwise, it's not something you have the power to remedy.
The Buddha told us to see the way things are and then let go of our clinging to them.
Take this feeling of letting go as your refuge.
Keep meditating even if you feel tired and exhausted.
Let your mind be with the breath.
Take a few deep breaths and then establish the attention on the breath, using the mantra word Bud-dho.
Make this practice continual.
The more exhausted you feel the more subtle and focused your concentration must be, so that you can cope with any painful sensations that arise.
When you start to feel fatigued then bring all your thinking to a halt, let the mind gather itself together and then turn to knowing the breath.
Just keep up the inner recitation, Bud-dho, Bud-dho.
Let go of all externals.
Don't go grasping at thoughts of your children and relatives, don't grasp at anything whatsoever.
Let go.
Let the mind unite in a single point and let that composed mind dwell with the breath.
Let the breath be its sole object of knowledge.
Concentrate until the mind becomes increasingly subtle, until feelings are insignificant and there is great inner clarity and wakefulness.
Then any painful sensations that arise will gradually cease of their own accord.
Finally you'll look on the breath as if it were some relatives come to visit you.
When the relatives leave, you follow them out to see them off.
You watch until they've walked up the drive and out of sight, and then you go back indoors.
We watch the breath in the same way.
If the breath is coarse we know that it's coarse, if it's subtle we know that it's subtle.
As it becomes increasingly fine we keep following it, the same time awakening the mind.
Eventually the breath disappears altogether and all that remains is that feeling of alertness.
This is called meeting the Buddha.
We have that clear, wakeful awareness called Bud-dho, the one who knows, the awakened one, the radiant one.
This is meeting and dwelling with the Buddha, with knowledge and clarity.
It was only the historical Buddha who passed away.
The true Buddha, the Buddha that is clear, radiant knowing, can still be experienced and attained today.
And if we do attain it, the heart is one.
So let go, put everything down, everything except the knowing.
Don't be fooled if visions or sounds arise in your mind during meditation.
Lay them all down.
Don't take hold of anything at all, just stay with this unified awareness.
Don't worry about the past or the future, just be still and you will reach the place where there's no advancing, no retreating and no stopping, where there's nothing to grasp at or cling to.
Why?
Because there's no self, no “me” or “mine.” It's all gone.
The Buddha taught to empty yourself of everything in this way, not to carry anything around… to know, and having known, let go.
Realizing the Dhamma, the path to freedom from the round of birth and death, is a task that we all have to do alone.
So keep trying to let go and understand the teachings.
Put effort into your contemplation.
Don't worry about your family.
At the moment they are as they are, in the future they will be like you.
There's no-one in the world who can escape this fate.
The Buddha taught to lay down those things that lack a real abiding essence.
If you lay everything down you will see the real truth, if you don't, you won't.
That's the way it is.
And it's the same for everyone in the world.
So don't grasp at anything.
Even if you find yourself thinking, well that's all right too, as long as you think wisely.
Don't think foolishly.
If you think of your children, think of them with wisdom, not with foolishness.
Whatever the mind turns to, think of it with wisdom, be aware of its nature.
To know something with wisdom is to let it go and have no suffering over it.
The mind is bright, joyful and at peace.
It turns away from distractions and is undivided.
Right now what you can look to for help and support is your breath.
This is your own work, no-one else's.
Leave others to do their own work.
You have your own duty and responsibility, you don't have to take on those of your family.
Don't take on anything else, let it all go.
This letting go will make your mind calm.
Your sole responsibility right now is to focus your mind and bring it to peace.
Leave everything else to the others.
Forms, sounds, odors, tastes… leave them to the others to attend to.
Put everything behind you and do your own work, fulfill your own responsibility.
Whatever arises in your mind, be it fear of pain, fear of death, anxiety about others or whatever, say to it, “Don't disturb me.
You're no longer any concern of mine.” Just keep this to yourself when you see those dhammas arise.
What does the word dhamma refer to?
Everything is a dhamma, there is nothing that is not a dhamma.
And what about “world”?
The world is the very mental state that is agitating you at the present moment.
“What are they going to do?
When I'm gone who will look after them?
How will they manage?” This is all just the “world.” Even the mere arising of a thought fearing death or pain is the world.
Throw the world away!
The world is the way it is.
If you allow it to dominate your mind it becomes obscured and can't see itself.
So whatever appears in the mind, just say, “This isn't my business.
It's impermanent, unsatisfactory and not self.
Thinking you'd like to go on living for a long time will make you suffer.
But thinking you'd like to die right away or very quickly isn't right either.
It's suffering, isn't it?
Conditions don't belong to us, they follow their own natural laws.
You can't do anything about the way the body is.
You can beautify it a little, make it attractive and clean for a while, like the young girls who paint their lips and let their nails grow long, but when old age arrives, everybody's in the same boat.
That's the way the body is, you can't make it any other way.
What you can improve and beautify is the mind.
Anyone can build a house of wood and bricks, but the Buddha taught that that sort of home is not our real home, it's only nominally ours.
It's home in the world and it follows the ways of the world.
Our real home is inner peace.
An external, material home may well be pretty but it is not very peaceful.
There's this worry and then that, this anxiety and then that.
So we say it's not our real home, it's external to us.
Sooner or later we'll have to give it up.
it's not a place we can live in permanently because it doesn't truly belong to us, it belongs to the world.
Our body is the same.
We take it to be a self, to be “me” or “mine,” but in fact it's not really so at all, it's another worldly home.
Your body has followed its natural course from birth, until now it's old and sick, and you can't forbid it from doing that.
That's the way it is.
Wanting it to be any different would be as foolish as wanting a duck to be like a chicken.
When you see that that's impossible — that a duck must be a duck and a chicken must be a chicken, and that the bodies have to get old and die — you will find courage and energy.
However much you want the body to go on lasting, it won't do that.
The Buddha said,
The word “sankhara” refers to this body and mind.
Sankharas are impermanent and unstable.
having come into being they disappear, having arisen they pass away, and yet everyone wants them to be permanent.
This is foolishness.
Look at the breath.
Once it's gone in, it goes out, that's its nature, that's how it has to be.
The inhalations and exhalations have to alternate, there must be change.
Conditions exist through change, you can't prevent it.
Just think, could you exhale without inhaling?
Would it feel good?
Or could you just inhale?
We want things to be permanent but they can't be, it's impossible.
Once the breath has come in, it must go out.
When it's gone out it comes back in again, and that's natural, isn't it?
Having been born we get old and then die, and that's totally natural and normal.
It's because conditions have done their job, because the in breaths and out breaths have alternated in this way, that the human race is still here today.
As soon as we are born we are dead.
Our birth and our death are just one thing.
It's like a tree: when there's a root there must be branches, when there are branches there must be a root.
You can't have one without the other.
It's a little funny to see how at death people are so grief stricken and distracted and at birth how happy and delighted.
It's delusion, nobody has ever looked at this clearly.
I think if you really want to cry it would be better to do so when someone's born.
Birth is death, death is birth; the branch is the root, the root is the branch.
If you must cry, cry at the root, cry at the birth.
Look closely: if there was no birth there would be no death.
Can you understand this?
Don't worry about things too much, just think “this is the way things are.” This is your work, your duty.
Right now nobody can help you, there's nothing that your family and possessions can do for you.
all that can help you now is clear awareness.
So don't waver.
Let go.
Throw it all away.
Even if you don't let go, everything is starting to leave you anyway.
Can you see that, how all the different parts of your body are trying to slip away?
Take your hair; when you were young it was thick and black.
Now it's falling out.
It's leaving.
Your eyes used to be good and strong but now they're weak, your sight is unclear.
When your organs have had enough they leave, this isn't their home.
When you were a child your teeth were healthy and firm, now they're wobbly, or you've got false ones.
Your eyes, ears, nose, tongue — everything is trying to leave because this isn't their home.
You can't make a permanent home in conditions, you can only stay for a short time and then you have to go.
It's like a tenant watching over his tiny little house with failing eyes.
His teeth aren't so good, his eyes aren't so good, his body's not so healthy, everything is leaving.
So you needn't worry about anything because this isn't your real home, it's only a temporary shelter.
Having come into this world you should contemplate its nature.
Everything there is is preparing to disappear.
Look at your body.
Is there anything there that's still in its original form?
Is your skin as it used to be?
Is your hair?
They aren't the same, are they?
Where has everything gone?
This is nature, the way things are.
When their time is up, conditions go their way.
In this world there is nothing to rely on — it's an endless round of disturbance and trouble, pleasure and pain.
There's no peace.
When we have no real home we're like aimless travelers out on the road, going here and there, stopping for a while and then setting off again.
Until we return to our real homes we feel uneasy, just like a villager who's left his village.
Only when he gets home can he really relax and be at peace.
Nowhere in the world is there any real peace to be found.
The poor have no peace and neither do the rich; adults have no peace and neither do the highly educated.
There's no peace anywhere, that's the nature of the world.
Those who have few possessions suffer, and so do those who have many.
Children, adults, old and young… everyone suffers.
The suffering of being old, the suffering of being young, the suffering of being wealthy and the suffering of being poor… it's all nothing but suffering.
When you've contemplated things in this way you'll see aniccam, impermanence, and dukkham, unsatisfactoriness.
Why are things impermanent and unsatisfactory?
Because they are anatta, not self.
Both your body that is lying sick and in pain, and the mind that is aware of its sickness and pain, are called dhamma.
That which is formless, the thoughts, feelings and perceptions, is called namadhamma.
That which is racked with aches and pains is called rupadhamma.
The material is dhamma and the immaterial is dhamma.
So we live with dhammas, in dhamma, and we are dhamma.
In truth there is no self to be found, there are only dhammas continually arising and passing away as is their nature.
Every single moment we're undergoing birth and death.
This is the way things are.
When we think of the Lord Buddha, how truly he spoke, we feel how worthy he is of reverence and respect.
Whenever we see the truth of something we see His teachings, even if we've never actually practiced the Dhamma.
But even if we have a knowledge of the teachings, have studied and practiced them, as long as we still haven't seen the truth we are still homeless.
So understand this point.
All people, all creatures, are preparing to leave.
When beings have lived an appropriate time they must go on their way.
Rich, poor, young and old must all experience this change.
When you realize that's the way the world is you'll feel that it's a wearisome place.
When you see that there's nothing real or substantial you can rely on you'll feel wearied and disenchanted.
Being disenchanted doesn't mean you are averse, the mind is clear.
It sees that there's nothing to be done to remedy this state of affairs, it's just the way the world is.
Knowing in this way you can let go of attachment, letting go with a mind that is neither happy nor sad, but at peace with conditions through seeing their changing nature with wisdom.
Anicca vata sankhara — all conditions are impermanent.
To put it simply, impermanence is the Buddha.
If we truly see an impermanent condition we'll see that it's permanent.
It's permanent in the sense that its subjection to change is unchanging.
This is the permanence that living beings possess.
There is continual transformation, from childhood through to old age, and that very impermanence, that propensity to change, is permanent and fixed.
If you look at it like this your heart will be at ease.
It's not just you who has to go through this, it's everyone.
When you consider things in this way you'll see them as wearisome, and disenchantment will arise.
Your delight in the world of sense pleasures will disappear.
You'll see that if you have many possessions you have to leave a lot behind.
If you have a few you leave few behind.
Wealth is just wealth, long life is just long life… they're nothing special.
What is important is that we should do as the Lord Buddha taught and build our own home, building it by the method that I've been explaining to you.
Build your own home.
Let go.
Let go until the mind reaches the peace that is free from advancing, free from retreating and free from stopping still.
Pleasure is not your home, pain is not your home.
Pleasure and pain both decline and pass away.
The Great Teacher saw that all conditions are impermanent and so He taught us to let go of our attachment to them.
When we reach the end of our life we'll have no choice anyway, we won't be able to take anything with us.
So wouldn't it be better to put things down before then?
They're just a heavy burden to carry around, why not throw off that load now?
Why bother to drag these things around?
Let go, relax, and let your family look after you.
Those who nurse the sick grow in goodness and virtue.
The patient who is giving others that opportunity shouldn't make things difficult for them.
If there's pain or some problem or other, let them know and keep the mind in a wholesome state.
One who is nursing parents should fill his or her mind with warmth and kindness and not get caught up in aversion.
This is the one time you can repay your debt to them.
From your birth through your childhood, as you've grown up, you've been dependent on your parents.
That you are here today is because your mother and father have helped you in so many ways.
You owe them an incredible debt of gratitude.
So today, all of you children and relatives gathered together here, observe how your mother has become your child.
Before you were her children, now she has become yours.
She has become older and older until she has become a child again.
Her memory goes, her eyes don't see well and her ears aren't so good.
Sometimes she garbles her words.
Don't let it upset you.
You who are nursing the sick must know how to go also.
Don't hold onto things, just let her have her own way.
When a young child is disobedient sometimes the parents let it have its own way just to keep the peace, just to make it happy.
Now your mother is just like that child.
Her memories and perceptions are confused.
Sometimes she muddles up your names, or asks you to bring a cup when she wants a plate.
It's normal, don't be upset by it.
Let the patient bear in mind the kindness of those who nurse and patiently endure the painful feelings.
Exert yourself mentally, don't let the mind become scattered and confused, and don't make things difficult for those looking after you.
Let those who are nursing fill their minds with virtue and kindness.
Don't be averse to the unattractive side of the job, cleaning up the mucous and phlegm, urine and excrement.
Try your best.
Everyone in the family give a hand.
She is the only mother you have.
She gave you life, she has been your teacher, your doctor and your nurse — she's been everything to you.
That she has brought you up, shared her wealth with you and made you her heir is the great goodness of parents.
That is why the Buddha taught the virtues of kataññu and katavedi, knowing our debt of gratitude and trying to repay it.
These two dhamma are complimentary.
If our parents are in need, unwell or in difficulty, then we do our best to help them.
This is kataññu-katavedi, the virtue that sustains the world.
It prevents families from breaking up, and makes them stable and harmonious.
Today I have brought you the gift of Dhamma in this time of illness.
I have no material things to offer you, there seem to be plenty of those in this house already.
And so I give you the Dhamma, something which has lasting worth, something which you'll never be able to exhaust.
Having received it you can pass it on to as many others as you like and it will never be depleted.
That is the nature of Truth.
I am happy to have been able to give you this gift of Dhamma and hope it will give you the strength to deal with your pain.
Today I have been invited by the abbot to give you a teaching, so I ask you all to sit quietly and compose your minds.
Due to the language barrier we must make use of a translator, so if you do not pay proper attention you may not understand.
My stay here has been very pleasant.
Both the Master and you, his followers, have been very kind, all friendly and smiling, as befits those who are practicing the true Dhamma.
Your property, too, is very inspiring, but so big!
I admire your dedication in renovating it to establish a place for practicing the Dhamma.
Having been a teacher for many years now, I've been through my share of difficulties.
At present there are altogether about forty branch monasteries of my monastery, Wat Nong Ba Pong, but even these days I have followers who are hard to teach.
Some know but don't bother to practice, some don't know and don't try to find out.
I don't know what to do with them.
Why do human beings have minds like this?
Being ignorant is not so good, but even when I tell them, they still don't listen.
I don't know what more I can do.
People are so full of doubts in their practice, they're always doubting.
They all want to go to nibbana, but they don't want to walk the path.
It's baffling.
When I tell them to meditate they're afraid, or if not afraid then just plain sleepy.
Mostly they like to do the things I don't teach.
When I met the Venerable Abbot here I asked him what his followers were like.
He said they're the same.
This is the pain of being a teacher.
The teaching I will present to you today is a way to solve problems in the present moment, in this present life.
Some people say that they have so much work to do they have no time to practice the Dhamma.
“What can we do?” they ask.
I ask them, “Don't you breathe while you're working?” “Yes, of course we breathe!” “So how come you have time to breathe when you're so busy?” They don't know what to answer.
“If you simply have sati while working you will have plenty of time to practice.
Practicing meditation is just like breathing.
While working we breathe, while sleeping we breathe, while sitting down we breathe… Why do we have time to breathe?
Because we see the importance of the breath, we can always find time to breathe.
In the same way, if we see the importance of meditation practice we will find the time to practice.
Have any of you ever suffered?… have you ever been happy?… Right here is the truth, this is where you must practice the Dhamma.
Who is it who is happy?
The mind is happy.
who suffers?
The mind suffers.
Wherever these things arise, that's where they cease.
Have you experienced happiness?… Have you experienced suffering?… this is our problem.
If we know suffering, the cause of suffering, the end of suffering and the way leading to the end of suffering we can solve the problem.
There are two kinds of suffering: ordinary suffering and the extraordinary kind.
Ordinary suffering is the suffering which is the inherent nature of conditions: standing is suffering, sitting is suffering, lying down is suffering.
This is the suffering that is inherent in all conditioned phenomena.
Even the Buddha experienced these things, he experienced comfort and pain, but he recognized them as conditions in nature.
He knew how to overcome these ordinary, natural feelings of comfort and pain through understanding their true nature.
Because he understood this “natural suffering” those feelings didn't upset him.
The important kind of suffering is the second kind, the suffering that creeps in from the outside, the “extraordinary suffering.” If we are sick we may have to get an injection from the doctor.
When the needle pierces the skin there is some pain which is only natural.
When the needle is withdrawn that pain disappears.
This is like the ordinary kind of suffering, it's no problem, everybody experiences it.
The extraordinary suffering is the suffering that arises from what we call upadana, grasping onto things.
This is like having an injection with a syringe filled with poison.
This is no longer an ordinary kind of pain, it is the pain which ends in death.
This is similar to the suffering which arises from grasping.
Wrong view, not knowing the impermanent nature of all conditioned things, is another kind of problem.
Conditioned things are the realm of samsara.
Not wanting things to change — if we think like this we must suffer.
When we think that the body is ourselves or belonging to us, we are afraid when we see it change.
Consider the breath: once it comes in it must go out, having gone out it must come in again.
This is its nature, this is how we manage to live.
Things don't function in that way.
This is how conditions are but we don't realize it.
Suppose we lost something.
if we thought that object was really ours, we would brood over it.
If we couldn't see it as a conditioned thing faring according to the laws of nature we would experience suffering.
But if you breathe in, can you live?
Conditioned things must naturally change in this way.
To see this is to see the Dhamma, to see aniccam, change.
We live dependent on this change.
When we know how things are then we can let go of them.
The practice of Dhamma is to develop an understanding of the way of things so that suffering doesn't arise.
If we think wrongly we are at odds with the world, at odds with the Dhamma and with the truth.
Suppose you were sick and had to go into hospital.
Most people think, “Please don't let me die, I want to get better.” This is wrong thinking, it will lead to suffering.
You have to think to yourself, “If I recover I recover, if I die I die.” this is right thinking, because you can't ultimately control conditions.
If you think like this, whether you die or recover, you can't go wrong, you don't have to worry.
Wanting to get better at all costs and afraid of the thought of dying… this is the mind which doesn't understand conditions.
You should think, “If I get better that's fine, if I don't get better that's fine.” This way we can't go wrong, we don't have to be afraid or cry, because we have tuned ourselves in to the way things are.
The Buddha saw clearly.
His teaching is always relevant, never out-dated.
It never changes.
In the present day it's still the way they are, they haven't changed.
By taking this teaching to heart we can gain the reward of peace and well-being.
In the teachings there is the reflection of “not-self”: “this is to listen to this kind of teaching because they are attached to the idea of self.
This is the cause of suffering.
You should take note of this.
Today a woman asked about how to deal with anger.
I told her that the next time she gets angry, to wind up her alarm clock and put it in front of her.
Then to give herself two hours for the anger to go away.
If it was really her anger she could probably tell it to go away like this: “In two hours be gone!” But it isn't really ours to command.
Sometimes in two hours it's still not gone, at other times in one hour it's gone already.
Holding onto anger as a personal possession will cause suffering.
If it really belonged to us it would have to obey us.
If it doesn't obey us that means it's only a deception.
Don't fall for it.
Whether the mind is happy or sad, don't fall for it.
Whether the mind loves or hates, don't fall for it, it's all a deception.
Have any of you ever been angry?
When you are angry does it feel good or bad?
If it feels bad then why don't you throw that feeling away, why bother to keep it?
How can you say that you are wise and intelligent when you hold on to such things?
Since the day you were born, how many times has the mind tricked you into anger?
Some days the mind can even cause a whole family to quarrel, or cause you to cry all night.
And yet we still continue to get angry, we still hold onto things and suffer.
If you don't see suffering you will have to keep suffering indefinitely, with no chance for respite.
The world of samsara is like this.
If we know the way it is we can solve the problem.
The Buddha's teaching states that there is no better means to overcome suffering than to see that “this is not my self,” “this is not mine.” This is the greatest method.
But we don't usually pay attention to this.
When suffering arises we simply cry over it without learning from it.
Why is that so?
We must take a good hard look at these things, to develop the Buddho, the one who knows.
Take note, some of you may not be aware that this is Dhamma teaching.
I'm going to give you some Dhamma that's outside the scriptures.
Most people read the scriptures but don't see the Dhamma.
Today I am going to give you a teaching that's outside the scriptures.
Some people may miss the point or not understand it.
Suppose two people are walking together and see a duck and a chicken.
One of them says, “Why isn't that chicken like the duck, why isn't the duck like the chicken?” He wants the chicken to be a duck and the duck to be a chicken.
It's impossible.
If it's impossible, then even if that person were to wish for the duck to be a chicken and the chicken to be a duck for the rest of his life it would not come to pass, because the chicken is a chicken and the duck is a duck.
As long as that person thought like that he would suffer.
The other person might see that the chicken is a chicken and the duck is a duck, and that's all there is to it.
There is no problem.
He sees rightly.
If you want the duck to be a chicken and the chicken to be a duck you are really going to suffer.
In the same way, the law of aniccam states that all things are impermanent.
If you want things to be permanent you're going to suffer.
Whenever impermanence shows itself you're going to be disappointed.
One who sees that things are naturally impermanent will be at ease, there will be no conflict.
The one who wants things to be permanent is going to have conflict, maybe even losing sleep over it.
This is to be ignorant of aniccam, impermanence, the teaching if the Buddha.
If you want to know the Dhamma where should you look?
You must look within the body and the mind.
You won't find it in the shelves of a bookcase.
To really see the Dhamma you have to look within your own body and mind.
There are only these two things.
The mind is not visible to the physical eye, it must be seen with the “mind's eye.” Before the Dhamma can be realized you must know where to look.
The Dhamma that is in the body must be seen in the body.
And with what do we look at the body?
We look at the body with the mind.
You won't find the Dhamma looking anywhere else, because both happiness and suffering arise right here.
Or have you seen happiness arising in the trees?
Or from the rivers, or the weather?
Happiness and suffering are feelings which arise in our own bodies and minds.
Therefore the Buddha tells us to know the Dhamma right here.
The Dhamma is right here, we must look right here.
The Master may tell you to look at the Dhamma in the books, but if you think that this is where the Dhamma really is, you'll never see it.
Having looked at the books you must reflect on those teachings inwardly.
Then you can understand the Dhamma.
Where does the real Dhamma exist?
It exists right here in this body and mind of ours.
This is the essence of contemplation practice.
When we do this, wisdom will arise in our minds.
When there is wisdom in our minds, then no matter where we look there is Dhamma, we will see aniccam, dukkham, and anatta at all times.
Aniccam means transient.
Dukkham — if we cling to the things that are transient we must suffer, because they are not us or ours.
But we don't see this, we always see them as being our self and belonging to us.
This means that you don't see the truth of convention.
You should understand conventions.
For example, all of us sitting here have names.
Are our names born with us or are they assigned to us afterwards?
Do you understand?
This is convention.
Is convention useful?
Of course it's useful.
For example, suppose there are four men, A, B, C, and D.
They all must have their individual names for convenience in communicating and working together.
If we wanted to speak to Mr.
A we could call Mr.
A and he would come, not the others.
This is the convenience of convention.
But when we look deeply into the matter we will see that really there isn't anybody there.
We will see transcendence.
There is only earth, water, wind and fire, the four elements.
This is all there is to this body of ours.
But we don't see it in this way because of the clinging power of Attavadupadana.
If we were to look clearly we would see that there isn't really much to what we call a person.
The solid part is the earth element, the fluid part is the water element, the part which provides heat is called the fire element.
When we break things down we see that there is only earth, water, wind and fire.
Where is the person to be found?
There isn't one.
That's why the Buddha taught that there is no higher practice than to see that “this is not my self and does not belong to me” They are simply conventions.
If we understand everything clearly in this way we will be at peace.
If we realize in the present moment the truth of impermanence, that things are not our self or belonging to us, then when they disintegrate we are at peace with them, because they don't belong to anybody anyway.
They are merely the elements of earth, water, wind and fire.
It's difficult for people to see this, but even so it's not beyond our ability.
If we can see this we will find contentment, we will not have so much anger, greed or delusion.
There will always be Dhamma in our hearts.
There will be no need for jealousy and spite, because everybody is simply earth, water, wind and fire.
There's nothing more to them than this.
When we accept this truth we will see the truth of the Buddha's teaching.
If we could see the truth of the Buddha's teaching we wouldn't have to use up so many teachers!
It wouldn't be necessary to listen to teachings everyday.
When we understand then we simply do what's required of us.
But what makes people so difficult to teach is that they don't accept the teaching and argue with the teachers and the teaching.
In front of the teacher they behave a little better, but behind his back they become thieves!
People are really difficult to teach.
The people in Thailand are like this, that's why they have to have so many teachers.
Be careful, if you're not careful you won't see the Dhamma.
You must be circumspect, taking the teaching and considering it well.
Is this flower pretty?… Do you see the ugliness within this flower?… For how many days will it be pretty?… What will it be like from now on?… Why does it change so?… In three or four days you have to take it and throw it away, right?
It loses all its beauty.
People are attached to beauty, attached to goodness.
If anything is good they just fall for it completely.
The Buddha tells us to look at pretty things as just pretty, we shouldn't become attached to them.
If there is a pleasant feeling we shouldn't fall for it.
Goodness is not a sure thing, beauty is not a sure thing.
Nothing is certain.
There is nothing in this world that is a certainty.
This is the truth.
The things that aren't true are the things that change, such as beauty.
The only truth it has is in its constant changing.
If we believe that things are beautiful, when their beauty fades our mind loses its beauty too.
When things are no longer good our mind loses its goodness too.
When they are destroyed or damaged we suffer because we have clung to them as being our own.
The Buddha tells us to see that these things are simply constructs of nature.
Beauty appears and in not many days it fades.
To see this is to have wisdom.
Therefore we should see impermanence.
If we think something is pretty we should tell ourselves it isn't, if we think something is ugly we should tell ourselves it isn't.
Try to see things in this way, constantly reflect in this way.
We will see the truth within untrue things, see the certainty within the things that are uncertain.
Today I have been explaining the way to understand suffering, what causes suffering, the cessation of suffering and the way leading to the cessation of suffering.
When you know suffering you should throw it out.
Knowing the cause of suffering you should throw it out.
Practice to see the cessation of suffering.
See aniccam, dukkham and anatta and suffering will cease.
When suffering ceases where do we go?
What are we practicing for?
We are practicing to relinquish, not in order to gain anything.
There was a woman this afternoon who told me that she is suffering.
I asked her what she wants to be, and she said she wants to be enlightened.
I said, “As long as you want to be enlightened you will never become enlightened.
Don't want anything.
When we know the truth of suffering we throw out suffering.
When we know the cause of suffering then we don't create those causes, but instead practice to bring suffering to its cessation.
The practice leading to the cessation of suffering is to see that “this is not a self,” “this is not me or them.” Seeing in this way enables suffering to cease.
It's like reaching our destination and stopping.
That's cessation.
That's getting close to nibbana.
To put it another way, going forward is suffering, retreating is suffering and stopping is suffering.
Not going forward, not retreating and not stopping… is anything left?
Body and mind cease here.
This is the cessation of suffering.
Hard to understand, isn't it?
If we diligently and consistently study this teaching we will transcend things and reach understanding, there will be cessation.
This is the ultimate teaching of the Buddha, it's the finishing point.
The Buddha's teaching finishes at the point of total relinquishment.
Today I offer this teaching to you all and to the Venerable Master also.
If there is anything wrong in it I ask your forgiveness.
But don't be in a hurry to judge whether it is right or wrong, just listen to it first.
If I were to give you all a fruit and tell you it's delicious, you should take note of my words, but don't believe me offhand, because you haven't tasted it yet.
The teaching I give you today is the same.
If you want to know whether the “fruit” is sweet or sour you have to slice a piece off and taste it.
Then you will know its sweetness or sourness.
Then you could believe me, because then you'd have seen for yourself.
So please don't throw this “fruit” away, keep it and taste it, know its taste for yourself.
The Buddha didn't have a teacher, you know.
An ascetic once asked him who his teacher was, and the Buddha answered that he didn't have one.
The ascetic just walked off shaking his head.
The Buddha was being too honest.
He was speaking to one who couldn't know or accept the truth.
That's why I tell you not to believe me.
The Buddha said that to simply believe others is foolish, because there is no clear knowing within.
That's why the Buddha said “I have no teacher.” This is the truth.
But you should look at this is the right way.
If you misunderstand it you won't respect your teacher.
Don't go saying “I have no teacher.” You must rely on your teacher to tell you what is right and wrong, and then you must practice accordingly.
Today is a fortunate day for all of us.
I have had a chance to meet with all of you and the venerable teacher.
You wouldn't think that we could meet like this because we live so far apart.
I think there must be some special reason that we have been able to meet in this way.
The Buddha taught that everything that arises must have a cause.
Don't forget this.
There must be some cause.
Perhaps in a previous existence we were brothers and sisters in the same family.
It's possible.
Another teacher didn't come, but I did.
Why is that?
Perhaps we are creating the causes in the present moment itself.
This is also possible.
I leave you all with this teaching.
May you be diligent and arduous in the practice.
There is nothing better than the practice of Dhamma, Dhamma is the supporter of the whole world.
People are confused these days because they do not know the Dhamma.
If we have the Dhamma with us we will be content.
I am happy to have had this opportunity to help you and the venerable teacher in developing the practice of Dhamma.
I leave you with my heartfelt good wishes.
Tomorrow I will be leaving, I'm not sure where for.
This is only natural.
When there is coming there must be going, when there is going there must be coming.
This is how the world is.
We shouldn't be overjoyed or upset by the changes in the world.
There is happiness and then there is suffering; there is suffering and then there is happiness; there is gain and then there is loss; there is loss and then there is gain.
This is the way things are.
In the Buddha's time there were disciples of the Buddha who didn't like him, because the Buddha exhorted them to be diligent, to be heedful.
Those who were lazy were afraid of the Buddha and resented him.
When he died, one group of disciples cried and were distressed that they would no longer have the Buddha to guide them.
These ones were still not clever.
Another group of disciples were pleased and relieved that they would no longer have the Buddha on their backs telling them what to do.
A third group of disciples were equanimous.
They reflected that what arises passes away as a natural consequence.
There were these three groups.
Which group do you identify with?
Do you want to be one of the pleased ones or what?
The group of disciples who cried when the Buddha passed away had not yet realized the Dhamma.
The second group were those who resented the Buddha.
He was always forbidding them from doing the things they wanted to do.
They lived in fear of the Buddha's scorn and reprimands, so when he passed away they were relieved.
These days things aren't much different.
It's possible that the teacher here has some followers who are resentful towards him.
They might not show it outwardly but it's there in the mind.
It's normal for people who still have defilements to feel this way.
Even the Buddha had people hating him.
I myself have followers who resent me also.
I tell them to give up evil actions but they cherish their evil actions.
So they hate me.
There are plenty like this.
May all of you who are intelligent make yourselves firm in the practice of Dhamma.
Seekers of goodness who have gathered here please listen in peace.
Listening to the Dhamma in peace means to listen with a one-pointed mind, paying attention to what you hear and then letting go.
Listening to the Dhamma is of great benefit.
While listening to the Dhamma we are encouraged to firmly establish both body and mind in samadhi, because it is one kind of dhamma practice.
In the time of the Buddha people listened to Dhamma talks intently, with a mind aspiring to real understanding, and some actually realized the Dhamma while listening.
This place is well suited to meditation practice.
Having stayed here a couple of nights I can see that it is an important place.
On the external level it is already peaceful, all that remains is the internal level, your hearts and minds.
So I ask all of you to make an effort to pay attention.
Why have you gathered here to practice meditation?
It's because your hearts and minds do not understand what should be understood.
In other words, you don't truly know how things are, or what is what.
You don't know what is wrong and what is right, what it is that brings you suffering and causes you to doubt.
So first you have to make yourselves calm.
The reason that you have come here to develop calm and restraint is that your hearts and minds are not at ease.
Your minds are not calm, not restrained.
They are swayed by doubting and agitation.
This is why you have come here today and are now listening to the Dhamma.
I would like you to concentrate and listen carefully to what I say, and I ask permission to speak frankly because that's how I am.
Please understand that even if I do speak in a forceful manner, I am doing so out of good will.
I ask your forgiveness if there is anything I say that upsets you, because the customs of Thailand and those of the West are not the same.
Actually, speaking a little forcefully can be good because it helps to stir people up who might otherwise be sleepy or drowsy, and rather than rousing themselves to hear the Dhamma allow themselves to drift instead into complacency and as a result never understand anything.
Although there may appear to be many ways to practice really there is only one.
As with fruit trees, it is possible to get fruit quickly by planting a cutting, but the tree would not be resilient or long lasting.
Another way is to cultivate a tree right from the seed, which produces a strong and resilient tree.
Practice is the same.
When I first began to practice I had problems understanding this.
As long as I still didn't know what's what, sitting meditation was a real chore, even bringing me to tears on occasion.
Sometimes I would be aiming too high, at others not high enough, never finding the point of balance.
To practice in a way that's peaceful means to place the mind neither too high or too low, but at the point of balance.
I can see that it's very confusing for you, coming from different places and having practiced in different ways with different teachers.
Coming to practice here you must be plagued with all kinds of doubts.
One teacher says you must practice in one way, another says you should practice another way.
You wonder which method to use, unsure of the essence of the practice.
The result is confusion.
There are so many teachers and so many teachings that nobody knows how to harmonize their practice.
As a result there is a lot of doubt and uncertainty.
So you must try not to think too much.
If you do think, then do so with awareness.
But so far your thinking has been done with no awareness.
First you must make your mind calm.
Where there is knowing there is no need to think, awareness will arise in its place, and this will in turn become wisdom.
But the ordinary kind of thinking is not wisdom, it is simply the aimless and unaware wandering of the mind, which inevitably results in agitation.
This is not wisdom.
At this stage you don't need to think.
You've already done a great deal of thinking at home, haven't you?
It just stirs up the heart.
You must establish some awareness.
Obsessive thinking can even bring you tears, just try it out.
Getting lost in some train of thought won't lead you to the truth, it's not wisdom.
The Buddha was a very wise person, he'd learned how to stop thinking.
In the same way you are practicing here in order to stop thinking and thereby arrive at peace.
If you are already calm it is not necessary to think, wisdom will arise in its place.
To meditate you do not have to think much more than to resolve that right now is the time for training the mind and nothing else.
Don't let the mind shoot off to the left or to the right, to the front or behind, above or below.
Our only duty right now is to practice mindfulness of the breathing.
Fix your attention at the head and move it down through the body to the tips of the feet, and then back up to the crown of the head.
Pass your awareness down through the body, observing with wisdom.
We do this to gain an initial understanding of the way the body is.
Then begin the meditation, noting that at this time your sole duty is to observe the inhalations and exhalations.
Don't force the breath to be any longer or shorter than normal, just allow it to continue easily.
Don't put any pressure on the breath, rather let it flow evenly, letting go with each in-breath and out-breath.
You must understand that you are letting go as you do this, but there should still be awareness.
You must maintain this awareness, allowing the breath to enter and leave comfortably.
There is no need to force the breath, just allow it to flow easily and naturally.
Maintain the resolve that at this time you have no other duties or responsibilities.
Thoughts about what will happen, what you will know or see during the meditation may arise from time to time, but once they arise just let them cease by themselves, don't be unduly concerned over them.
During the meditation there is no need to pay attention to sense impressions.
Whenever the mind is affected by sense impingement, wherever there is a feeling or sensation in the mind, just let it go.
Whether those sensations are good or bad is unimportant.
It is not necessary to make anything out of those sensations, just let them pass away and return your attention to the breath.
Maintain the awareness of the breath entering and leaving.
Don't create suffering over the breath being too long or too short, simply observe it without trying to control or suppress it in any way.
In other words, don't attach.
Allow the breath to continue as it is, and the mind will become calm.
As you continue the mind will gradually lay things down and come to rest, the breath becoming lighter and lighter until it becomes so faint that it seems like it's not there at all.
Both the body and the mind will feel light and energized.
All that will remain will be a one-pointed knowing.
You could say that the mind has changed and reached a state of calm.
If the mind is agitated, set up mindfulness and inhale deeply till there is no space left to store any air, then release it all completely until none remains.
Follow this with another deep inhalation until you are full, then release the air again.
Do this two or three times, then re-establish concentration.
The mind should be calmer.
If any more sense impressions cause agitation in the mind, repeat the process on every occasion.
Similarly with walking meditation.
If while walking, the mind becomes agitated, stop still, calm the mind, re-establish the awareness with the meditation object and then continue walking.
Sitting and walking meditation are in essence the same, differing only in terms of the physical posture used.
Sometimes there may be doubt, so you must have sati, to be the one who knows, continually following and examining the agitated mind in whatever form it takes.
This is to have sati.
Sati watches over and takes care of the mind.
You must maintain this knowing and not be careless or wander astray, no matter what condition the mind takes on.
The trick is to have sati taking control and supervising the mind.
Once the mind is unified with sati a new kind of awareness will emerge.
The mind that has developed calm is held in check by that calm, just like a chicken held in a coop… the chicken is unable to wander outside, but it can still move around within the coop.
Its walking to and fro doesn't get it into trouble because it is restrained by the coop.
Likewise the awareness that takes place when the mind has sati and is calm does not cause trouble.
None of the thinking or sensations that take place within the calm mind cause harm or disturbance.
Some people don't want to experience any thoughts or feelings at all, but this is going too far.
Feelings arise within the state of calm.
The mind is both experiencing feelings and calm at the same time, without being disturbed.
When there is calm like this there are no harmful consequences.
Problems occur when the “chicken” gets out of the “coop.” For instance, you may be watching the breath entering and leaving and then forget yourself, allowing the mind to wander away from the breath, back home, off to the shops or to any number of different places.
Maybe even half an hour may pass before you suddenly realize you're supposed to be practicing meditation and reprimand yourself for your lack of sati.
This is where you have to be really careful, because this is where the chicken gets out of the coop — the mind leaves its base of calm.
You must take care to maintain the awareness with sati and try to pull the mind back.
Although I use the words “pull the mind back,” in fact the mind doesn't really go anywhere, only the object of awareness has changed.
You must make the mind stay right here and now.
As long as there is sati there will be presence of mind.
It seems like you are pulling the mind back but really it hasn't gone anywhere, it has simply changed a little.
It seems that the mind goes here and there, but in fact the change occurs right at the one spot.
When sati is regained, in a flash you are back with the mind without it having to be brought from anywhere.
When there is total knowing, a continuous and unbroken awareness at each and every moment, this is called presence of mind.
If your attention drifts from the breath to other places then the knowing is broken.
Whenever there is awareness of the breath the mind is there.
With just the breath and this even and continuous awareness you have presence of mind.
There must be both sati and sampajañña.
Sati is recollection and sampajañña is self awareness.
Right now you are clearly aware of the breath.
This exercise of watching the breath helps sati and sampajañña develop together.
They share the work.
Having both sati and sampajañña is like having two workers to lift a heavy plank of wood.
Suppose there are two people trying to lift some heavy planks, but the weight is so great, they have to strain so hard, that it's almost unendurable.
Then another person, imbued with goodwill, sees them and rushes in to help.
In the same way, when there is sati and sampajañña, then pañña will arise at the same place to help out.
Then all three of them support each other.
With pañña there will be an understanding of sense objects.
For instance, during the meditation sense objects are experienced which give rise to feelings and moods.
You may start to think of a friend, but then pañña should immediately counter with “It doesn't matter,” “Stop” or “Forget it.” Or if there are thoughts about where you will go tomorrow, then the response would be, “I'm not interested, I don't want to concern myself with such things.” Maybe you start thinking about other people, then you should think, “No, I don't want to get involved.” “Just let go,” or “It's all uncertain and never a sure thing.” This is how you should deal with things in meditation, recognizing them as “not sure, not sure,” and maintaining this kind of awareness.
You must give up all the thinking, the inner dialogue and the doubting.
Don't get caught up in these things during the meditation.
In the end all that will remain in the mind in its purest form are sati, sampajañña and pañña.
whenever these things weaken doubts will arise, but try to abandon those doubts immediately, leaving only sati, sampajañña and pañña.
Try to develop sati like this until it can be maintained at all times.
Then you will understand sati, sampajañña and samadhi thoroughly.
Focusing the attention at this point you will see sati, sampajañña, samadhi and pañña together.
Whether you are attracted to or repelled by external sense objects, you will be able to tell yourself, “It's not sure.” Either way they are just hindrances to be swept away till the mind is clean.
all that should remain is sati, recollection; sampajañña, clear awareness; samadhi, the firm and unwavering mind; and pañña, or consummate wisdom.
For the time being I will say just this much on the subject of meditation.
Now about the tools or aids to meditation practice — there should be metta in your heart, in other words, the qualities of generosity, kindness and helpfulness.
These should be maintained as the foundation for mental purity.
For example, begin doing away with lobha, or selfishness, through giving.
When people are selfish they aren't happy.
Selfishness leads to a sense of discontent, and yet people tend to be very selfish without realizing how it affects them.
You can experience this at any time, especially when you are hungry.
Suppose you get some apples and you have the opportunity to share them with a friend; you think it over for a while, and, sure, the intention to give is there all right, but you want to give the smaller one.
To give the big one would be… well, such a shame.
It's hard to think straight.
You tell them to go ahead and take one, but then you say, “Take this one!”… and give them the smaller apple!
This is one form of selfishness that people usually don't notice.
Have you ever been like this?
You really have to go against the grain to give.
Even though you may really only want to give the smaller apple, you must force yourself to give away the bigger one.
Of course, once you have given it to your friend you feel good inside.
Training the mind by going against the grain in this way requires self-discipline — you must know how to give and how to give up, not allowing selfishness to stick.
Once you learn how to give, if you are still hesitating over which fruit to give, then while you are deliberating you will be troubled, and even if you give the bigger one, there will still be a sense of reluctance.
But as soon as you firmly decide to give the bigger one the matter is over and done with.
This is going against the grain in the right way.
Doing this you win mastery over yourself.
If you can't do it you will be a victim of yourself and continue to be selfish.
All of us have been selfish in the past.
This is a defilement which needs to be cut off.
In the Pali scriptures, giving is called “dana,” which means bringing happiness to others.
It is one of those conditions which help to cleanse the mind from defilement.
Reflect on this and develop it in your practice.
You may think that practicing like this involves hounding yourself, but it doesn't really.
Actually it's hounding craving and the defilements.
If defilements arise within you, you have to do something to remedy them.
Defilements are like a stray cat.
If you give it as much food as it wants it will always be coming around looking for more food, but if you stop feeding it, after a couple of days it'll stop coming around.
It's the same with the defilements, they won't come to disturb you, they'll leave your mind in peace.
So rather than being afraid of defilement, make the defilements afraid of you.
To make the defilements afraid of you, you must see the Dhamma within your minds.
Where does the Dhamma arise?
It arises with our knowing and understanding in this way.
Everyone is able to know and understand the Dhamma.
It's not something that has to be found in books, you don't have to do a lot of study to see it, just reflect right now and you can see what I am talking about.
Everybody can see it because it exists right within our hearts.
Everybody has defilements, don't they?
If you are able to see them then you can understand.
In the past you've looked after and pampered your defilements, but now you must know your defilements and not allow them to come and bother you.
The next constituent of practice is moral restraint.
Sila watches over and nurtures the practice in the same way as parents look after their children.
Maintaining moral restraint means not only to avoid harming others but also to help and encourage them.
At the very least you should maintain the five precepts, which are:
To be honest, refraining from infringing on the rights of others, in other words, not stealing.
Knowing moderation in sexual relations: In the household life there exists the family structure, based around husband and wife.
Know who your husband or wife is, know moderation, know the proper bounds of sexual activity.
Some people don't know the limits.
One husband or wife isn't enough, they have to have a second or third.
The way I see it, you can't consume even one partner completely, so to have two or three is just plain indulgence.
You must try to cleanse the mind and train it to know moderation.
Knowing moderation is true purity, without it there are no limits to your behavior.
When eating delicious food, don't dwell too much on how it tastes, think of your stomach and consider how much is appropriate to its needs.
If you eat too much you get trouble, so you must know moderation.
Moderation is the best way.
Just one partner is enough, two or three is an indulgence and will only cause problems.
To be honest in speech — this is also a tool for eradicating defilements.
You must be honest and straight, truthful and upright.
To refrain from taking intoxicants.
You must know restraint and preferably give these things up altogether.
People are already intoxicated enough with their families, relatives and friends, material possessions, wealth and all the rest of it.
That's quite enough already without making things worse by taking intoxicants as well.
These things just create darkness in the mind.
those who take large amounts should try to gradually cut down and eventually give it up altogether.
Maybe I should ask your forgiveness, but my speaking in this way is out of a concern for your benefit, so that you can understand that which is good.
You need to know what is what.
What are the things that are oppressing you in your everyday lives?
What are the actions which cause this oppression?
Good actions bring good results and bad actions bring bad results.
These are the causes.
Once moral restraint is pure there will be a sense of honesty and kindness towards others.
This will bring about contentment and freedom from worries and remorse.
Remorse resulting from aggressive and hurtful behavior will not be there.
This is form of happiness.
It is almost like a heavenly state.
There is comfort, you eat and sleep in comfort with the happiness arising from moral restraint.
This is the result; maintaining moral restraint is the cause.
This is a principle of Dhamma practice — refraining from bad actions so that goodness can arise.
If moral restraint is maintained in this way, evil will disappear and good will arise in its place.
This is the result of right practice.
But this isn't the end of the story.
Once people have attained some happiness they tend to be heedless and not go any further in the practice.
They get stuck on happiness.
They don't want to progress any further, they prefer the happiness of “heaven.” It's comfortable but there's no real understanding.
You must keep reflecting to avoid being deluded.
Reflect again and again on the disadvantages of this happiness.
It's transient, it doesn't last forever.
Soon you are separated from it.
It's not a sure thing, once happiness disappears then suffering arises in its place and the tears come again.
Even heavenly beings end up crying and suffering.
So the Lord Buddha taught us to reflect on the disadvantages, that there exists an unsatisfactory side to happiness.
Usually when this kind of happiness is experienced there is no real understanding of it.
The peace that is truly certain and lasting is covered over by this deceptive happiness.
This happiness is not a certain or permanent kind of peace, but rather a form of defilement, a refined form of defilement to which we attach.
Everybody likes to be happy.
Happiness arises because of our liking for something.
As soon as that liking changes to dislike, suffering arises.
We must reflect on this happiness to see its uncertainty and limitation.
Once things change suffering arises.
This suffering is also uncertain, don't think that it is fixed or absolute.
This kind of reflection is called Adinavakatha,.
the reflection on the inadequacy and limitation of the conditioned world.
This means to reflect on happiness rather than accepting it at face value.
Seeing that it is uncertain, you shouldn't cling fast to it.
You should take hold of it but then let it go, seeing both the benefit and the harm of happiness.
To meditate skillfully you have to see the disadvantages inherent within happiness.
Reflect in this way.
When happiness arises, contemplate it thoroughly until the disadvantages become apparent.
When you see that things are imperfect your heart will come to understand the Nekkhammakatha, the reflection on renunciation.
The mind will become disinterested and seek for a way out.
Disinterest comes from having seen the way forms really are, the way tastes really are, the way love and hatred really are.
By disinterest we mean that there is no longer the desire to cling to or attach to things.
There is a withdrawal from clinging, to a point where you can abide comfortably, observing with an equanimity that is free of attachment.
This is the peace that arises from practice.
Most people still don't know the essence of meditation practice.
They think that walking meditation, sitting meditation and listening to Dhamma talks are the practice.
That's true too, but these are only the outer forms of practice.
The real practice takes place when the mind encounters a sense object.
That's the place to practice, where sense contact occurs.
When people say things we don't like there is resentment, if they say things we like we experience pleasure.
Now this is the place to practice.
How are we going to practice with these things?
This is the crucial point.
If we just run around chasing after happiness and away from suffering all the time we can practice until the day we die and never see the Dhamma.
This is useless.
When pleasure and pain arise how are we going to use the Dhamma to be free of them?
This is the point of practice.
Usually when people encounter something disagreeable to them they don't open up to it.
Such as when people are criticized: “Don't bother me!
Why blame me?” This is someone who's closed himself off.
Right there is the place to practice.
When people criticize us we should listen.
Are they speaking the truth?
We should be open and consider what they say.
Maybe there is a point to what they say, perhaps there is something blame-worthy within us.
They may be right and yet we immediately take offense.
If people point out our faults we should strive to be rid of them and improve ourselves.
This is how intelligent people will practice.
Where there is confusion is where peace can arise.
When confusion is penetrated with understanding what remains is peace.
Some people can't accept criticism, they're arrogant.
Instead they turn around and argue.
This is especially so when adults deal with children.
Actually children may say some intelligent things sometimes but if you happen to be their mother, for instance, you can't give in to them.
If you are a teacher your students may sometimes tell you something you didn't know, but because you are the teacher you can't listen.
This is not right thinking.
In the Buddha's time there was one disciple who was very astute.
At one time, as the Buddha was expounding the Dhamma, he turned to this monk and asked, “Sariputta, do you believe this?” Venerable Sariputta replied, “No, I don't yet believe it.” The Buddha praised his answer.
“That's very good, Sariputta, you are one who us endowed with wisdom.
One who is wise doesn't readily believe, he listens with an open mind and then weighs up the truth of that matter before believing or disbelieving.
Now the Buddha here has set a fine example for a teacher.
What Venerable Sariputta said was true, he simply spoke his true feelings.
Some people would think that to say you didn't believe that teaching would be like questioning the teacher's authority, they'd be afraid to say such a thing.
They'd just go ahead and agree.
This is how the worldly way goes.
But the Buddha didn't take offense.
He said that you needn't be ashamed of those things which aren't wrong or bad.
It's not wrong to say that you don't believe if you don't believe.
That's why Venerable Sariputta said, “I don't yet believe it.” The Buddha praised him.
“This monk has much wisdom.
He carefully considers before believing anything.” The Buddha's actions here are a good example for one who is a teacher of others.
Sometimes you can learn things even from small children; don't cling blindly to positions of authority.
Whether you are standing, sitting, or walking around in various places, you can always study the things around you.
We study in the natural way, receptive to all things, be they sights, sounds, smells, tastes, feelings or thoughts.
The wise person considers them all.
In the real practice, we come to the point where there are no longer any concerns weighing on the mind.
If we still don't know like and dislike as they arise, there is still some concern in our minds.
If we know the truth of these things, we reflect, “Oh, there is nothing to this feeling of liking here.
It's just a feeling that arises and passes away.
Dislike is nothing more, just a feeling that arises and passes away.
Why make anything out of them?” If we think that pleasure and pain are personal possessions, then we're in for trouble, we never get beyond the point of having some concern or other in an endless chain.
This is how things are for most people.
But these days they don't often talk about the mind when teaching the Dhamma, they don't talk about the truth.
If you talk the truth people even take exception.
They say things like, “He doesn't know time and place, he doesn't know how to speak nicely.” But people should listen to the truth.
A true teacher doesn't just talk from memory, he speaks the truth.
People in society usually speak from memory, he speaks the truth.
People in the society usually speak from memory, and what's more they usually speak in such a way as to exalt themselves.
The true monk doesn't talk like that, he talks the truth, the way things are.
No matter how much he explains the truth it's difficult for people to understand.
It's hard to understand the Dhamma.
If you understand the Dhamma you should practice accordingly.
It may not be necessary to become a monk, although the monk's life is the ideal form for practice.
To really practice, you have to forsake the confusion of the world, give up family and possessions, and take to the forests.
These are the ideal places to practice.
But if we still have family and responsibilities how are we to practice?
Some people say it's impossible to practice Dhamma as a layperson.
Consider, which group is larger, monks or laypeople?
There are far more laypeople.
Now if only the monks practice and laypeople don't, then that means there's going to be a lot of confusion.
This is wrong understanding.
“I can't become a monk…” Becoming a monk isn't the point!
Being a monk doesn't mean anything if you don't practice.
If you really understand the practice of dhamma then no matter what position or profession you hold in life, be it a teacher, doctor, civil servant or whatever, you can practice the Dhamma every minute of the day.
To think you can't practice as a layman is to lose track of the path completely.
Why is it people can find the incentive to do other things?
If they feel they are lacking something they make an effort to obtain it.
If there is sufficient desire people can do anything.
some say, “I haven't got time to practice the Dhamma.” I say, “Then how come you've got time to breathe?” Breathing is vital to people's lives.
If they saw Dhamma practice as vital to their lives they would see it as important as their breathing.
The practice of dhamma isn't something you have to go running around for or exhaust yourself over.
Just look at the feelings which arise in your mind.
When the eye sees form, ear hears sounds, nose smells odors and so on, they all come to this one mind, “the one who knows.” Now when the mind perceives these things what happens?
If we like that object we experience pleasure, if we dislike it we experience displeasure.
That's all there is to it.
So where are you going to find happiness in this world?
Do you expect everybody to say only pleasant things to you all your life?
Is that possible?
No, it's not.
If it's not possible then where are you going to go?
The world is simply like this, we must know the world — Lokavidu — know the truth of this world.
The world is something we should clearly understand.
The Buddha lived in this world, he didn't live anywhere else.
He experienced family life, but he saw its limitations and detached himself from them.
Now how are you as laypeople going to practice?
If you want to practice you must make an effort to follow the path.
If you persevere with the practice you too will see the limitations of this world and be able to let go.
People who drink alcohol sometimes say, “I just can't give it up.” Why can't they give it up?
Because they don't yet see the liability in it.
If they clearly saw the liability of it they wouldn't have to wait to be told to give it up.
If you don't see the liability of something that means you also can't see the benefit of giving it up.
Your practice becomes fruitless, you are just playing at practice.
If you clearly see the liability and the benefit of something you won't have to wait for others to tell you about it.
Consider the story of the fisherman who finds something in his fish-trap.
He knows something is in there, he can hear it flapping about inside.
Thinking it's a fish, he reaches his hand into the trap, only to find a different kind of animal.
He can't yet see it, so he's in two minds about it.
On one hand it could be an eel, but then again it could be a snake.
If he throws it away he may regret it… it could be an eel.
On the other hand, if he keeps holding on to it and it turns out to be a snake it may bite him.
He's caught in a state of doubt.
His desire is so strong he holds on, just in case it's an eel, but the minute he brings it and sees the striped skin he throws it down straight away.
He doesn't have to wait for someone to call out, “It's a snake, it's a snake, let go!” The sight of the snake tells him what to do much more clearly than words could do.
Why?
Because he sees the danger — snakes can bite!
Who has to tell him about it?
In the same way, if we practice till we see things as they are we won't meddle with things that are harmful.
People don't usually practice in this way, they usually practice for other things.
They don't contemplate things, they don't reflect on old age, sickness and death.
They only talk about non-aging and non-death, so they never develop the right feeling for Dhamma practice.
They go and listen to Dhamma talks but they don't really listen.
Sometimes I get invited to give talks at important functions, but it's a nuisance for me to go.
Why so?
Because when I look at the people gathered there I can see that they haven't come to listen to the Dhamma.
Some are smelling of alcohol, some are smoking cigarettes, some are chatting… they don't look at all like people who have come out of faith in the Dhamma.
Giving talks at such places is of little fruit.
People who are sunk in heedlessness tend to think things like, “When he's ever going to stop talking?… Can't do this, can't do that…” and their minds just wander all over the place.
Sometimes they even invite me to give a talk just for the sake of formality: “Please give us just a small Dhamma talk, Venerable Sir.” They don't want me to talk too much, it might annoy them!
As soon as I hear people say this I know what they're about.
These people don't like listening to Dhamma.
It annoys them.
If I just give a small talk they won't understand.
If you take only a little food, is it enough?
Of course not.
Sometimes I'm giving a talk, just warming up to the subject, and some drunkard will call out, “Okay, make way, make way for the Venerable Sir, he's coming out now!” — trying to drive me away!
If I meet this kind of person I get a lot of food for reflection, I get an insight into human nature.
It's like a person having a bottle full of water and then asking for more.
There's nowhere to put it.
It isn't worth the time and energy to teach them, because their minds are already full.
Pour any more in and it just overflows uselessly.
If their bottle was empty there would be somewhere to put the water, and both the giver and the receiver would benefit.
In this way, when people are really interested in Dhamma and sit quietly, listening carefully, I feel more inspired to teach.
If people don't pay attention it's just like the man with the bottle full of water… there's no room to put anymore.
It's hardly worth my while talking to them.
In situations like this I just don't get any energy arising to teach.
You can't put much energy into giving when no-one's putting much energy into receiving.
These days giving talks tends to be like this, and it's getting worse all the time.
People don't search for truth, they study simply to find the necessary knowledge to make a living, raise families and look after themselves.
They study for a livelihood.
There may be some study of Dhamma, but not much.
Students nowadays have much more knowledge than students of previous times.
They have all the requisites at their disposal, everything is more convenient.
But they also have a lot more confusion and suffering than before.
Why is this?
Because they only look for the kind of knowledge used to make a living.
Even the monks are like this.
Sometimes I hear them say, “I didn't become a monk to practice the Dhamma, I only ordained to study.” These are the words of someone who has completely cut off the path of practice.
There's no way ahead, it's a dead end.
When these monks teach it's only from memory.
They may teach one thing but their minds are in completely different place.
Such teachings aren't true.
This is how the world is.
If you try to live simply, practicing the Dhamma and living peacefully, they say you are weird and anti-social.
They say you're obstructing progress in society.
They even intimidate you.
Eventually you might even start to believe them and revert to the worldly ways, sinking deeper and deeper into the world until it's impossible to get out.
Some people say, “I can't get out now, I've gone in to deeply.” This is how society tends to be.
It doesn't appreciate the value of Dhamma.
The value of Dhamma isn't to be found in books.
those are just the external appearances of Dhamma, they're not the realization of Dhamma as a personal experience.
If you realize the Dhamma you realize your own mind, you see the truth there.
When the truth becomes apparent it cuts off the stream of delusion.
The teaching of the Buddha is the unchanging truth, whether in the present or in any other time.
The Buddha revealed this truth, years ago and it's been the truth ever since.
This teaching should not be added to or taken away from.
The Buddha said, “What the Tathagata has laid down should not be discarded, what has not been laid down by the Tathagata should not be added on to the teachings.” He “sealed off” the Teachings.
Why did the Buddha seal them off?
Because these Teachings are the words of one who has no defilements.
No matter how the world may change these Teachings are unaffected, they don't change with it.
If something is wrong, even if people say it's right doesn't make it any the less wrong.
If something is right, it doesn't change any just because people say it's not.
Generation after generation may come and go but these things don't change, because these Teachings are the truth.
Now who created this truth?
The truth itself created the truth!
Did the Buddha create it?
No, he didn't.
The Buddha only discovered the truth, the way things are, and then he set out to declare it.
The truth is constantly true, whether a Buddha arises in the world or not.
The Buddha only “owns” the Dhamma in this sense, he didn't actually create it.
It's been here all the time.
However, previously no-one had searched for and found the Deathless, then taught it as the Dhamma.
He didn't invent it, it was already there.
At some point in time the truth is illuminated and the practice of Dhamma flourishes.
As time goes on and generations pass away the practice degenerates until the Teaching fades away completely.
After a time the Teaching is re-founded and flourishes once more.
As time goes on the adherents of the Dhamma multiply, prosperity sets in, and once more the Teaching begins to follow the darkness of the world.
And so once more it degenerates until such a time as it can no longer hold ground.
Confusion reigns once more.
Then it is time to re-establish the truth.
In fact the truth doesn't go anywhere.
When Buddhas pass away the Dhamma doesn't disappear with them.
The world revolves like this.
It's something like a mango tree.
The tree matures, blossoms, and fruits appear and grow to ripeness.
They become rotten and the seed goes back into the ground to become a new mango tree.
The cycle starts once more.
Eventually there are more ripe fruits which proceed to fall, rot, sink into the ground as seeds and grow once more into trees.
This is how the world is.
It doesn't go very far, it just revolves around the same old things.
Our lives these days are the same.
Today we are simply doing the same old things we've always done.
People think too much.
There are so many things for them to get interested in, but none of them leads to completion.
There are the sciences like mathematics, physics, psychology and so on.
You can delve into any number of them but you can only finalize things with the truth.
Suppose there was a cart being pulled by an ox.
The wheels aren't long, but the tracks are.
As long as the ox pulls the cart the tracks will follow.
The wheels are round yet the tracks are long; the tracks are long yet the wheels are merely circles.
Just looking at a stationary cart you can't see anything long about it, but once the ox starts moving you see the tracks stretching out behind you.
As long as the ox pulls, the wheels keep on turning… but there comes a day when the ox tires and throws off its harness.
The ox walks off and leaves the empty cart sitting there.
The wheels no longer turn.
In time the cart falls apart, its components go back into the four elements — earth, water, wind and fire.
Searching for peace within the world you stretch the cart wheel tracks endlessly behind you.
As long as you follow the world there is no stopping, no rest.
If you simply stop following it, the cart comes to rest, the wheels no longer turn.
Following the world turns the wheels ceaselessly.
Creating bad kamma is like this.
As long as you follow the old ways there is no stopping.
If you stop there is stopping.
This is how we practice the Dhamma.
There are two ways to support Buddhism.
One is known as amisapuja, supporting through material offerings.
These are the four requisites of food, clothing, shelter and medicine.
This is to support Buddhism by giving material offerings to the Sangha of monks and nuns, enabling them to live in reasonable comfort for the practice of Dhamma.
This fosters the direct realization of the Buddha's teaching, in turn bringing continued prosperity to the Buddhist religion.
Buddhism can be likened to a tree.
A tree has roots, a trunk, branches, twigs and leaves.
All the leaves and branches, including the trunk, depend on the roots to absorb nutriment from the soil and send it out to them.
In the same way as the tree depends on the roots to sustain it, our actions and our speech are like “branches” and “leaves,” which depend on the mind, the “root,” absorbing nutriment, which it then sends it out to the “trunk,” “branches” and “leaves.” These in turn bear fruit as our speech and actions.
Whatever state the mind is in, skillful or unskillful, it expresses that quality outwardly through our actions and speech.
Therefore the support of Buddhism through the practical application of the teaching is the most important kind of support.
For example, in the ceremony of determining the precepts on observance days, the Teacher describes those unskillful actions which should be avoided.
But if you simply go through the ceremony of determining the precepts without reflecting on their meaning, progress is difficult.
You will be unable to find the true practice.
The real support of Buddhism must therefore be done through patipattipuja, the “offering” of practice, cultivating true restraint, concentration and wisdom.
Then you will know what Buddhism is all about.
If you don't understand through practice you still won't know, even if you learn the whole Tipitaka.
In the time of the Buddha there was a monk known as Tuccho Pothila.
Tuccho Pothila was very learned, thoroughly versed in the scriptures and texts.
He was so famous that he was revered by people everywhere and had eighteen monasteries under his care.
When people heard the name “Tuccho Pothila” they were awe-struck and nobody would dare question anything he taught, so much did they revere his command of the teachings.
Tuccho Pothila was one of the Buddha's most learned disciples.
One day he went to pay respects to the Buddha.
As he was paying his respects, the Buddha said, “Ah, hello, Venerable Empty Scripture!”… just like that!
They conversed for a while until it was time to go, and then, as he was taking leave of the Buddha, the Buddha said, “Oh, leaving now, Venerable Empty Scripture?
That was all the Buddha said.
On arriving, “Oh, hello, Venerable Empty Scripture.” When it was time to go, “Ah, leaving now, Venerable Empty Scripture?” The Buddha didn't expand on it, that was all the teaching he gave.
Tuccho Pothila, the eminent teacher, was puzzled, “ Why did the Buddha say that?
What did he mean?” He thought and thought, turning over everything he had learned, until eventually he realized… “It's true!
“Venerable Empty Scripture” — a monk who studies but doesn't practice.” When he looked into his heart he saw that really he was no different from laypeople.
Whatever they aspired to he also aspired to, whatever they enjoyed he also enjoyed.
There was no real samana within him, no truly profound quality capable of firmly establishing him in the Noble Way and providing true peace.
So he decided to practice.
But there was nowhere for him to go to.
All the teachers around were his own students, no-one would dare accept him.
Usually when people meet their teacher they become timid and deferential, and so no-one would dare to become his teacher.
Finally he went to see a certain young novice, who was enlightened, and asked to practice under him.
The novice said, “Yes, sure you can practice with me, but only if you're sincere.
If you're not sincere then I won't accept you.” Tuccho Pothila pledged himself as a student of the novice.
The novice then told him to put on all his robes.
Now there happened to be a muddy bog nearby.
When Tuccho Pothila had neatly put on all his robes, expensive ones they were, too, the novice said, “Okay, now run down into this muddy bog.
If I don't tell you to stop, don't stop.
If I don't tell you to come out, don't come out.
Okay… run!
Tuccho Pothila, neatly robed, plunged into the bog.
The novice didn't tell him to stop until he was completely covered in mud.
Finally he said, “You can stop, now.” So he stopped.
“Okay, come on up!” And so he came out.
This clearly showed that Tuccho Pothila had given up his pride.
He was ready to accept the teaching.
If he wasn't ready to learn he wouldn't have run into the bog like that, being such a famous teacher, but he did it.
The young novice, seeing this, knew that Tuccho Pothila was sincerely determined to practice.
When Tuccho Pothila had come out of the bog, the novice gave him the teaching.
He taught him to observe the sense objects, to know the mind and to know the sense objects, using the simile of a man catching a lizard hiding in a termite mound.
If the mound had six holes in it, how would he catch it?
He would have to seal off five of the holes and leave just one open.
Then he would have to simply watch and wait, guarding that one hole.
When the lizard ran out he could catch it.
Observing the mind is like this.
Closing off the eyes, ears, nose, tongue and body, we leave only the mind.
To “close off” the senses means to restrain and compose them, observing only the mind.
Meditation is like catching the lizard.
We use sati to note the breath.
Sati is the quality of recollection, as in asking yourself, “What am I doing?” Sampajañña is the awareness that “now I am doing such and such.” We observe the in and out breathing with sati and sampajañña.
This quality of recollection is something that arises from practice, it's not something that can be learned from books.
Know the feelings that arise.
The mind may be fairly inactive for a while and then a feeling arises.
Sati works in conjunction with these feelings, recollecting them.
There is sati, the recollection that “I will speak,” “I will go,” “I will sit” and so on; and then there is sampajañña, the awareness that “now I am walking,” “I am lying down,” “I am experiencing such and such a mood.” With these two things, sati and sampajañña, we can know our minds in the present moment.
We will know how the mind reacts to sense impressions.
That which is aware of sense objects is called “mind.” Sense objects “wander in” to the mind.
For instance, there is a sound, like the electric planer here.
It enters through the ear and travels inwards to the mind, which acknowledges that it is the sound of an electric planer.
That which acknowledges the sound is called “mind.
Now this mind which acknowledges the sound is still quite basic.
It's just the average mind.
Perhaps annoyance arises within this one who acknowledges.
We must further train “the one who acknowledges” to become “the one who knows” in accordance with the truth — known as Buddho.
If we don't clearly know in accordance with the truth then we get annoyed at sounds of people, cars, electric planer and so on.
This is just the ordinary, untrained mind acknowledging the sound with annoyance.
It knows in accordance with its preferences, not in accordance with the truth.
We must further train it to know with vision and insight, ñanadassana, the power of the refined mind, so that it knows the sound as simply sound.
If we don't cling to sound there is annoyance.
The sound arises and we simply note it.
This is called truly knowing the arising of sense objects.
If we develop the Buddho, clearly realizing the sound as sound, then it doesn't annoy us.
It arises according to conditions, it is not a being, an individual, a self, an “us” or “them.” It's just sound.
The mind lets go.
This knowing is called Buddho, the knowledge that is clear and penetrating.
With this knowledge we can let the sound be simply sound.
It doesn't disturb us unless we disturb it by thinking, “I don't want to hear that sound, it's annoying.” Suffering arises because of this thinking.
Right here is the cause of suffering, that we don't know the truth of this matter, we haven't developed the Buddho.
We are not yet clear, not yet awake, not yet aware.
This is the raw, untrained mind.
This mind is not yet truly useful to us.
Therefore the Buddha taught that this mind must be trained and developed.
We must develop the mind just like we develop the body, but we do it in different way.
To develop the body we must exercise it, jogging in the morning and evening and so on.
This is exercising the body.
As a result the body becomes more agile, stronger, the respiratory and nervous systems become more efficient.
To exercise the mind we don't have to move it around, but bring it to a halt, bring it to rest.
For instance, when practicing meditation, we take an object, such as the in and out breathing, as our foundation.
This becomes the focus of our attention and reflection.
We note the breathing.
To note the breathing means to follow the breathing with awareness, noting its rhythm, its coming and going.
We put awareness into the breath, following the natural in and out breathing and letting go of all else.
As a result of staying on one object of awareness, our mind becomes refreshed.
If we let the mind think of this, that and the other there are many objects of awareness, the mind doesn't unify, it doesn't come to rest.
To say the mind stops means that it feels as if it's stopped, it doesn't go running here and there.
It's like having a sharp knife.
If we use the knife to cut at things indiscriminately, such as stones, bricks and grass, our knife will quickly become blunt.
We should use it for cutting only the things it was meant for.
Our mind is the same.
If we let the mind wander after thoughts and feelings which have no value or use, the mind becomes tired and weak, If the mind has no energy, wisdom will not arise, because the mind without energy is the mind without samadhi.
If the mind hasn't stopped you can't clearly see the sense objects for what they are.
The knowledge that the mind is the mind, sense objects are merely sense objects, is the root from which Buddhism has grown and developed.
This is the heart of Buddhism.
We must cultivate this mind, develop it, training it in calm and insight.
We train the mind to have restraint and wisdom by letting the mind stop and allowing wisdom to arise, by knowing the mind as it is.
You know, the way we human beings are, the way we do things, are just like little children.
A child doesn't know anything.
To an adult observing the behavior of a child, the way it plays and jumps around, its actions don't seem to have much purpose.
If our mind is untrained it is like a child.
We speak without awareness and act without wisdom.
We may fall to ruin or cause untold harm and not even know it.
A child is ignorant, it plays as children do.
Our ignorant mind is the same.
So we should train this mind.
The Buddha taught to train the mind, to teach the mind.
Even if we support Buddhism with the four requisites, our support is still superficial, it reaches only the “bark” or “sapwood” of the tree.
The real support of Buddhism must be done through the practice, nowhere else, training our actions, speech and thoughts according to the teachings.
This is much more fruitful.
If we are straight and honest, possessed of restraint and wisdom, our practice will bring prosperity.
There will be no cause for spite and hostility.
This is how our religion teaches us.
If we determine the precepts simply out of tradition, then even though the Master teaches the truth our practice will be deficient.
We may be able to study the teachings and repeat them, but we have to practice them if we really want to understand.
If we do not develop the practice, this may well be an obstacle to our penetrating to the heart of Buddhism for countless lifetimes to come.
We will not understand the essence of the Buddhist religion.
Therefore the practice is like a key, the key of meditation.
If we have the right key in our hand, no matter how tightly the lock is closed, when we take the key and turn it the lock falls open.
If we have no key we can't open the lock.
We will never know what it is in the trunk.
Actually there are two kinds of knowledge.
One who knows the Dhamma doesn't simply speak from memory, he speaks the truth.
Worldly people usually speak with conceit.
For example, suppose there were two people who hadn't seen each other for a long time, maybe they had gone to live in different provinces or countries for a while, and then one day they happened to meet on the train… “Oh!
What a surprise.
I was just thinking of looking you up!”… Actually it's not true.
Really they hadn't thought of each other at all, but they say so out of excitement.
And so it becomes a lie.
Yes, it's lying out of heedlessness.
This is lying without knowing it.
It's a subtle form of defilement, and it happens very often.
So with regard to the mind, Tuccho Pothila followed the instructions of the novice: breathing in, breathing out… mindfully aware of each breath… until he saw the liar within him, the lying of his own mind.
He saw the defilements as they came up, just like the lizard coming out of the termite mound.
He saw them and perceived their true nature as soon as they arose.
He noticed how one minute the mind would concoct one thing, the next moment something else.
Thinking is a sankhata dhamma, something which is created or concocted from supporting conditions.
It's not asankhata dhamma, the unconditioned.
The well-trained mind, one with perfect awareness, does not concoct mental states.
This kind of mind penetrates to the Noble Truths and transcends any need to depend on externals.
To know the Noble Truths is to know the truth.
The proliferating mind tries to avoid this truth, saying, “that's good” or “this is beautiful,” but if there is Buddho in the mind it can no longer deceive us, because we know the mind as it is.
The mind can no longer create deluded mental states, because there is the clear awareness that all mental states are unstable, imperfect, and a source of suffering to one who clings to them.
Wherever he went, the one who knows was constantly in Tuccho Pothila's mind.
He observed the various creations and proliferation of the mind with understanding.
He saw how the mind lied in so many ways.
He grasped the essence of the practice, seeing that “This lying mind is the one to watch — this is the one which leads us into extremes of happiness and suffering and causes us to endlessly spin around in the cycle of Samsara, with its pleasure and pain, good and evil — all because of this one.” Tuccho Pothila realized the truth, and grasped the essence of the practice, just like a man grasping the tail of the lizard.
He saw the workings of the deluded mind.
For us it's the same.
Only this mind is important.
That's why they say to train the mind.
Now if the mind is the mind, what are we going to train it with?
By having continuous sati and sampajañña we will be able to know the mind.
This one who knows is a step beyond the mind, it is that which knows the state of the mind.
The mind is the mind.
That which knows the mind as simply mind is the one who knows.
It is above the mind.
The one who knows is above the mind, and that is how it is able to look after the mind, to teach the mind to know what is right and what is wrong.
In the end everything comes back to this proliferating mind.
If the mind is caught up in its proliferations there is no awareness and the practice is fruitless.
So we must train this mind to hear the Dhamma, to cultivate the Buddho, the clear and radiant awareness, that which exists above and beyond the ordinary mind and knows all that goes on within it.
This is why we meditate on the word Buddho, so that we can know the mind beyond the mind.
Just observe all the mind's movements, whether good or bad, until the one who realizes that the mind is simply mind, not a self or a person.
This is called cittanupassana, Contemplation of Mind.
Seeing in this way we will understand that the mind is Transient, Imperfect and Ownerless.
This mind doesn't belong to us.
We can summarize thus: The mind is that which acknowledges sense objects; sense objects are sense objects as distinct from the mind; the one who knows both the mind and the sense objects for what they are.
We must use sati to constantly cleanse the mind.
Everybody has sati, even a cat has it when it's going to catch a mouse.
A dog has it when it barks at people.
This is a form of sati, but it's not sati according to the Dhamma.
Everybody has sati, but there are different levels of it, just as there are different levels of looking at things.
Like when I say to contemplate the body, some people say, “What is there to contemplate in the body?
Anybody can see it.
Kesa we can see already, loma we can see already… hair, nails, teeth and skin we can see already.
So what?
This is how people are.
They can see the body alright but their seeing is faulty, they don't see with the Buddho, the one who knows, the awakened one.
They only see the body in the ordinary way, they see it visually.
Simply to see the body is not enough.
If we only see the body there is trouble.
You must see the body within the body, then things become much clearer.
Just seeing the body you get fooled by it, charmed by its appearance.
Not seeing Transience, Imperfection and Ownerlessness, kamachanda arises.
You become fascinated by forms, sounds, odors, flavors and feelings.
Seeing in this way is to see with the mundane eye of the flesh, causing you to love and hate and discriminate into pleasing and unpleasing.
The Buddha taught that this is not enough.
You must see with the “mind's eye.” See the body within the body.
If you really look into the body… Ugh!
It's so repulsive.
There are today's things and yesterday's things all mixed up in there, you can't tell what's what.
Seeing in this way is much clearer than to see with the carnal eye.
Contemplate, see with the eye of the mind, with the wisdom eye.
People's understandings differ like this.
Some people don't know what there is to contemplate in the Five Meditations, head hair, body hair, nails, teeth and skin.
They say they can see all those things already, but they can only see them with the carnal eye, with this “crazy eye” which only looks at the things it wants to look at.
To see the body in the body you have to look much clearer than that.
This is the practice that can uproot clinging to the Five Khandhas.
To uproot attachment is to uproot suffering, because attaching to the Five Khandhas is the cause of suffering.
If suffering arises it is here, at the attachment to the Five Khandhas.
It's not that the Five Khandhas are in themselves suffering, but the clinging to them as being one's own… that's suffering.
If you clearly see the truth of these things through meditation practice, then suffering becomes unwound, like a screw or a bolt.
When the bolt is unwound, it withdraws.
The mind unwinds in the same way, letting go, withdrawing from the obsession with good and evil, possessions, praise and status, happiness and suffering.
If we don't know the truth of these things it's like tightening the screw all the time.
It gets tighter and tighter until it's crushing you and you suffer over everything.
When you know how things are then you unwind the screw.
In Dhamma language we call this the arising of nibbida, disenchantment.
You become weary of things and lay down the fascination with them.
If you unwind in this way you will find peace.
The cause of suffering is to cling to things.
So we should get rid of the cause, cut off its root and not allow it to cause suffering again.
People have only one problem — the problem of clinging.
Just because of this one thing people will kill each other.
All problems, be they individual, family or social, arise from this one root.
Nobody wins… they kill each other but in the end no-one gets anything.
I don't know why people keep on killing each other so pointlessly.
Power, possessions, status, praise, happiness and suffering… these are the worldly dhammas.
These worldly dhammas engulf worldly beings.
Worldly beings are led around by the worldly dhammas: gain and loss, acclaim and slander, status and loss of status, happiness and suffering.
These dhammas are trouble makers, if you don't reflect on their true nature you will suffer.
People even commit murder for the sake of wealth, status or power.
Why?
Because they take them too seriously.
They get appointed to some position and it goes to their heads, like the man who became headman of the village.
After his appointment he became “power-drunk.” If any of his old friends came to see he'd say, “Don't come around so often.
Things aren't the same anymore.
The Buddha taught to understand the nature of possessions, status, praise and happiness.
Take these things as they come but let them be.
Don't let them go to your head.
If you don't really understand these things you become fooled by your power, your children and relatives… by everything!
If you understand them clearly you know they're all impermanent conditions.
If you cling to them they become defiled.
All of these things arise afterwards.
When people are first born there are simply nama and rupa, that's all.
We add on the business of “Mr.
Jones,” “Miss Smith” or whatever later on.
This is done according to convention.
Still later there are the appendages of “Colonel,” “General” and so on.
If we don't really understand these things we think they are real and carry them around with us.
We carry possessions, status, name and rank around.
If you have power you can call all the tunes… “Take this one and execute him.
Take that one and throw him in jail”… Rank gives power.
This word “rank” here is where clinging takes hold.
As soon as people get rank they start giving orders; right or wrong, they just act on their moods.
So they go on making the same old mistakes, deviating further and further from the true path.
One who understands the Dhamma won't behave like this.
Good and evil have been in the world since who knows when.
If possessions and status come your way then let them simply be the possessions and status, don't let them become your identity.
Just use them to fulfill your obligations and leave it at that.
You remain unchanged.
If we have meditated on these things, no matter what comes our way we will not be fooled by it.
We will be untroubled, unaffected, constant.
Everything is pretty much the same, after all.
This is how the Buddha wanted us to understand things.
No matter what you receive, the mind adds nothing on to it.
They appoint you a city councilor… “Okay, so I'm a city councilor… but I'm not.” They appoint you head of the group… “Sure I am, but I'm not.” Whatever they make of you… “Yes I am, but I'm not!” In the end what are we anyway?
We all just die in the end.
No matter what they make you, in the end it's all the same.
What can you say?
If you can see things in this way you will have a solid abiding and true contentment.
Nothing is changed.
This is not to be fooled by things.
Whatever comes your way, it's just conditions.
There's nothing which can entice a mind like this to create or proliferate, to seduce it into greed, aversion or delusion.
Now this is to be a true supporter of Buddhism.
Whether you are among those who are being supported or those who are supporting please consider this thoroughly.
Cultivate the Sila-Dhamma within you.
This is the surest way to support Buddhism.
To support Buddhism with the offerings of food, shelter and medicine is good also, but such offerings only reach the “sapwood” of Buddhism.
Please don't forget this.
A tree has bark, sapwood and heartwood, and these three parts are interdependent.
The heartwood must rely on the bark and the sapwood.
The sapwood relies on the bark and the heartwood.
They all exist interdependently, just like the teachings of Moral Discipline, Concentration and Wisdom.
Moral Discipline is to establish your speech and actions in rectitude.
Concentration is to firmly fix the mind.
Wisdom is the thorough understanding of the nature of all conditions.
Study this, practice this, and you will understand Buddhism in the most profound way.
If you don't realize these things you will be fooled by possessions, fooled by rank, fooled by anything you come into contact with.
Simply supporting Buddhism in the external way will never put an end to the fighting and squabbling, the grudges and animosity, the stabbing and shooting.
If these things are to cease we must reflect on the nature of possessions, rank, praise, happiness and suffering.
We must consider our lives and bring them in line with the Teaching.
We should reflect that all beings in the world are part of one whole.
We are like them, they are like us.
They have happiness and suffering just like we do.
It's all much the same.
If we reflect in this way, peace and understanding will arise.
This is the foundation of Buddhism.
Now please pay attention, not allowing your mind to wander off after other things.
Create the feeling that right now you are sitting on a mountain or in a forest somewhere, all by yourself.
What do you have sitting here right now?
There are body and mind, that's all, only these two things.
All that is contained within this frame sitting here now is called “body.” The “mind” is that which is aware and is thinking at this very moment.
These two things are also called “nama” and “rupa.” “Nama” refers to that which has no “rupa,” or form.
All thoughts and feelings, or the four mental khandhas of feeling, perception, volition and consciousness, are nama, they are all formless.
When the eye sees form, that form is called rupa, while the awareness is called nama.
Together they are called nama and rupa, or simply body and mind.
Understand that sitting here in this present moment are only body and mind.
But we get these two things confused with each other.
If you want peace you must know the truth of them.
The mind in its present state is still untrained; it's dirty, not clear.
It is not yet the pure mind.
We must further train this mind through the practice of meditation.
Some people think that meditation means to sit in some special way, but in actual fact standing, sitting, walking and reclining are all vehicles for meditation practice.
You can practice at all times.
Samadhi literally means “the firmly established mind.” To develop samadhi you don't have to go bottling the mind up.
Some people try to get peaceful by sitting quietly and having nothing disturb them at all, but that's just like being dead.
The practice of samadhi is for developing wisdom and understanding.
Samadhi is the firm mind, the one-pointed mind.
On which point is it fixed?
It's fixed onto the point of balance.
That's its point.
But people practice meditation by trying to silence their minds.
They say, “I try to sit in meditation but my mind won't be still for a minute.
One instant it flies off one place, the next instant it flies off somewhere else… How can I make it stop still?” You don't have to make it stop, that's not the point.
Where there is movement is where understanding can arise.
People complain, “It runs off and I pull it back again; then it goes off again and I pull it back once more…” So they just sit there pulling back and forth like this.
They think their minds are running all over the place, but actually it only seems like the mind is running around.
For example, look at this hall here… “Oh, it's so big!,” you say… actually it's not big at all.
Whether or not it seems big depends on your perception of it.
In fact this hall is just the size it is, neither big nor small, but people run around after their feelings all the time.
Meditating to find peace… You must understand what peace is.
If you don't understand it you won't be able to find it.
For example, suppose today you brought a very expensive pen with you to the monastery.
Now suppose that, on your way here, you put the pen in your front pocket, but at a later time you took it out and put it somewhere else, such as the back pocket.
Now when you search your front pocket… It's not there!
You get a fright.
You get a fright because of your misunderstanding, you don't see the truth of the matter.
Suffering is the result.
Whether standing, walking, coming and going, you can't stop worrying about your lost pen.
Your wrong understanding causes you to suffer.
Understanding wrongly causes suffering… “Such a shame!
I'd only bought that pen a few days ago and now it's lost.
But then you remember, “Oh, of course!
When I went to bathe I put the pen in my back pocket.” As soon as you remember this you feel better already, even without seeing your pen.
You see that?
You're happy already, you can stop worrying about your pen.
You're sure about it now.
As you're walking along you run your hand over your back pocket and there it is.
Your mind was deceiving you all along.
The worry comes from your ignorance.
Now, seeing the pen, you are beyond doubt, your worries are calmed.
This sort of peace comes from seeing the cause of the problem, samudaya, the cause of suffering.
As soon as you remember that the pen is in your back pocket there is nirodha, the cessation of suffering.
So you must contemplate in order to find peace.
What people usually refer to as peace is simply the calming of the mind, not the calming of the defilements.
The defilements are simply being temporarily subdued, just like grass covered by a rock.
In three or four days you take the rock off the grass and in no long time it grows up again.
The grass hadn't really died, it was simply being suppressed.
It's the same when sitting in meditation: the mind is calmed but the defilements are not really calmed.
Therefore, samadhi is not a sure thing.
To find real peace you must develop wisdom.
Samadhi is one kind of peace, like the rock covering the grass… in a few days you take the rock away and the grass grows up again.
This is only a temporary peace.
The peace of wisdom is like putting the rock down and not lifting it up, just leaving it where it is.
The grass can't possibly grow again.
This is real peace, the calming of the defilements, the sure peace which results from wisdom.
We speak of wisdom and samadhi as separate things, but in essence they are one and the same.
Wisdom is the dynamic function of samadhi; samadhi is the passive aspect of wisdom.
They arise from the same place but take different directions, different functions, like this mango here.
A small green mango eventually grows larger and larger until it is ripe.
It is all the same mango, the larger one and the ripe one are all the same mango, but its condition changes.
In Dhamma practice, one condition is called samadhi, the later condition is called pañña, but in actuality sila, samadhi, and pañña are all the same thing, just like the mango.
In any case, in our practice, no matter what aspect you refer to, you must always begin from the mind.
Do you know what this mind is?
What is the mind like?
What is it?
Where is it?… Nobody knows.
All we know is that we want to go over here or over there, we want this and we want that, we feel good or we feel bad… but the mind itself seems impossible to know.
What is the mind?
The mind hasn't any form.
that which receives impressions, both good and bad, we call “mind.” It's like the owner of a house.
The owner stays put at home while visitors come to see him.
He is the one who receives the visitors.
Who receives sense impressions?
What is it that perceives?
Who lets go of sense impressions?
That is what we call “mind.” But people can't see it, they think themselves around in circles… “What is the mind, what is the brain?”… Don't confuse the issue like this.
What is it that receives impressions?
Some impressions it likes and some it doesn't like… Who is that?
Is there one who likes and dislikes?
Sure there is, but you can't see it.
That is what we call “mind.
In our practice it isn't necessary to talk of samatha or vipassana, just call it the practice of Dhamma, that's enough.
And conduct this practice from your own mind.
What is the mind?
The mind is that which receives, or is aware of, sense impressions.
With some sense impressions there is a reaction of like, with others the reaction is dislike.
That receiver of impressions leads us into happiness and suffering, right and wrong.
But it doesn't have any form.
We assume it to be a self, but it's really only namadhamma.
Does “goodness” have any form?
Does evil?
Do happiness and suffering have any form?
You can't find them.
Are they round or are they square, short or long?
Can you see them.
These things are namadhamma, they can't be compared to material things, they are formless… but we know that they do exist.
Therefore it is said to begin the practice by calming the mind.
Put awareness into the mind.
If the mind is aware it will be at peace.
Some people don't go for awareness, they just want to have peace, a kind of blanking out.
So they never learn anything.
If we don't have this “one who knows” what is there to base our practice on?
If there is no long, there is no short, if there is no right there can be no wrong.
People these days study away, looking for good and evil.
But that which is beyond good and evil they know nothing of.
All they know is the right and the wrong — “I'm going to take only what is right.
I don't want to know about the wrong.
Why should I?” If you try to take only what is right in a short time it will go wrong again.
Right leads to wrong.
People keep searching among the right and wrong, they don't try to find that which is neither right nor wrong.
They study about good and evil, they search for virtue, but they know nothing of that which is beyond good and evil.
They study the long and the short, but that which is neither long nor short they know nothing of.
This knife has a blade, a rim and a handle.
Can you lift only the blade?
Can you lift only the rim of the blade, or the handle?
The handle, the rim and the blade are all parts of the same knife: when you pick up the knife you get all three parts together.
In the same way, if you pick up that which is good, the bad must follow.
People search for goodness and try to throw away evil, but they don't study that which is neither good nor evil.
If you don't study this there can be no completion.
If you pick up goodness, badness follows.
If you pick up happiness, suffering follows.
The practice of clinging to goodness and rejecting evil is the Dhamma of children, it's like a toy.
Sure, it's alright, you can take just this much, but if you grab onto goodness, evil will follow.
The end of this path is confused, it's not so good.
Take a simple example.
You have children — now suppose you want to only love them and never experience hatred.
This is the thinking of one who doesn't know human nature.
If you hold onto love, hatred will follow.
In the same way, people decide to study the Dhamma to develop wisdom, studying good and evil as closely as possible.
Now, having known good and evil, what do they do?
They try to cling to the good, and evil follows.
They didn't study that which is beyond good and evil.
This is what you should study.
“I'm going to be like this,” “I'm going to be like that,”… but they never say “I'm not going to be anything because there really isn't any 'I'”… This they don't study.
All they want is goodness.
If they attain goodness, they lose themselves in it.
If things get too good they'll start to go bad, and so people end up just swinging back and forth like this.
In order to calm the mind and become aware of the perceiver of sense impressions, we must observe it.
Follow the “one who knows.” Train the mind until it is pure.
How pure should you make it?
If it's really pure the mind should be above both good and evil, above even purity.
It's finished.
That's when the practice is finished.
What people call sitting in meditation is merely a temporary kind of peace.
But even in such a peace there are experiences.
If an experience arises there must be someone who knows it, who looks into it, queries it and examines it.
If the mind is simply blank then that's not so useful.
You may see some people who look very restrained and think they are peaceful, but the real peace is not simply the peaceful mind.
It's not the peace which says, “May I be happy and never experience any suffering.” With this kind of peace, eventually even the attainment of happiness becomes unsatisfying.
Suffering results.
Only when you can make your mind beyond both happiness and suffering will you find true peace.
That's the true peace.
This is the subject most people never study, they never really see this one.
The right way to train the mind is to make it bright, to develop wisdom.
Don't think that training the mind it simply sitting quietly.
That's the rock covering the grass.
People get drunk over it.
They think that samadhi is sitting.
That's just one of the words for samadhi, but really, if the mind has samadhi in the sitting posture, in the walking posture, in the standing and reclining postures.
It's all practice.
Some people complain, “I can't meditate, I'm too restless.
Whenever I sit down I think of this and that… I can't do it.
I've got too much bad kamma.
I should use up my bad kamma first and then come back and try meditating.” Sure, just try it.
Try using up your bad kamma…
This is how people think.
Why do they think like this?
These so called hindrances are the things we must study.
Whenever we sit, the mind immediately goes running off.
We follow it and try to bring it back and observe it once more… then it goes off again.
This is what you're supposed to be studying.
Most people refuse to learn their lessons from nature… like a naughty schoolboy who refuses to do his homework.
They don't want to see the mind changing.
How are you going to develop wisdom?
We have to live with change like this.
When we know that the mind is just this way, constantly changing… when we know that this is its nature, we will understand it.
We have to know when the mind is thinking good and bad, changing all the time, we have to know these things.
If we understand this point, then even while we are thinking we can be at peace.
For example, suppose at home you have a pet monkey.
Monkeys don't stay still for long, they like to jump around and grab onto things.
That's how monkeys are.
Now you come to the monastery and see the monkey here.
This monkey doesn't stay still either, it jumps around just the same.
But it doesn't bother you, does it?
Why doesn't it bother you?
Because you've raised a monkey before, you know what they're like.
If you know just one monkey, no matter how many provinces you go to, no matter how many monkeys you see, you won't be bothered by them, will you?
This is one who understands monkeys.
If we understand monkeys then we won't become a monkey.
If you don't understand monkeys you may become a monkey yourself!
Do you understand?
When you see it reaching for this and that, you shout, “Hey!” You get angry… “That damned monkey!” This is one who doesn't know monkeys.
One who knows monkeys sees that the monkey at home and the monkey in the monastery are just the same.
Why should you get annoyed by them?
When you see what monkeys are like that's enough, you can be at peace.
Peace is like this.
We must know sensations.
Some sensations are pleasant, some are unpleasant, but that's not important.
That's just their business.
Just like the monkey.
all monkeys are the same.
We understand sensations as sometimes agreeable, sometimes not — that's just their nature.
We should understand them and know how to let them go.
Sensations are uncertain.
They are Transient, Imperfect and Ownerless.
Everything that we perceive is like this.
When eyes, ears, nose, tongue, body and mind receive sensations, we know them, just like knowing the monkey.
Then we can be at peace.
When sensations arise, know them.
Why do you run after them?
Sensations are uncertain.
One minute they are one way, the next minute another.
They exist dependent on change.
And all of us here exist dependent on change.
The breath goes out then it must come in.
It must have this change.
Try only breathing in, can you do that?
Or try just breathing out without taking in another breath… can you do it?
If there was no change like this how long could you live for?
There must be both the in breath and the out breath.
Sensations are the same.
There must be these things.
If there were sensations you could develop no wisdom.
If there is no wrong there can be no right.
You must be right first before you can see what is wrong, and you must understand the wrong first to be right.
This is how things are.
For the really earnest student, the more sensations the better.
But many meditators shrink away from sensations, they don't want to deal with them.
This is like the naughty schoolboy who won't go to school, won't listen to the teacher.
These sensations are teaching us.
When we know sensations then we are practicing Dhamma.
The peace within sensations is just like understanding the monkey here.
When you understand what monkeys are like you are no longer troubled by them.
The practice of Dhamma is like this.
It's not that the Dhamma is very far away, it's right with us.
The Dhamma isn't about the angels on high or anything like that.
It's simply about us, about what we are doing right now.
Observe yourself.
Sometimes there is happiness, sometimes suffering, sometimes comfort, sometimes pain, sometimes love, sometimes hate… this is Dhamma.
Do you see it?
You should know this Dhamma, you have to read your experiences.
You must know sensations before you can let them go.
When you see that sensations are impermanent you will be untroubled by them.
As soon as a sensation arises, just say to yourself, “Hmmm… this is not a sure thing.” When your mood changes… “Hmmm, not sure.” You can be at peace with these things, just like seeing the monkey and not being bothered by it.
If you know the truth of sensations, that is knowing the Dhamma.
You let go of sensations, seeing that they are all invariably uncertain.
What we call uncertainty here is the Buddha.
The Buddha is the Dhamma.
The Dhamma is the characteristic of uncertainty.
Whoever sees the uncertainty of things sees the unchanging reality of them.
That's what the Dhamma is like.
And that is the Buddha.
If you see the Dhamma you see the Buddha, seeing the Buddha, you see the Dhamma.
If you know aniccam, uncertainty, you will let go of things and not grasp onto them.
You say, “Don't break my glass!” Can you prevent something that's breakable from breaking?
If it doesn't break now it will break later on.
If you don't break it, someone else will.
If someone else doesn't break it, one of the chickens will!
The Buddha says to accept this.
He penetrated the truth of these things, seeing that this glass is already broken.
Whenever you use this glass you should reflect that it's already broken.
Do you understand this?
The Buddha's understanding was like this.
He saw the broken glass within the unbroken one.
Whenever its time is up it will break.
Develop this kind of understanding.
Use the glass, look after it, until when, one day, it slips out of your hand… “Smash!”… no problem.
Why is there no problem?
Because you saw its brokenness before it broke!
But usually people say, “I love this glass so much, may it never break.” Later on the dog breaks it… “I'll kill that damn dog!” You hate the dog for breaking your glass.
If one of your children breaks it you'll hate them too.
Why is this?
Because you've dammed yourself up, the water can't flow.
You've made a dam without a spillway.
The only thing the dam can do is burst, right?
When you make a dam you must make a spillway also.
When the water rises up too high, the water can flow off safely.
When it's full to the brim you open your spillway.
You have to have a safety valve like this.
Impermanence is the safety valve of the Noble Ones.
If you have this “safety valve” you will be at peace.
Standing, walking, sitting, lying down, practice constantly, using sati to watch over and protect the mind.
This is samadhi and wisdom.
They are both the same thing, but they have different aspects.
If we really see uncertainty clearly, we will see that which is certain.
The certainty is that things must inevitably be this way, they cannot be otherwise.
Do you understand?
Knowing just this much you can know the Buddha, you can rightly do reverence to him.
As long as you don't throw out the Buddha you won't suffer.
As soon as you throw out the Buddha you will experience suffering.
As soon as you throw out the reflections on Transience, Imperfection and Ownerlessness you'll have suffering.
If you can practice just this much it's enough; suffering won't arise, or if it does arise you can settle it easily, and it will be a cause for suffering not arising in the future.
This is the end of our practice, at the point where suffering doesn't arise.
And why doesn't suffering arise?
because we have sorted out the cause of suffering, samudaya.
For instance, if this glass were to break, normally you would experience suffering.
We know that this glass will be a cause for suffering, so we get rid of the cause.
All dhammas arise because of a cause.
They must also cease because of a cause.
Now if there is suffering on account of this glass here, we should let go of this cause.
If we reflect beforehand that this glass is already broken, even when it hasn't, the cause ceases.
When there is no longer any cause, that suffering is no longer able to exist, it ceases.
This is cessation.
You don't have to go beyond this point, just this much is enough.
Contemplate this in your own mind.
Basically you should all have the Five Precepts as a foundation for behavior.
It's not necessary to go and study the Tipitaka, just concentrate on the Five Precepts first.
At first you'll make mistakes.
When you realize it, stop, come back and establish your precepts again.
Maybe you'll go astray and make another mistake.
When you realize it, re-establish yourself.
Practicing like this, your sati will improve and become more consistent, just like the drops of water falling from a kettle.
If we tilt the kettle just a little, the drops fall out slowly… plop!… plop!… plop!… If we tilt the kettle up a little bit more, the drops become more rapid… plop, plop, plop!!… If we tilt the kettle up even further the “plops” go away and the water flows into a steady stream.
Where do the “plops” go to?
They don't go anywhere, they change into a steady stream of water.
We have to talk about the Dhamma like this, using similes, because the Dhamma has no form.
Is it square or is it round?
You can't say.
The only way to talk about it is through similes like this.
Don't think that the Dhamma is far away from you.
It lies right with you, all around.
Take a look… one minute happy, the next sad, the next angry… it's all Dhamma.
Look at it and understand.
Whatever it is that causes suffering you should remedy.
If suffering is still there, take another look, you don't yet see clearly.
If you could see clearly you wouldn't suffer, because the cause would no longer be there.
If suffering is still there, if you're still having to endure, then you're not yet on the right track.
Wherever you get stuck, whenever you're suffering too much, right there you're wrong.
whenever you're so happy you're floating in the clouds… there… wrong again!
If you practice like this you will have sati at all times, in all postures.
With sati, recollection, and sampajañña, self awareness, you will know right and wrong, happiness and suffering.
Knowing these things, you will know how to deal with them.
I teach meditation like this.
When it's time to sit in meditation then sit, that's not wrong.
You should practice this also.
But meditation is not only sitting.
You must allow your mind to fully experience things, allow them to flow and consider their nature.
How should you consider them?
See them as Transient, Imperfect and Ownerless.
It's all uncertain.
“This is so beautiful, I really must have it.” That's not a sure thing.
“I don't like this at all”… tell yourself right there, “Not sure!” Is this true?
Absolutely, no mistake.
But just try taking things for real… “I'm going to get this thing for sure”… You've gone off the track already.
Don't do this.
No matter how much you like something, you should reflect that it's uncertain.
Some kinds of food seem so delicious, but still you should reflect that it's not a sure thing.
It may seem so sure, it's so delicious, but still you must tell yourself, “not sure!” If you want to test out whether it's sure or not, try eating your favorite food every day.
Every single day, mind you.
Eventually you'll complain, “This doesn't taste so good anymore.” Eventually you'll think, “Actually I prefer that kind of food.” That's not a sure thing either!
You must allow things to flow, just like the in and out breaths.
There has to be both the in breath and the out breath, the breathing depends on change.
Everything depends on change like this.
These things lie with us, nowhere else.
If we no longer doubt whether sitting, standing, walking, or reclining, we will be at peace.
Samadhi isn't just sitting.
some people sit until they fall into a stupor.
They might as well be dead, they can't tell north from south.
Don't take it to such an extreme.
If you feel sleepy then walk, change your posture.
Develop wisdom.
If you are really tired then have a rest.
As soon as you wake up then continue the practice, don't let yourself drift into a stupor.
You must practice like this.
Have reason, wisdom, circumspection.
Start the practice for your own mind and body, seeing them as impermanent.
Everything else is the same.
Keep this in mind when you think the food is so delicious… you must tell yourself… “Not a sure thing!” You have to slug it first.
But usually it just slugs you every time, doesn't it?
If you don't like anything you just suffer over it.
This is how things slug us.
“If she likes me, I like her,” they slug us again.
You never get a punch in!
You must see it like this.
Whenever you like anything just say to yourself, “This is not a sure thing!” You have to go against the grain somewhat in order to really see the Dhamma.
Practice in all postures.
Sitting, standing, walking, lying… you can experience anger in any posture, right?
You can be angry while walking, while sitting, while lying down.
You can experience desire in any posture.
So our practice must extend to all postures; standing, walking, sitting and lying down.
It must be consistent.
Don't just put on a show, really do it.
While sitting in meditation, some incident might arise.
Before that one is settled another one comes racing in.
Whenever these things come up, just tell yourself, “not sure, not sure.” Just slug it before it gets a chance to slug you.
Now this is the important point.
If you know that all things are impermanent, all your thinking will gradually unwind.
When you reflect on the uncertainty of everything that passes, you'll see that all things go the same way.
Whenever anything arises, all you need to say is, “Oh, another one!
Have you ever seen flowing water?… have you ever seen still water?… If your mind is peaceful it will be just like still, flowing water.
Have you ever seen still, flowing water?
There!
You've only ever seen flowing water and still water, haven't you?
But you've never seen still, flowing water.
Right there, right where your thinking cannot take you, even though it's peaceful you can develop wisdom.
Your mind will be like flowing water, and yet it's still.
It's almost as if it were still, and yet it's flowing.
So I call it “still, flowing water.” Wisdom can arise here.
Today is the day on which we Buddhists come together to observe the Uposatha precepts and listen to the Dhamma, as is our custom.
The point of listening to the Dhamma is firstly to create some understanding of the things we don't yet understand, to clarify them, and secondly, to improve our grasp of the things we understand already.
We must rely on Dhamma talks to improve our understanding, and listening is the crucial factor.
For today's talk please pay special attention, first of all straightening up your posture to make it suitable for listening.
Don't be too tense.
Now, all that remains is to establish your minds, making your minds firm in samadhi.
The mind is the important ingredient.
The mind is that which perceives good and evil, right and wrong.
If we are lacking in sati for even one minute, we are crazy for that minute; if we are lacking in sati for half an hour we will be crazy for half an hour.
However much our mind is lacking in sati, that's how crazy we are.
That's why it's especially important to pay attention when listening to the Dhamma.
All creatures in this world are plagued by nothing other than suffering.
There is only suffering disturbing the mind.
Studying the Dhamma is for the purpose of utterly destroying this suffering.
If suffering arises it's because we don't really know it.
No matter how much we try to control it through will power, or through wealth and possessions, it is impossible.
If we don't thoroughly understand suffering and its cause, no matter how much we try to “trade it off” with our deeds, thoughts or worldly riches, there's no way we can do so.
Only through clear knowledge and awareness, through knowing the truth of it, can suffering disappear.
And this applies not only to homeless ones, the monks and novices, but also to householders: for anybody who knows the truth of things, suffering automatically ceases.
Now the states of good and evil are constant truths.
Dhamma means that which is constant, which maintains itself.
Turmoil maintains its turmoil, serenity maintains its serenity.
Good and evil maintain their respective conditions — like hot water: it maintains its hotness, it doesn't change for anybody.
Whether a young person or an old person drink it, it's hot.
It's hot for every nationality of people.
So Dhamma is defined as that which maintains its condition.
In our practice we must know heat and coolness, right and wrong, good and evil.
Knowing evil, for example, we will not create the causes for evil, and evil will not arise.
Dhamma practitioners should know the source of the various dhammas.
By quelling the cause of heat, heat cannot arise.
The same with evil: it arises from a cause.
If we practice the Dhamma till we know the Dhamma, we will know the source of things, their causes.
If we extinguish the cause of evil, evil is also extinguished, we don't have to go running after evil to put it out.
This is the practice of Dhamma.
But many are those who study the Dhamma, learn it, even practice it, but who are not yet with the Dhamma, and who have not yet quenched the cause of evil and turmoil within their own hearts.
As long as the cause of heat is still present, we can't possibly prevent heat from being there.
In the same way, as long as the cause of confusion is within our minds, we cannot possibly prevent confusion from being there, because it arises from this source.
As long as the source is not quenched, confusion will arise again.
Whenever we create good actions goodness arises in the mind.
It arises from its cause.
This is called kusala.
If we understand causes in this way, we can create those causes and the results will naturally follow.
But people don't usually create the right causes.
They want goodness so much, and yet they don't work to bring it about.
All they get are bad results, embroiling the mind in suffering.
All people want these days is money.
They think that is they just get enough money everything will be alright; so they spend all their time looking for money, they don't look for goodness.
This is like wanting meat, but not wanting salt to preserve it: you just leave the meat around the house to rot.
Those who want money should know not only how to find it, but also how to look after it.
If you want meat, you can't expect to buy it and then just leave it laying around in the house.
It'll just go rotten.
This kind of thinking is wrong.
The result of wrong thinking is turmoil and confusion.
The Buddha taught the Dhamma so that people would put it into practice, in order to know it and see it, and to be one with it, to make the mind Dhamma.
When the mind is Dhamma it will attain happiness and contentment.
The restlessness of samsara is in this world, and the cessation of suffering is also in this world.
The practice of Dhamma is therefore for leading the mind to the transcendence of suffering.
The body can't transcend suffering — having been born it must experience pain and sickness, aging and death.
Only the mind can transcend clinging and grasping.
All the teachings of the Buddha, which we call pariyatti, are a skillful means to this end.
For instance, the Buddha taught about upadinnakasankhara and anupadinnakasankhara — mind-attended conditions and non-mind- attended conditions.
Non-mind-attended conditions are usually defined as such things as trees, mountains, rivers and so on — inanimate things.
Mind-attended conditions are defined as animate things — animals, human beings and so on.
Most students of Dhamma take this definition for granted, but if you consider the matter deeply, how the human mind gets so caught up in sights, sounds, smells, tastes, feelings, and mental states, you might see that really there isn't anything which is not mind-attended.
As long as there is craving in the mind everything becomes mind-attended.
Studying the Dhamma without practicing it, we will be unaware of its deeper meanings.
For instance, we might think that the pillars of this meeting hall, the tables, benches and all inanimate things are “not mind-attended.” We only look at one side of things.
But just try getting a hammer and smashing some of these things and you'll see whether they're mind-attended or not!
It's our own mind, clinging to the tables, chairs and all of our possessions, which attends these things.
Even when one little cup breaks it hurts, because our mind is “attending” that cup.
Be they trees, mountains or whatever, whatever we feel to be ours, they have a mind attending them — if not their own then someone else's.
These are all “mind-attended conditions,” not “non-mind-attended.
It's the same for our body.
Normally we would say that the body is mind-attended.
The “mind” which attends the body is none other than upadana, clinging, latching onto the body and clinging to it as being “me” and “mine.
Just as a blind man cannot conceive of colors — no matter where he looks, no colors can be seen — just so for the mind blocked by craving and delusion, all objects of consciousness become mind-attended.
For the mind tainted with craving and obstructed by delusion, everything becomes mind-attended… tables, chairs, animals and everything else.
If we understand that there is an intrinsic self, the mind attaches to everything.
All of nature becomes mind-attended, there is always clinging and attachment.
The Buddha talked about sankhata dhammas and asankhata dhammas — conditioned and unconditioned things.
Conditioned things are innumerable — material or immaterial, big or small — if our mind is under the influence of delusion, it will proliferate about these things, dividing them up into good and bad, short and long, coarse and refined.
Why does the mind proliferate like this?
Because it doesn't know determined reality, it doesn't see the Dhamma.
Not seeing the Dhamma, the mind is full of clinging.
As long as the mind is held down by clinging there can be no escape, there is confusion, birth, old age, sickness and death, even in the thinking processes.
This kind of mind is called the sankhata dhamma.
Asankhata dhamma, the unconditioned, refers to the mind which has seen the Dhamma, the truth, of the Five Khandhas as they are — as Transient, Imperfect and Ownerless.
All ideas of “me” and “them,” “mine” and “theirs,” belong to the determined reality.
Really they are all conditions.
When we know the truth of conditions, as neither ourselves nor belonging to us, we let go of conditions and the determined.
When we let go of conditions we attain the Dhamma, we enter into and realize the Dhamma.
When we attain the Dhamma we know clearly.
What do we know?
We know that there are only conditions and determinations, no being, no self, no “us” nor “them.” This is knowledge of the way things are.
Seeing in this way the mind transcends things.
The body may grow old, get sick and die, but the mind transcends this state.
When the mind transcends conditions, it knows the unconditioned.
the mind becomes the unconditioned, the state which no longer contains conditioning factors.
The mind is no longer conditioned by the concerns of the world, conditions no longer contaminate the mind.
Pleasure and pain no longer affect it.
Nothing can affect the mind or change it, the mind is assured, it has escaped all constructions.
Seeing the true nature of conditions and the determined, the mind becomes free.
This freed mind is called the Unconditioned, that which is beyond the power of constructing influences.
If the mind doesn't really know conditions and determinations, it is moved by them.
Encountering good, bad, pleasure, or pain, it proliferates about them.
Why does it proliferate?
Because there is still a cause.
What is the cause?
The cause is the understanding that the body is one's self or belongs to the self; that feelings are self or belonging to self; that perception is self or belonging to self; that conceptual thought is self or belonging to self; that consciousness is self or belonging to self.
The tendency to conceive things in terms of self is the source of happiness, suffering, birth, old age, sickness and death.
This is the worldly mind, spinning around and changing at the directives of worldly conditions.
This is the conditioned mind.
If we receive some windfall our mind is conditioned by it.
That object influences our mind into a feeling of pleasure, but when it disappears, our mind is conditioned by it into suffering.
The mind becomes a slave of conditions, a slave of desire.
No matter what the world presents to it, the mind is moved accordingly.
This mind has no refuge, it is not yet assured of itself, not yet free.
It is still lacking a firm base.
This mind doesn't yet know the truth of conditions.
Such is the conditioned mind.
All of you listening to the Dhamma here, reflect for a while… even a child can make you get angry, isn't that so?
Even a child can trick you.
He could trick you into crying, laughing — he could trick you into all sorts of things.
Even old people get duped by these things.
For a deluded person who doesn't know the truth of conditions, they are always shaping the mind into countless reactions, such as love, hate, pleasure and pain.
They shape our minds like this because we are enslaved by them.
We are slaves of tanha, craving.
Craving gives all the orders, and we simply obey.
I hear people complaining… “Oh, I'm so miserable.
Night and day I have to go to the fields, I have no time at home.
In the middle of the day I have to work in the hot sun with no shade.
No matter how cold it is I can't stay at home, I have to go to work.
I'm so oppressed.
If I ask them, “Why don't you just leave home and become a monk?”, they say, “I can't leave, I have responsibilities.” Tanha pulls them back.
Sometimes when you're doing the plowing you might be bursting to urinate so much you just have to do it while you're plowing, like the buffaloes!
This is how much craving enslaves them.
When I ask, “How are you going?
Haven't you got time to come to the monastery?”, they say, “Oh, I'm really in deep.” I don't know what it is they're stuck in so deeply!
These are just conditions, concoctions.
The Buddha taught to see appearances as such, to see conditions as they are.
This is seeing the Dhamma, seeing things as they really are.
If you really see these two things then you must throw them out, let them go.
No matter what you may receive it has no real substance.
At first it may seem good, but it will eventually go bad.
It will make you love and make you hate, make you laugh and cry, make you go whichever way it pulls you.
Why is this?
Because the mind is undeveloped.
Conditions become conditioning factors of the mind, making it big and small, happy and sad.
In the time of our forefathers, when a person died they would invite the monks to go and recite the recollections on impermanence: Anicca vata sankhara / Uppadavaya dhammino / Uppajjitva nirujjhan'ti / Tesam vupasamo sukho — All conditions are impermanent.
The body and the mind are both impermanent.
They are impermanent because they do not remain fixed and unchanging.
All things that are born must necessarily change, they are transient — especially our body.
What is there that doesn't change within this body?
Hair, nails, teeth, skin… are they still the same as they used to be?
The condition of the body is constantly changing, so it is impermanent.
Is the body stable?
Is the mind stable?
Think about it.
How many times is there arising and ceasing even in one day?
Both body and mind are constantly arising and ceasing, conditions are in a state of constant turmoil.
The reason you can't see these things in line with the truth is because you keep believing the untrue.
It's like being guided by a blind man.
How can you travel in safety?
A blind man will only lead you into forests and thickets.
How could he lead you to safety when he can't see?
In the same way our mind is deluded by conditions, creating suffering in the search for happiness, creating difficulty in the search for ease.
Such a mind only makes for difficulty and suffering.
Really we want to get rid of suffering and difficulty, but instead we create those very things.
All we can do is complain.
We create bad causes, and the reason we do is because we don't know the truth of appearances and conditions.
Conditions are impermanent, both the mind-attended ones and the non-mind-attended.
In practice, the non-mind-attended conditions are non-existent.
What is there that is not mind- attended?
Even your own toilet, which you would think would be non-mind-attended… try letting someone smash it with a sledge hammer!
He would probably have to contend with the “authorities.” The mind attends everything, even feces and urine.
Except for the person who sees clearly the way things are, there are no such things as non-mind-attended conditions.
Appearances are determined into existence.
Why must we determine them?
Because they don't intrinsically exist.
For example, suppose somebody wanted to make a marker.
He would take a piece of wood or a rock and place it on the ground, and then call it a marker.
Actually it's not a marker.
There isn't any marker, that's why you must determine it into existence.
In the same way we “determine” cities, people, cattle — everything!
Why must we determine these things?
Because originally they do not exist.
Concepts such as “monk” and “layperson” are also “determinations.” We determine these things into existence because intrinsically they aren't here.
It's like having an empty dish — you can put anything you like into it because it's empty.
This is the nature of determined reality.
Men and women are simply determined concepts, as are all the things around us.
If we know the truth of determinations clearly, we will know that there are no beings, because “beings” are determined things.
Understanding that these things are simply determinations, you can be at peace.
But if you believe that the person, being, the “mine,” the “theirs,” and so on are intrinsic qualities, then you must laugh and cry over them.
These are the proliferation of conditioning factors.
If we take such things to be ours there will always be suffering.
This is micchaditthi, Wrong View.
Names are not intrinsic realities, they are provisional truths.
Only after we are born do we obtain names, isn't that so?
Or did you have your name already when you were born?
The name comes afterwards, right?
Why must we determine these names?
Because intrinsically they aren't there.
We should clearly understand these determinations.
Good, evil, high, low, black and white are all determinations.
We are all lost in determinations.
This is why at the funeral ceremonies the monks chant, Anicca vata sankhara… Conditions are impermanent, they arise and pass way.
That's the truth.
What is there that, having arisen, doesn't cease?
Good moods arise and then cease.
Have you ever seen anybody cry for three or four years?
At the most, you may see people crying a whole night, and then the tears dry up.
Having arisen, they cease…
Tesam vupasamo sukho… If we understand sankharas, proliferations, and thereby subdue them, this is the greatest happiness.
This is true merit, to be calmed of proliferations, calmed of “being,” calmed of individuality, of the burden of self.
Transcending these things one sees the Unconditioned.
This means that no matter what happens, the mind doesn't proliferate around it.
There's nothing that can throw the mind off its natural balance.
What else could you want?
This is the end, the finish.
The Buddha taught the way things are.
Our making offerings and listening to Dhamma talks and so on is in order to search for and realize this.
If we realize this, we don't have to go and study vipassana, it will happen of itself.
Both samatha and vipassana are determined into being, just like other determinations.
The mind which knows, which is beyond such things, is the culmination of the practice.
Our practice, our inquiry, is in order to transcend suffering.
When clinging is finished with, states of being are finished with.
When states of being are finished with, there is no more birth or death.
When things are going well, the mind does not rejoice, and when things are going badly, the mind does not grieve.
The mind is not dragged all over the place by the tribulations of the world, and so the practice is finished.
This is the basic principle for which the Buddha gave the teaching.
The Buddha taught the Dhamma for use in our lives.
Even when we die there is the teaching Tesam vupasamo sukho… but we don't subdue these conditions, we only carry them around, as if the monks were telling us to do so.
We carry them around and cry over them.
This is getting lost in conditions.
Heaven, Hell and nibbana are all to be found at this point.
Practicing the Dhamma is in order to transcend suffering in the mind.
If we know the truth of things as I've explained here we will automatically know the Four Noble Truths — Suffering, the Cause of Suffering, the Cessation of Suffering and the Way leading to the Cessation of Suffering.
People are generally ignorant when it comes to determinations, they think they all exist of themselves.
When the books tell us that trees, mountains and rivers are non-mind-attended conditions, this is simplifying things.
This is just the superficial teaching, there's no reference to suffering, as if there was no suffering in the world.
This is just the shell of Dhamma.
If we were to explain things in terms of ultimate truth, we would see that it's people who go and tie all these things down with their attachments.
How can you say that things have no power to shape events, that they are not mind-attended, when people will beat their children even over one tiny needle?
One single plate or cup, a plank of wood… the mind attends all these things.
Just watch what happens if someone goes and smashes one of them up and you'll find out.
Everything is capable of influencing us in this way.
Knowing these things fully is our practice, examining those things which are conditioned, unconditioned, mind-attended, and non-mind-attended.
This is part of the “external teaching,” as the Buddha once referred to them.
At one time the Buddha was staying in a forest.
Taking a handful of leaves, He asked the bhikkhus, “Bhikkhus, which is the greater number, the leaves I hold in my hand or the leaves scattered over the forest floor?
The bhikkhus answered, “The leaves in the Blessed One's hand are few, the leaves scattered around the forest floor are by far the greater number.
“In the same way, bhikkhus, the whole of the Buddha's teaching is vast, but these are not the essence of things, they are not directly related to the way out of suffering.
There are so many aspects to the Teaching, but what the Tathagata really wants you to do is to transcend suffering, to inquire into things and abandon clinging and attachment to form, feeling, perception, volition and consciousness.” Stop clinging to these things and you will transcend suffering.
These teachings are like the leaves in the Buddha's hand.
You don't need so much, just a little is enough.
As for the rest of the Teaching, you needn't worry yourselves over it.
It is just like the vast earth, abundant with grasses, soil, mountains, forests.
There's no shortage of rocks and pebbles, but all those rocks are not as valuable as one single jewel.
The Dhamma of the Buddha is like this, you don't need a lot.
So whether you are talking about the Dhamma or listening to it, you should know the Dhamma.
You needn't wonder where the Dhamma is, it's right here.
No matter where you go to study the Dhamma, it is really in the mind.
The mind is the one who clings, the mind is the one who speculates, the mind is the one who transcends, who lets go.
All this external study is really about the mind.
No matter if you study the Tipitaka, the Abhidhamma or whatever, don't forget where it came from.
When it comes to the practice, the only things you really need to make a start are honesty and integrity, you don't need to make a lot of trouble for yourself.
None of you laypeople have studied the Tipitaka, but you are still capable of greed, anger and delusion, aren't you?
Where did you learn about these things from?
Did you have to read the Tipitaka or the Abhidhamma to have greed, hatred and delusion?
Those things are already there in your mind, you don't have to study books to have them.
But the Teachings are for inquiring into and abandoning these things.
Let the knowing spread from within you and you will be practicing rightly.
If you want to see a train, just go the central station, you don't have to go traveling all the way up the Northern line, the Southern Line, the Eastern Line and the Western Line to see all the trains.
If you want to see trains, every single one of them, you'd be better off waiting at Grand Central Station, that's where they all terminate.
Now some people tell me, “I want to practice but I don't know how.
I'm not up to studying the scriptures, I'm getting old now, my memory's not good…” Just look right here, at “Central Station.” Greed arises here, anger arises here, delusion arises here.
Just sit here and you can watch as all these things arise.
Practice right here, because right here is where you're stuck.
Right here is where the determined arises, where conventions arise, and right here is where the Dhamma will arise.
Therefore the practice of Dhamma doesn't distinguish between class or race, all it asks is that we look into, see and understand.
At first, we train the body and speech to be free of taints, which is sila.
Some people think that to have sila you must memorize Pali phrases and chant all day and all night, but really all you have to do is make your body and speech blameless, and that's sila.
It's not so difficult to understand, just like cooking food… put in a little bit of this and a little bit of that, till it's just right… and it's delicious!
You don't have to add anything else to make it delicious, it's delicious already, if only you add the right ingredients.
In the same way, taking care that our actions and speech are proper will give us sila.
Dhamma practice can be done anywhere.
In the past I traveled all over looking for a teacher because I didn't know how to practice.
I was always afraid that I was practicing wrongly.
I'd be constantly going from one mountain to another, from one place to another, until I stopped and reflected on it.
Now I understand.
In the past I must have been quite stupid, I went all over the place looking for places to practice meditation — I didn't realize it was already there, in my heart.
All the meditation you want is right there inside you.
There is birth, old age, sickness, death right here within you.
that's why the Buddha said Paccatam veditabbo viññuhi: The wise must know for themselves.
I'd said the words before but I still didn't know their meaning.
I traveled all over looking for it until I was ready to drop dead from exhaustion — only then, when I stopped, did I find what I was looking for, inside of me.
So now I can tell you about it.
So in your practice of sila, just practice as I've explained here.
Don't doubt the practice.
Even though some people may say you can't practice at home, that there are too many obstacles… if that's the case then even eating and drinking are going to be obstacles.
If these things are obstacles to practice then don't eat!
If you stand on a thorn, is that good?
Isn't not standing on a thorn better?
Dhamma practice brings benefit to all people, irrespective of class.
However much you practice, that's how much you will know the truth.
Some people say they can't practice as a lay person, the environment is too crowded.
If you live in a crowded place, then look into crowdedness, make it open and wide.
The mind has been deluded by crowdedness, train it to know the truth of crowdedness.
The more you neglect the practice, the more you neglect going to the monastery and listening to the teaching, the more your mind will sink down into the bog, like a frog going into a hole.
Someone comes along with a hook and the frog's done for, he doesn't have a chance.
All he can do is stretch out his neck and offer it to them.
So watch out you don't work yourself into a tiny corner — someone may just come along with a hook and scoop you up.
At home, being pestered by your children and grandchildren, you are even worse off than the frog!
You don't know how to detach from these things.
When old age, sickness and death come along, what will you do?
This is the hook that's going to get you.
Which way will you turn?
This is the predicament our minds are in.
Engrossed in the children, the relatives, the possessions… and you don't know how to let them go.
Without morality or understanding to free things up there is no way out for you.
When feeling, perception, volition and consciousness produce suffering you always get caught up in it.
Why is there this suffering?
If you don't investigate you won't know.
If happiness arises you simply get caught up in happiness, delighting in it.
You don't ask yourself, “where does this happiness come from?'
So change your understanding.
You can practice anywhere because the mind is with you everywhere.
If you think good thoughts while sitting, you can be aware of them; if you think bad thoughts you can be aware of them also.
These things are with you.
While lying down, if you think good thoughts or bad thoughts, you can know them also, because the place to practice is in the mind.
Some people think you have to go to the monastery every single day.
That's not necessary, just look at your own mind.
If you know where the practice is you'll be assured.
The Buddha's teaching tells us to watch ourselves, not to run after fads and superstitious.
That's why he said, Silena sugatim yanti, Silena bhogasampada, Silena nibbutim yanti, Tasma silam visodhaye: Sila refers to our actions.
Good actions bring good results, bad actions bring bad results.
Don't expect the gods to do things for you, or the angels and guardian deities to protect you, or the auspicious days to help you.
These things aren't true, don't believe in them.
If you believe in them you will suffer.
You'll always be waiting for the right day, the right month, the right year, the angels and guardian deities… you'll suffer that way.
Look into your own actions and speech, into your own kamma.
Doing good you inherit goodness, doing bad you inherit badness.
If you understand that good and bad, right and wrong all lie within you, then you won't have to go looking for those things somewhere else.
Just look for these things where they arise.
If you lose something here, you must look for it here.
Even if you don't find it at first, keep looking where you dropped it.
But usually, we lose it here then go looking over there.
When will you ever find it?
Good and bad actions lie within you.
One day you're bound to see it, just keep looking right there.
All beings fare according to their kamma.
What is kamma?
People are too gullible.
If you do bad actions, they say Yama, the King of the Underworld, will write it all down in a book.
When you go there he takes out his accounts and looks you up… You're all afraid of the Yama in the after-life, but you don't know the Yama within your own minds.
If you do bad actions, even if you sneak off and do it by yourself, this Yama will write it all down.
Among you people sitting here and there are probably many who have secretly done bad things, not letting anyone else see.
But you see it don't you?
This Yama sees it all.
Can you see it for yourself?
All of you, think for a while… Yama has written it all down, hasn't he?
There's no way you can escape it.
Whether you do it alone or in a group, in a field or wherever…
Is there anybody here who has ever stolen something?
There are probably a few of us who are ex-thieves.
Even if you don't steal other people's things you still may steal your own.
I myself have that tendency, that's why I reckon some of you may be the same.
Maybe you have secretly done bad things in the past, not letting anyone else know about it.
But even if you don't tell anyone else about it, you must know about it.
This is the Yama who watches over you and writes it all down.
Wherever you go he writes it all down in his account book.
We know our own intention.
When you do bad actions badness is there, if you do good actions, goodness is there.
There's nowhere you can go to hide.
Even if others don't see you, you must see yourself.
Even if you go into a deep hole you'll still find yourself.
Even if you go into a deep hole you'll still find yourself there.
There's no way you can commit bad actions and get away with it.
In the same way, why shouldn't you see your own purity?
You see it all — the peaceful, the agitated, the liberation or the bondage — we see all these for ourselves.
In this Buddhist religion you must be aware of all your actions.
We don't act like the Brahmans, who go into your house and say, “May you be well and strong, may you live long.” The Buddha doesn't talk like that.
How will the disease go away with just talk?
The Buddha's way of treating the sick was to say, “Before you were sick what happened?
What led up to your sickness?” Then you tell him how it came about.
“Oh, it's like that, is it?
Take this medicine and try it out.” If it's not the right medicine he tries another one.
If it's right for the illness, then that's the right one.
This way is scientifically sound.
As for the Brahmans, they just tie a string around your wrist and say, “Okay, be well, be strong, when I leave this place you just get right on up and eat a hearty meal and be well.” No matter how much you pay them, your illness won't go away, because their way has no scientific basis.
But this is what people like to believe.
The Buddha didn't want us to put too much store in these things, he wanted us to practice with reason.
Buddhism has been around for thousands of years now, and most people have continued to practice as their teachers have taught them, regardless of whether it's right or wrong.
That's stupid.
They simply follow the example of their forebears.
The Buddha didn't encourage this sort of thing.
He wanted us to do things with reason.
For example, at one time when he was teaching the monks, he asked Venerable Sariputta, “Sariputta, do you believe this teaching?
Venerable Sariputta replied, “I don't yet believe it.” The Buddha praised his answer: “Very good, Sariputta.
A wise person doesn't believe too readily.
He looks into things, into their causes and conditions, and sees their true nature before believing or disbelieving.
But most teachers these days would say, “What?!!!
You don't believe me?
Get out of here!” Most people are afraid of their teachers.
Whatever their teachers do they just blindly follow.
The Buddha taught to adhere to the truth.
Listen to the teaching and then consider it intelligently, inquire into it.
It's the same with my dhamma talks — go and consider it.
Is what I say right?
Really look into it, look within yourself.
So it is said to guard your mind.
Whoever guards his mind will free himself from the shackles of Mara.
It's just this mind which goes and grabs onto things, know things, sees things, experiences happiness and suffering… just this very mind.
When we fully know the truth of determinations and conditions we will naturally throw off suffering.
All things are just as they are.
They don't cause suffering in themselves, just like a thorn, a really sharp thorn.
Does it make you suffer?
No, it's just a thorn, it doesn't bother anybody.
But if you go and stand on it, then you'll suffer.
Why is there this suffering?
Because you stepped on the thorn.
The thorn is just minding its own business, it doesn't harm anybody.
Only if you step on the thorn will you suffer over it.
It's because of we ourselves that there's pain.
Form, feeling, perception, volition, consciousness… all things in this world are simply there as they are.
It's we who pick fights with them.
And if we hit them they're going to hit us back.
If they're left on their own they won't bother anybody, only the swaggering drunkard gives them trouble.
All conditions fare according to their nature.
That's why the Buddha said, Tesam vupasamo sukho: If we subdue conditions, seeing determinations and conditions as they really are, as neither “me” nor “mine,” “us” nor “them,” when we see that these beliefs are simply sakkayaditthi, the conditions are freed of the self-delusion.
If you think “I'm good,” “I'm bad,” “I'm great,” “I'm the best,” then you are thinking wrongly.
If you see all these thoughts as merely determinations and conditions, then when others say, “good” or “bad” you can leave it be with them.
As long as you still see it as “me” and “you” it's like having three hornets nests — as soon as you say something the hornets come buzzing out to sting you.
The three hornets nests are sakkayaditthi, viccikiccha, and silabbataparamasa.

Once you look into the true nature of determinations and conditions, pride cannot prevail.
Other people's fathers are just like our father, their mothers are just like ours, their children are just like ours.
We see the happiness and suffering of other beings as just like ours.
If we see in this way we can come face to face with the future Buddha, it's not so difficult.
Everyone is in the same boat.
Then the world will be as smooth as a drumskin.
If you want to wait around to meet Phra Sri Ariya Mettiya, the future Buddha, then just don't practice… you'll probably be around long enough to see him.
But He's not crazy that he'd take people like that for disciples!
Most people just doubt.
If you no longer doubt about the self, then no matter what people may say about you, you aren't concerned, because your mind has let go, it is at peace.
Conditions become subdued.
Grasping after the forms of practice… that teacher is bad, that place is no good, this is right, that's wrong… No.
There's none of these things.
All this kind of thinking is all smoothed over.
You come face to face with the future Buddha.
Those who only hold up their hands and pray will never get there.
So here is the practice.
If I talked any more it would just be more of the same.
Another talk would just be the same as this.
I've brought you this far, now you think about it.
I've brought you to the path, whoever's going to go, it's there for you.
Those who aren't going can stay.
The Buddha only sees you to the beginning of the path.
Akkhataro Tathagata — the Tathagata only points the way.
For my practice he only taught this much.
The rest was up to me.
Now I teach you, I can tell you just this much.
I can bring you only to the beginning of the path, whoever wants to go back can go back, whoever wants to travel on can travel on.
It's up to you, now.
The Dhammapada is a work familiar to every devout Buddhist and to every serious student of Buddhism.
This small collection of verses on the Buddha's doctrine is so rich in insights that it might be considered the perfect compendium of the Dhamma in its practical dimensions.
In the countries of Theravada Buddhism the Dhammapada is regarded as an inexhaustible source of guidance and spiritual inspiration, as the wise counselor to which to turn for help in resolving the difficult moral and personal problems inescapable in daily life.
Just as the Buddha is looked upon as the human kalyanamitta or spiritual friend par excellence, so the Dhammapada is looked upon as the scriptural kalyanamitta par excellence, a small embodiment in verse of the boundless wisdom and great compassion of the Master.
To draw out the living message of any great spiritual classic, it is not enough for us merely to investigate it in terms of questions that might be posed by scientific scholarship.
We have to take a step beyond scholarly examination and seek to make an application of those teachings to ourselves in our present condition.
To do this requires that we use our intelligence, imagination and intuition to see through the limiting cultural contexts out of which the work was born, and to see into those universal features of the human condition to which the spiritual classic being studied is specifically addressed.
With these stipulations in mind we will examine the Dhammapada in order to discover what this ancient book of wisdom regards as the fundamental and perennial spiritual problems of human life and to learn what solutions it can propose for them that may be relevant to us today.
In this way we will uncover the living message of the Dhammapada: the message that rings down through the centuries and speaks to us in our present condition in the fullness of our humanity.
When we set out to make such an investigation, one difficulty that we meet at the outset is the great diversity of teachings contained in the Dhammapada.
It is well known that during his teaching career the Buddha always adjusted his discourses to fit the needs and capacities of his disciples.
Thus the prose discourses found in the four main Nikayas display richly variegated presentations of the doctrine, and this diversity becomes even more pronounced in the Dhammapada, a collection of utterances spoken in the intuitive and highly charged medium of verse.
We even find in the work apparent inconsistencies, which may perplex the superficial reader and lead to the supposition that the Buddha's teaching is rife with self-contradiction.
Thus in many verses the Buddha commends certain practices to his disciples on the ground that they lead to heaven, while in others he discourages disciples from aspiring for heaven and praises the one who takes no delight in celestial joys.
Often the Buddha enjoins works of merit, yet elsewhere in the work he enjoins his disciples to go beyond both merit and demerit.
To make sense out of such contrary statements, to find a consistent message running through the Dhammapada's diversified pronouncements, let us begin with a statement the Buddha makes in another small but beautiful book of the Pali canon, the Udana: “Just as the great ocean has but one taste, the taste of salt, so this doctrine-and-discipline has but one taste, the taste of freedom.” Despite their variety in meaning and formulation, the Buddha's teachings all fit together into a perfectly coherent system which gains its unity from its final goal.
That goal is freedom, which here means spiritual freedom: the liberation of the mind from all bonds and fetters, the liberation of our being from the suffering inseparable from wandering in samsara, the cycle of rebirths.
But while the Buddha's teachings fit together harmoniously through the unity of their final goal, they are addressed to people standing at different levels of spiritual development and thus must be expressed in different ways determined by the needs of the people to be taught.
Here again water provides a fitting analogy.
Water has one essence — chemically, it is a union of two hydrogen atoms with one oxygen atom — but it takes on the different shapes of the vessels into which it is poured; similarly, the Dhamma has a single essence — deliverance from suffering — but it assumes varying expressions in accordance with the dispositions of those who are to be instructed and trained.
It is because the different expressions lead to a single end, and because the same end can be reached via teachings that are differently expressed, that the Dhamma is said to be sattha sabyañjana, “good in meaning and good in formulation.
To make sense out of the various teachings found in the Dhammapada, to grasp the vision of human spirituality expressed by the work as a whole, I would like to suggest a schematism of four levels of instruction set forth in the Dhammapada.
This fourfold schematism develops out of three primary and perennial spiritual needs of man: first, the need to achieve welfare and happiness in the present life, in the immediately visible sphere of human relations; second, the need to attain a favorable future life in accordance with a principle that confirms our highest moral intuitions; and third, the need for transcendence, to overcome all the limits imposed upon us by our finitude and temporality and to attain a freedom that is boundless, timeless, and irreversible.
These three needs give rise to four levels of instruction by distinguishing two levels pertaining to the third need: the level of path, when we are on the way to transcendence, and the level of fruit, when we have won through to transcendence.
Now let us examine each of these levels in turn, illustrating them with citations of relevant verses from the Dhammapada.
The first level of instruction in the Dhammapada is addressed to the need to establish human welfare and happiness in the immediately visible domain of personal relation.
The aim at this level is to show us the way to live at peace with ourselves and our fellow human beings, to fulfill our family and social responsibilities, and to remove the conflicts which infect human relationships and bring such immense suffering to the individual, society and the world as a whole.
The guidelines appropriate to this level of instruction are largely identical with the basic ethical injunctions proposed by most of the great world religions.
However, in the Buddha's teaching these ethical injunctions are not regarded as fiats imposed by an all-powerful God.
Rather, they are presented as precepts or training rules grounded upon two directly verifiable foundations: concern for one's own personal integrity and considerations for the welfare of those whom one's actions may affect.
The most general advice the Dhammapada gives is to avoid all evil, to cultivate good, and to cleanse one's own mind; this is said to be the counsel of all the Enlightened Ones.
More specific directives, however, are also given.
To abstain from evil we are advised to avoid irritation in deed, word and thought and to exercise self-control over body, speech and mind.
One should adhere scrupulously to the five moral precepts: abstinence from destroying life, from stealing, from sexual misconduct, from lying and from intoxicants.
The disciple should treat all beings with kindness and compassion, live honestly, control his desires, speak the truth, and live a sober upright life.
He should fulfill all his duties to parents, to immediate family, to friends, and to recluses and brahmans.
A large number of verses pertaining to this first level are concerned with the resolution of conflict and hostility.
From other parts of the Sutta Pitaka we learn that the Buddha was a keen and sensitive observer of the social and political developments that were rapidly transforming the Indian states he visited on his preaching rounds.
The violence, hatred, cruelty and sustained enmity that he witnessed have persisted right down to the present, and the Buddha's answer to this problem is still the only answer that can work.
The Buddha tells us that the key to solving the problem of violence and cruelty is the ancient maxim of using oneself as the standard for deciding how to treat others.
I myself tremble at violence, wish to live in peace and do not want to die.
Thus, putting myself in the place of others, I should recognize that all other beings tremble at violence, that all wish to live and do not want to die.
Recognizing this, I should not intimidate others, harm them, or cause them to be harmed in any way.
The Buddha saw that hatred and enmity continue and spread in a self-expanding cycle: responding to hatred by hatred only breeds more hatred, more enmity, more violence, and feed the whole vicious whirlpool of vengeance and retaliation.
The Dhammapada teaches us that the true conquest of hatred is achieved by non-hatred, by forbearance, by love.
When wronged by others we must be patient and forgiving.
We must control our anger as a driver controls a chariot; we must bear angry words as the elephant in battle bears the arrows shot into its hide; when spoken to harshly we must remain silent like a broken bell.
According to the Dhammapada, the qualities distinguishing the superior human being are generosity, truthfulness, patience and compassion.
By following these ideals we can live at peace with our own conscience and in harmony with our fellows.
The scent of virtue, the Buddha declares, is sweeter than the scent of flowers and perfume; the good man or woman shines from afar like the Himalayan mountains; just as the lotus flower rises up in all its beauty above the muck and mire of the roadside refuse heap, so does the disciple of the Buddha rise up in splendor of wisdom above the masses of ignorant worldlings.
The basic emphasis in the first level of teaching in the Dhammapada is ethical, a concern which arises from a desire to promote human well-being here and now.
However, the teachings pertaining to this level give rise to a profound religious problem, a dilemma that challenges the mature thinker.
The problem is as follows: Our moral intuition, our innate sense of moral justice, tells us that there must be some principle of compensation at work in the world whereby goodness meets with happiness and evil meets with suffering.
But everyday experience shows us exactly the opposite.
We all know of highly virtuous people beset with every kind of hardship and thoroughly bad people who succeed in everything they do.
We feel that there must be some correction to this imbalance, some force that will tilt the scales of justice into the balance that seems right, but our daily experience seems to contradict this intuition totally.
However, in his teachings the Buddha reveals that there is a force at work which can satisfy our demand for moral justice.
This force cannot be seen with the eye of the flesh nor can it be registered by any instruments of measurement, but its working becomes visible to the supernormal vision of sages and saints, while all its principles in their full complexity are fathomed by a Perfectly Enlightened Buddha.
This force is called kamma.
The law of kamma ensures that our morally determinate actions do not disappear into nothingness, but rather continue on as traces in the deep hidden layers of the mind, where they function in such a way that our good deeds eventually issue in happiness and success, our evil deeds in suffering and misery.
The word kamma, in the Buddha's teaching, means volitional action.
Such action may be bodily or verbal, when volition is expressed in deed or speech, or it may be purely mental, when volition remains unexpressed as thoughts, emotions, wishes and desires.
The actions may be either wholesome or unwholesome: wholesome when they are rooted in generosity, amity and understanding; unwholesome when they spring from greed, hatred and delusion.
According to the principle of kamma, the willed actions we perform in the course of a life have long-term consequences that correspond to the moral quality of the original action.
The deeds may utterly fade from our memory, but once performed they leave subtle impressions upon the mind, potencies capable of ripening in the future to our weal or our woe.
According to Buddhism, conscious life is not a chance by-product of molecular configurations or a gift from a divine Creator, but a beginningless process which repeatedly springs up at birth and passes away at death, to be followed by a new birth.
There are many spheres besides the human into which rebirth can occur: heavenly realms of great bliss, beauty and power, infernal realms where suffering and misery prevail.
The Dhammapada does not give us any systematic teaching on kamma and rebirth.
As a book of spiritual counsel it presupposes the theoretical principles explained elsewhere in the Buddhist scriptures and concerns itself with their practical bearings on the conduct of life.
The essentials of the law of kamma, however, are made perfectly clear: our willed actions determine the sphere of existence into which we will be reborn after death, the circumstances and endowments of our lives within any given form of rebirth, and our potentials for spiritual progress or decline.
At the second level of instruction found in the Dhammapada the content of the message is basically the same as that of the first level: it is the same set of moral injunctions for abstaining from evil and doing good.
The difference lies in the viewpoint from which these precepts are issued and the purpose for which they are taken up.
At this level the precepts are prescribed to show us the way to achieve long-range happiness and freedom from sorrow, not only in the visible sphere of the present life, but far beyond into the distant future in our subsequent transmigration in samsara.
Despite the apparent discrepancy between action and result, an all-embracing law ensures that ultimately moral justice triumphs.
In the short run the good may suffer and the evil may prosper.
But all willed actions bring their appropriate results: if one acts or speaks with an evil mind, suffering follows just as the wheel follows the foot of the draft-ox; if one acts or speaks with a pure mind, happiness follows like a shadow that never departs.
The evil-doer grieves here and hereafter; he is tormented by his conscience and destined to planes of misery.
The doer of good rejoices here and hereafter, he enjoys a good conscience and is destined to realms of bliss.
To follow the law of virtue leads upward, to happiness and joy and to higher rebirths; to violate the law leads downward, to suffering and to lower rebirths.
The law is inflexible.
Nowhere in the world can the evil-doer escape the result of his evil kamma, “neither in the sky nor in mid-ocean nor by entering into mountain clefts”.
The good person will reap the rewards of his or her good kamma in future lives with the same certainty with which a traveler, returning home after a long journey, can expect to be greeted by his family and friends.
The teaching on kamma and rebirth, with its practical corollary that we should perform deeds of merit with the aim of obtaining a higher mode of rebirth, is not by any means the final message of the Buddha or the decisive counsel of the Dhammapada.
In its own sphere of application this teaching is perfectly valid as a preparatory measure for those who still require further maturation in their journey through samsara.
However, a more searching examination reveals that all states of existence in samsara, even the highest heavens, are lacking in genuine worth; for they are all impermanent, without any lasting substance, incapable of giving complete and final satisfaction.
Thus the disciple of mature faculties, who has been prepared sufficiently by previous experience in the world, does not long even for rebirth among the gods.
Having understood that all conditioned things are intrinsically unsatisfactory and fraught with danger, the mature disciple aspires instead for deliverance from the ever-repeating round of rebirths.
This is the ultimate goal to which the Buddha points, as the immediate aim for those of developed spiritual faculties and also as the long-term ideal for those who still need further maturation: Nibbana, the Deathless, the unconditioned state where there is no more birth, aging and death, and thus no more suffering.
The third level of instruction found in the Dhammapada sketches the theoretical framework for the aspiration for final liberation and lays down guidelines pertaining to the practical discipline that can bring this aspiration to fulfillment.
The theoretical framework is supplied by the teaching of the Four Noble Truths, which the Dhammapada calls the best of all truths: suffering, the origin of suffering, the cessation of suffering, and the Noble Eightfold Path leading to the cessation of suffering.
The four truths all center around the problem of dukkha or suffering, and the Dhammapada teaches us that dukkha is not to be understood only as experienced pain and sorrow but more widely as the pervasive inadequacy and wretchedness of everything conditioned: “There is no ill like the aggregates of existence; all conditioned things are suffering; conditioned things are the worst suffering.
The second truth points out that the cause of suffering is craving, the yearning for pleasure, possessions and being which drives us through the round of rebirths, bringing along sorrow, anxiety and despair.
The Dhammapada devotes an entire chapter to the theme of craving, and the message of this chapter is clear: so long as even the subtlest thread of craving remains in the mind, we are not beyond danger of being swept away by the terrible flood of existence.
The third noble truth spells out the goal of the Buddha's teaching: to gain release from suffering, to escape the flood of existence, craving must be destroyed down to its subtlest depths.
And the fourth noble truth prescribes the means to gain release, the Noble Eightfold Path, which again is the focus of an entire chapter.
At the third level of instruction a shift in the practical teaching of the Dhammapada takes place, corresponding to the shift in doctrine from the principles of kamma and rebirth to the Four Noble Truths.
The stress now no longer falls on basic morality and purified states of mind as a highway to more favorable planes of rebirth.
Instead it falls on the cultivation of the Noble Eightfold Path as the means to destroy craving and thus break free from the entire process of rebirth itself.
The Dhammapada declares that the eightfold path is the only way to deliverance from suffering.
Its says this, not as a fixed dogma, but because full release from suffering comes from the purification of wisdom, and this path alone, with its stress on right view and the cultivation of insight, leads to fully purified wisdom, to complete understanding of liberating truth.
The Dhammapada states that those who tread the path will come to know the Four Noble Truths, and having gained this wisdom, they will end all suffering.
The Buddha assures us that by walking the path we will bewilder Mara, pull out the thorn of lust, and escape from suffering.
But he also cautions us about our own responsibility: we ourselves must make the effort, for the Buddhas only point out the way.
In principle the practice of the Noble Eightfold Path is open to people in any walk of life, householders as well as monks and nuns.
However, application to the development of the path is most feasible for those who have relinquished all worldly concerns in order to devote themselves fully to living the holy life.
For conduct to be completely purified, for the mind to be trained in concentration and insight, the adoption of a different lifestyle becomes advisable, one which minimizes distractions and stimulants to craving and orders all activities around the aim of liberation.
Thus the Buddha established the Sangha, the Order of bhikkhus and bhikkhunis, as the field of training for those ready to devote themselves fully to the practice of the path.
In the Dhammapada we find the call to the monastic life resounding throughout.
The entry way to the monastic life is an act of radical renunciation spurred on by our confrontation with suffering, particularly by our recognition of our inevitable mortality.
The Dhammapada teaches that just as a cowherd drives the cattle to pasture, so old age and death drive living beings from life to life.
There is no place in the world where one can escape death, for death is stamped into the very substance of our being.
The body is a painted mirage in which there is nothing lasting or stable; it is a mass of sores, a nest of disease, which breaks up and ends in death; it is a city built of bones containing within itself decay and death; the foolish are attached to it, but the wise, having seen that the body ends as a corpse, lose all delight in mundane joys.
Having recognized the transience and hidden misery of mundane life, the thoughtful break the ties of family and social relationships, abandon their homes and sensual pleasures, and enter upon the state of homelessness: “Like swans that abandon the lake, they leave home after home behind… Having gone from home to homelessness, they delight in detachment so difficult to enjoy”.
Withdrawn to silent and secluded places, the renunciants seek out the company of wise instructors, who point out their faults, who admonish and instruct them and shield them from wrong, who show them the right path.
Under their guidance, they live by the rules of the monastic order, content with the simplest material requisites, moderate in eating, practicing patience and forbearance, devoted to meditation.
Having learned to still the restless waves of thought and to gain one-pointed concentration, they go on to contemplate the arising and falling away of all formations: “The monk who has retired to a solitary abode and calmed the mind, comprehends the Dhamma with insight, and there arises in him a delight that transcends all human delights.
Whenever he sees with insight the rise and fall of the aggregates, he is full of joy and happiness.
The life of meditation reaches its peak in the development of insight, and the Dhammapada succinctly enunciates the principles to be seen with the wisdom of insight: “All conditioned things are impermanent… All conditioned things are suffering… All things are not self.
When one sees this with wisdom, then one turns away from suffering.
This is the path of purification”.
When these truths are penetrated by direct vision, the fetters of attachment break asunder, and the disciple rises through successive stages of realization to the attainment of full liberation.
The fourth level of teaching in the Dhammapada does not reveal any new principles of doctrine or approach to practice.
This level shows us, rather, the fruit of the third level.
The third level exposes the path to the highest goal, the way to break free from all bondage and suffering and to win the supreme peace of Nibbana.
The fourth level is a celebration and acclamation of those who have gained the fruits of the path and won the final goal.
The stages of definite attainment along the way to Nibbana are enumerated in the Pali canon as four: stream-entry, when one enters irreversibly upon the path to liberation; once-returning, when one is assured that one will return to the sense sphere of existence only one more time; non-returning, when one will never return to the sense sphere at all but will take a spontaneous birth in a celestial plane and there reach the end of suffering; and arahantship, the stage of full liberation here and now.
Although the Dhammapada contains several verses referring to those on the lower stages of attainment, its primary emphasis is on the individual who has reached the fourth and final fruit of liberation, the arahant, and the picture it gives us of the arahant is stirring and inspiring.
The arahant is depicted in two full chapters: in chapter under his own name and in chapter, the last chapter, under the name “Brahmana,” the holy man.
We are told that the arahant is no longer troubled by the fever of the passions; he is sorrowless and wholly set free; he has broken all ties.
His taints are destroyed: he is not attached to food; his field is the void and unconditioned freedom.
For ordinary worldlings the arahant is incomprehensible: his path cannot be traced, like that of birds in the sky.
He has transcended all obstacles, passed beyond sorrow and lamentation, become peaceful and fearless.
He is free from anger, devout, virtuous, without craving, self-subdued.
He has profound knowledge and wisdom; he is skilled in discriminating the right path and the wrong path; he has reached the highest goal.
He is friendly amidst the hostile, peaceful amidst the violent, and unattached amidst the attached.
In this very life the arahant has realized the end of suffering, laying down the burden of the five aggregates.
He has transcended the ties of both merit and demerit; he is sorrowless, stainless and pure; he is free from attachment and has plunged into the Deathless.
Like the moon he is spotless and pure, serene and clear.
He has cast off all human bonds and transcended all celestial bonds; he has gotten rid of the substrata of existence and conquered all worlds.
He knows the death and rebirth of beings; he is totally detached, blessed and enlightened.
No gods, angels or human beings can find his tracks, for he clings to nothing, has no attachment, holds to nothing.
He has reached the end of births, attained the perfection of insight, and reached the summit of spiritual excellence.
Bearing his last body, perfectly at peace, the arahant is the living demonstration of the truth of the Dhamma.
By his own example he shows that it is possible to free oneself from the stains of greed, hatred and delusion, to rise above suffering, and to win Nibbana in this very life.
The arahant ideal reaches its optimal exemplification in the first and highest of the arahants, the Buddha, and the Dhammapada makes a number of important pronouncements about the Master.
The Buddha is the supreme teacher who depends on no one else for guidance, who has reached perfect enlightenment through his own self-evolved wisdom.
He is the giver of refuge and is himself the first of the three refuges; those who take refuge in the Buddha, his Doctrine, and his Order are released from all suffering, after seeing with proper wisdom the Four Noble Truths.
The Buddha's attainment of perfect enlightenment elevates him to a level far above that of common humanity: the Enlightened One is trackless, of limitless range, free from worldliness, the conqueror of all, the knower of all, in all things untainted.
The sun shines by day, the moon shines by night, the warrior shines in his armor, the brahman shines in meditation, but the Buddha, we are told, shines resplendent all day and all night.
This will complete our discussion of the four basic levels of instruction found in the Dhammapada.
Interwoven with the verses pertaining to these four main levels, there runs throughout the Dhammapada a large number of verses that cannot be tied down exclusively to any single level but have a wider application.
These verses sketch for us the world view of early Buddhism and its distinctive insights into human existence.
Fundamental to this world view, as it emerges from the text, is the inescapable duality of human life.
Man walks a delicate balance between good and evil, purity and defilement, progress and decline; he seeks happiness, he fears suffering, loss and death.
We are free to choose between good and evil, and must bear full responsibility for our decisions.
Again and again the Dhammapada sounds this challenge to human freedom: we are the makers and masters of ourselves, the protectors or destroyers of ourselves, we are our own saviors and there is no one else who can save us.
Even the Buddha can only indicate the path to deliverance; the work of treading it lies with the disciple.
In the end we must choose between the way that leads back into the world, to the round of becoming, and the way that leads out of the world, to Nibbana.
And though this last course is extremely difficult, the voice of the Buddha speaks words of assurance confirming that it can be done, that it lies within our power to overcome all barriers and to triumph even over death itself.
The chief role in achieving progress in all spheres, the Dhammapada states, is played by the mind.
The Dhammapada opens with a clear assertion that the mind is the forerunner of all that we are, the maker of our character, the creator of our destiny.
The entire Buddhist discipline, from basic morality to the attainment of arahantship, hinges upon training the mind.
A wrongly directed mind brings greater harm than any enemy; a rightly directed mind brings greater good than any relative or friend.
The mind is unruly, fickle difficult to subdue, but by effort, mindfulness and self-discipline, one can master the mind, escape the flood of passions, and find “an island which no flood can overwhelm”.
The person who conquers himself, the victor over his own mind, achieves a conquest that can never be undone, a victory greater than that of the mightiest warriors.
What is needed most to train and subdue the mind, according to the Dhammapada, is a quality called heedfulness.
Heedfulness combines critical self-awareness and unremitting energy in a process of constant self-observation in order to detect and expel the defilements whenever they seek an opportunity to come to the surface.
In a world where we have no savior except ourselves, and where the means to deliverance lies in mental purification, heedfulness becomes the crucial factor for ensuring that we keep straight to the path of training without deviating due to the seductive lure of sense pleasures or the stagnating influences of laziness and complacency.
The Buddha declares that heedfulness is the path to the Deathless, and heedlessness the path to death.
The wise who understand this distinction abide in heedfulness and attain Nibbana, “the incomparable freedom from bondage”.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
One of the most notable features of Venerable Ajahn Chah's teaching was the emphasis he gave to the Sangha, the monastic order, and its use as a vehicle for Dhamma practice.
This is not to deny his unique gift for teaching lay people, which enabled him to communicate brilliantly with people from all walks of life, be they simple farmers or University professors.
But the results he obtained with teaching and creating solid Sangha communities are plainly visible in the many monasteries which grew up around him, both within Thailand and, later, in England, Australia, Europe and elsewhere.
Ajahn Chah foresaw the necessity of establishing the Sangha in the West if long-term results were to be realized.
This book is a collection of talks he gave to the monastic communities in Thailand.
They are exhortations given to the communities of bhikkhus, or Buddhist monks, at his own monastery, Wat Ba Pong, and some of its branches.
This fact should be born in mind by the lay reader.
These talks are not intended to, and indeed cannot, serve as an introduction to Buddhism and meditation practice.
They are monastic teachings, addressed primarily to the lifestyle and problems particular to that situation.
A knowledge of the basics of Buddhism on the part of the listener was assumed.
Many of the talks will thus seem strange and even daunting to the lay reader, with their emphasis on conformity and renunciation.
For the lay reader, then, it is essential to bear in mind the environment within which these talks were given — the rugged, austere, poverty-stricken North-East corner of Thailand, birth place of most of Thailand's great meditation teachers and almost its entire forest monastic tradition.
The people of the North-East are honed by this environment to a rugged simplicity and gentle patience which make them ideal candidates for the forest monk's lifestyle.
Within this environment, in small halls dimly lit by paraffin lamps, surrounded by the assembly of monks, Ajahn Chah gave his teachings.
Exhortations by the master occurred typically at the end of the fortnightly recitation of the Patimokkha, the monks' code of discipline.
Their content would be decided by the current situation — slackness in the practice, confusion about the rules, or just plain “unenlightenment.” In a lifestyle characterized by simplicity and contentment with little, complacency is an ongoing tendency, so that talks for arousing diligent effort were a regular occurrence.
The talks themselves are spontaneous reflections and exhortations rather than systematic teachings as most Westerners would know them.
The listener was required to give full attention in the present moment and to reflect back on his own practice accordingly, rather than to memorize the teachings by rote or analyze them in terms of logic.
In this way he could become aware of his own shortcomings and learn how to best put into effect the skillful means offered by the teacher.
Although meant primarily for a monastic resident — be one a monk, nun or novice — the interested lay reader will no doubt obtain many insights into Buddhist practice from this book.
At the very least there are the numerous anecdotes of the Venerable Ajahn's own practice which abound throughout the book; these can be read simply as biographical material or as instruction for mind training.
From the contents of this book, it will be seen that the training of the mind is not, as many believe, simply a matter of sitting with the eyes closed or perfecting a meditation technique, but is, as Ajahn Chah would say, a great renunciation.
The translator
Fight greed, fight aversion, fight delusion… these are the enemy.
In the practice of Buddhism, the path of the Buddha, we fight with Dhamma, using patient endurance.
We fight by resisting our countless moods.
Dhamma and the world are inter-related.
Where there is Dhamma there is the world, where there is the world there is Dhamma.
Where there are defilements there are those who conquer defilements, who do battle with them.
This is called fighting inwardly.
To fight outwardly people take hold of bombs and guns to throw and to shoot; they conquer and are conquered.
Conquering others is the way of the world.
In the practice of Dhamma we don't have to fight others, but instead conquer our own minds, patiently enduring and resisting all our moods.
When it comes to Dhamma practice we don't harbor resentment and enmity amongst ourselves, but instead let go of all forms of ill-will in our own actions and thoughts, freeing ourselves from jealousy, aversion and resentment.
Hatred can only be overcome by not harboring resentment and bearing grudges.
Hurtful actions and reprisals are different but closely related.
Actions once done are finished with, there's no need to answer with revenge and hostility.
This is called “action”.
“Reprisal” means to continue that action further with thoughts of “you did it to me so I'm going to get you back.” There's no end to this.
It brings about the continual seeking of revenge, and so hatred is never abandoned.
As long as we behave like this the chain remains unbroken, there's no end to it.
No matter where we go, the feuding continues.
The Supreme Teacher taught the world, he had compassion for all worldly beings.
But the world nevertheless goes on like this.
The wise should look into this and select those things which are of true value.
The Buddha had trained in the various arts of warfare as a prince, but he saw that they weren't really useful, they are limited to the world with its fighting and aggression.
Therefore, in training ourselves as those who have left the world, we must learn to give up all forms of evil, giving up all those things which are the cause for enmity.
We conquer ourselves, we don't try to conquer others.
We fight, but we fight only the defilements; if there is greed, we fight that; if there is aversion, we fight that; if there is delusion, we strive to give it up.
This is called “Dhamma fighting.” This warfare of the heart is really difficult, in fact it's the most difficult thing of all.
We become monks in order to contemplate this, to learn the art of fighting greed, aversion and delusion.
This is our prime responsibility.
This is the inner battle, fighting with defilements.
But there are very few people who fight like this.
Most people fight with other things, they rarely fight defilements.
They rarely even see them.
The Buddha taught us to give up all forms of evil and cultivate virtue.
This is the right path.
Teaching in this way is like the Buddha picking us up and placing us at the beginning of the path.
Having reached the path, whether we walk along it or not is up to us.
The Buddha's job is finished right there.
He shows the way, that which is right and that which is not right.
This much is enough, the rest is up to us.
Now, having reached the path we still don't know anything, we still haven't seen anything, so we must learn.
To learn we must be prepared to endure some hardship, just like students in the world.
It's difficult enough to obtain the knowledge and learning necessary for them to pursue their careers.
They have to endure.
When they think wrongly or feel averse or lazy they must force themselves before they can graduate and get a job.
The practice for a monk is similar.
If we determine to practice and contemplate, then we will surely see the way.
Ditthimana is a harmful thing.
Ditthi means “view” or “opinion.” All forms of view are called ditthi: seeing good as evil, seeing evil as good… any way whatsoever that we see things.
This is not the problem.
The problem lies with the clinging to those views, called mana; holding on to those views as if they were the truth.
This leads us to spin around from birth to death, never reaching completion, just because of that clinging.
So the Buddha urged us to let go of views.
If many people live together, as we do here, they can still practice comfortably if their views are in harmony.
But even two or three monks would have difficulty if their views were not good or harmonious.
When we humble ourselves and let go of our views, even if there are many of us, we come together at the Buddha, Dhamma and Sangha.

It's not true to say that there will be disharmony just because there are many of us.
Just look at a millipede.
A millipede has many legs, doesn't it?
Just looking at it you'd think it would have difficulty walking, but actually it doesn't.
It has its own order and rhythm.
In our practice it's the same.
If we practice as the Noble Sangha of the Buddha practiced, then it's easy.
That is, supatipanno — those who practice well; ujupatipanno — those who practice straightly; ñanapatipanno — those who practice to transcend suffering, and samicipatipanno — those who practice properly.
These four qualities, established within us, will make us true members of Sangha.
Even if we number in the hundreds or thousands, no matter how many we are, we all travel the same path.
We come from different backgrounds, but we are the same.
Even though our views may differ, if we practice correctly there will be no friction.
Just like all the rivers and streams which flow to the sea… once they enter the sea they all have the same taste and color.
It's the same with people.
When they enter the stream of Dhamma, it's the one Dhamma.
Even though they come from different places, they harmonize, they merge.
But the thinking which causes all the disputes and conflict is ditthi-mana.
Therefore the Buddha taught us to let go of views.
Don't allow mana to cling to those views beyond their relevance.
The Buddha taught the value of constant sati, recollection.
Whether we are standing, walking, sitting or reclining, wherever we are, we should have this power of recollection.
When we have sati we see ourselves, we see our own minds.
We see the “body within the body,” “the mind within the mind.” If we don't have sati we don't know anything, we aren't aware of what is happening.
So sati is very important.
With constant sati we will listen to the Dhamma of the Buddha at all times.
This is because “eye seeing forms” is Dhamma; “ear hearing sounds” is Dhamma; “nose smelling odors” is Dhamma; “tongue tasting flavors” is Dhamma; “body feeling sensations” is Dhamma; when impressions arise in the mind, that is Dhamma also.
Therefore one who has constant sati always hears the Buddha's teaching.
The Dhamma is always there.
Why?
Because of sati, because we are aware.
Sati is recollection, sampajañña is self-awareness.
This awareness is the actual Buddho, the Buddha.
When there is sati-sampajañña, understanding will follow.
We know what is going on.
When the eye sees forms: is this proper or improper?
When the ear hears sound: is this the appropriate or inappropriate?
Is it harmful?
Is it wrong, is it right?
And so on like this with everything.
If we understand we hear the Dhamma all the time.
So let us all understand that right now we are learning in the midst of Dhamma.
Whether we go forward or step back, we meet the Dhamma — it's all Dhamma if we have sati.
Even seeing the animals running around in the forest we can reflect, seeing that all animals are the same as us.
They run away from suffering and chase after happiness, just as people do.
Whatever they don't like they avoid; they are afraid of dying, just like people.
If we reflect on this, we see that all beings in the world, people as well, are the same in their various instincts.
Thinking like this is called “bhavana,” seeing according to the truth, that all beings are companions in birth, old age, sickness and death.
Animals are the same as human beings and human beings are the same as animals.
If we really see things the way they are our mind will give up attachment to them.
Therefore it is said we must have sati.
If we have sati we will see the state of our own mind.
Whatever we are thinking or feeling we must know it.
This knowing is called Buddho, the Buddha, the one who knows… who knows thoroughly, who knows clearly and completely.
When the mind knows completely we find the right practice.
So the straight way to practice is to have mindfulness, sati.
If you are without sati for five minutes you are crazy for five minutes, heedless for five minutes.
whenever you are lacking in sati you are crazy.
Sati is essential.
To have sati is to know yourself, to know the condition of your mind and your life.
This is to have understanding and discernment, to listen to the Dhamma at all times.
After leaving the teacher's discourse, you still hear the Dhamma, because the Dhamma is everywhere.
So therefore, all of you, be sure to practice every day.
Whether lazy or diligent, practice just the same.
Practice of the Dhamma is not done by following your moods.
If you practice following your moods then it's not Dhamma.
Don't discriminate between day and night, whether the mind is peaceful or not… just practice.
It's like a child who is learning to write.
At first he doesn't write nicely — big, long loops and squiggles — he writes like a child.
After a while the writing improves through practice.
Practicing the Dhamma is like this.
At first you are awkward… sometimes calm, sometimes not, you don't really know what's what.
Some people get discouraged.
Don't slacken off!
You must persevere with the practice.
Live with effort, just like the schoolboy: as he gets older he writes better and better.
From writing badly he grows to write beautifully, all because of the practice from childhood.
Our practice is like this.
Try to have recollection at all times: standing, walking, sitting or reclining.
When we perform our various duties smoothly and well, we feel peace of mind.
When there is peace of mind in our work it's easy to have peaceful meditation, they go hand in hand.
So make an effort.
You should all make an effort to follow the practice.
This is training.
This practice of ours is not easy.
We may know some things but there is still much that we don't know.
For example, when we hear teachings such as “know the body, then know the mind within the body”; or “know the mind, then know the mind within the mind.” If we haven't yet practiced these things, then we hear them we may feel baffled.
The Vinaya is like this.
In the past I used to be a teacher, but I was only a “small teacher,” not a big one.
Why do I say a “small teacher”?
Because I didn't practice.
I taught the Vinaya but I didn't practice it.
This I call a small teacher, an inferior teacher.
I say an “inferior teacher” because when it came to the practice I was deficient.
For the most part my practice was a long way off the theory, just as if I hadn't learned the Vinaya at all.
However, I would like to state that in practical terms it's impossible to know the Vinaya completely, because some things, whether we know them or not, are still offenses.
This is tricky.
And yet it is stressed that if we do not yet understand any particular training rule or teaching, we must study that rule with enthusiasm and respect.
If we don't know, then we should make an effort to learn.
If we don't make an effort, that is in itself an offense.
For example, if you doubt… suppose there is a woman and, not knowing whether she is a woman or a man, you touch her.
You're not sure, but still go ahead and touch… that's still wrong.
I used to wonder why that should be wrong, but when I considered the practice, I realized that a meditator must have sati, he must be circumspect.
Whether talking, touching or holding things, he must first thoroughly consider.
The error in this case is that there is no sati, or insufficient sati, or a lack of concern at that time.
Take another example: it's only eleven o'clock in the morning but at the time the sky is cloudy, we can't see the sun, and we have no clock.
Now suppose we estimate that it's probably afternoon… we really feel that it's afternoon… and yet we proceed to eat something.
We start eating and then the clouds part and we see from the position of the sun that it's only just past eleven.
This is still an offense.
I used to wonder, “Eh?
It's not yet past mid-day, why is this an offense?
An offense is incurred here because of negligence, carelessness, we don't thoroughly consider.
There is a lack of restraint.
If there is doubt and we act on the doubt, there is a dukkata offense just for acting in the face of the doubt.
We think that it is afternoon when in fact it isn't.
The act of eating is not wrong in itself, but there is an offense here because we are careless and negligent.
If it really is afternoon but we think it isn't, then it's the heavier pacittiya offense.
If we act with doubt, whether the action is wrong or not, we still incur an offense.
If the action is not wrong in itself it is the lesser offense; if it is wrong then the heavier offense is incurred.
Therefore the Vinaya can get quite bewildering.
At one time I went to see Venerable Ajahn Mun.
At that time I had just begun to practice.
I had read the Pubbasikkha and could understand that fairly well.
Then I went on to read the Visuddhimagga, where the author writes of the Silanidesa, Samadhinidesa and Paññanidesa… I felt my head was going to burst!
After reading that, I felt that it was beyond the ability of a human being to practice.
But then I reflected that the Buddha would not teach something that is impossible to practice.
He wouldn't teach it and he wouldn't declare it, because those things would be useful neither to himself nor to others.
The Silanidesa is extremely meticulous, the Samadhinidesa more so, and the Paññanidesa even more so!
I sat and thought, “Well, I can't go any further.
There's no way ahead.” It was as if I'd reached a dead-end.
At this stage I was struggling with my practice… I was stuck.
It so happened that I had a chance to go and see Venerable Ajahn Mun, so I asked him: “Venerable Ajahn, what am I to do?
I've just begun to practice but I still don't know the right way.
I have so many doubts I can't find any foundation at all in the practice.
He asked, “What's the problem?
“In the course of my practice I picked up the Visuddhimagga and read it, but it seems impossible to put into practice.
The contents of the Silanidesa, Samadhinidesa and Paññanidesa seem to be completely impractical.
I don't think there is anybody in the world who could do it, it's so detailed and meticulous.
To memorize every single rule would be impossible, it's beyond me.
He said to me: “Venerable… there's a lot, it's true, but it's really only a little.
If we were to take account of every training rule in the Silanidesa that would be difficult… true… But actually, what we call the Silanidesa has evolved from the human mind.
If we train this mind to have a sense of shame and a fear of wrong-doing, we will then be restrained, we will be cautious…
“This will condition us to be content with little, with few wishes, because we can't possibly look after a lot.
When this happens our sati becomes stronger.
We will be able to maintain sati at all times.
Wherever we are we will make the effort to maintain thorough sati.
Caution will be developed.
Whatever you doubt don't say it, don't act on it.
If there's anything you don't understand, ask the teacher.
Trying to practice every single training rule would indeed be burdensome, but we should examine whether we are prepared to admit our faults or not.
Do we accept them?
This teaching is very important.
It's not so much that we must know every single training rule, if we know how to train our own minds.
“All that stuff that you've been reading arises from the mind.
If you still haven't trained your mind to have sensitivity and clarity you will be doubting all the time.
You should try to bring the teachings of the Buddha into your mind.
Be composed in mind.
Whatever arises that you doubt, just give it up.
If you don't really know for sure then don't say it or do it.
For instance, if you wonder, “Is this wrong or not?” — that is, you're not really sure — then don't say it, don't act on it, don't discard your restraint.
As I sat and listened, I reflected that this teaching conformed with the eight ways for measuring the true teaching of the Buddha: Any teaching that speaks of the diminishing of defilements; which leads out of suffering; which speaks of renunciation; of contentment with little; of humility and disinterest in rank and status; of aloofness and seclusion; of diligent effort; of being easy to maintain… these eight qualities are characteristics of the true Dhamma-vinaya, the teaching of the Buddha.
anything in contradiction to these is not.
“If we are genuinely sincere we will have a sense of shame and a fear of wrongdoing.
We will know that if there is doubt in our mind we will not act on it nor speak on it.
The Silanidesa is only words.
For example, hiri-ottappa in the books is one thing, but in our minds it is another.
Studying the Vinaya with Venerable Ajahn Mun I learned many things.
As I sat and listened, understanding arose.
So, when it comes to the Vinaya I've studied considerably.
Some days during the Rains Retreat I would study from six o'clock in the evening through till dawn.
I understand it sufficiently.
All the factors of apatti which are covered in the Pubbasikkha I wrote down in a notebook and kept in my bag.
I really put effort into it, but in later times I gradually let go.
It was too much.
I didn't know which was the essence and which was the trimming, I had just taken all of it.
When I understood more fully I let it drop off because it was too heavy.
I just put my attention into my own mind and gradually did away with the texts.
However, when I teach the monks here I still take the Pubbasikkha as my standard.
For many years here at Wat Ba Pong it was I myself who read it to the assembly.
In those days I would ascend the Dhamma-seat and go on until at least eleven o'clock or midnight, some days even one or two o'clock in the morning.
We were interested.
And we trained.
After listening to the Vinaya reading we would go and consider what we'd heard.
You can't really understand the Vinaya just by listening to it.
Having listened to it you must examine it and delve into it further.
Even though I studied these things for many years my knowledge was still not complete, because there were so many ambiguities in the texts.
Now that it's been such a long time since I looked at the books, my memory of the various training rules has faded somewhat, but within my mind there is no deficiency.
There is a standard there.
There is no doubt, there is understanding.
I put away the books and concentrated on developing my own mind.
I don't have doubts about any of the training rules.
The mind has an appreciation of virtue, it won't dare do anything wrong, whether in public or in private.
I do not kill animals, even small ones.
If someone were to ask me to intentionally kill an ant or a termite, to squash one with my hand, for instance, I couldn't do it, even if they were to offer me thousands of baht to do so.
Even one ant or termite!
The ant's life would have greater value to me.
However, it may be that I may cause one to die, such as when something crawls up my leg and I brush it off.
Maybe it dies, but when I look into my mind there is no feeling of guilt.
There is no wavering or doubt.
Why?
Because there was no intention.
Silam vadami bhikkhave cetanaham: “Intention is the essence of moral training.” Looking at it in this way I see that there was no intentional killing.
Sometimes while walking I may step on an insect and kill it.
In the past, before I really understood, I would really suffer over things like that.
I would think I had committed an offense.
“What?
There was no intention.” “There was no intention, but I wasn't being careful enough!” I would go on like this, fretting and worrying.
So this Vinaya is something which can disturb practitioners of Dhamma, but it also has its value, in keeping with what the teachers say — “Whatever training rules you don't yet know you should learn.
If you don't know you should question those who do.” They really stress this.
Now if we don't know the training rules, we won't be aware of our transgressions against them.
Take, for example, a Venerable Thera of the past, Ajahn Pow of Wat Kow Wong Got in Lopburi Province.
One day a certain Maha, a disciple of his, was sitting with him, when some women came up and asked,
“Luang Por!
We want to invite you to go with us on an excursion, will you go?
Luang Por Pow didn't answer.
The Maha sitting near him thought that Venerable Ajahn Pow hadn't heard, so he said,
“Luang Por, Luang Por!
Did you hear?
These women invited you to go for a trip.
He said, “I heard.
The women asked again, “Luang Por, are you going or not?
He just sat there without answering, and so nothing came of the invitation.
When they had gone, the Maha said,
“Luang Por, why didn't you answer those women?
He said, “Oh, Maha, don't you know this rule?
Those people who were here just now were all women.
If women invite you to travel with them you should not consent.
If they make the arrangements themselves that's fine.
If I want to go I can, because I didn't take part in making the arrangements.
“The Maha sat and thought, “Oh, I've really made a fool of myself.
The Vinaya states that to make an arrangement, and then travel together with, women, even though it isn't as a couple, is a pacittiya offense.
Take another case.
Lay people would bring money to offer Venerable Ajahn Pow on a tray.
He would extend his receiving cloth, holding it at one end.
But when they brought the tray forward to lay it on the cloth he would retract his hand from the cloth.
Then he would simply abandon the money where it lay.
He knew it was there, but he would take no interest in it, just get up and walk away, because in the Vinaya it is said that if one doesn't consent to the money it isn't necessary to forbid laypeople from offering it.
If he had desire for it, he would have to say, “Householder, this is not allowable for a monk.” He would have to tell them.
If you have desire for it, you must forbid them from offering that which is unallowable.
However, if you really have no desire for it, it isn't necessary.
You just leave it there and go.
Although the Ajahn and his disciples lived together for many years, still some of his disciples didn't understand Ajahn Pow's practice.
This is a poor state of affairs.
As for myself, I looked into and contemplated many of Venerable Ajahn Pow's subtler points of practice.
The Vinaya can even cause some people to disrobe.
When they study it all the doubts come up.
It goes right back into the past… “my ordination, was it proper?
Was my preceptor pure?
None of the monks who sat in on my ordination knew anything about the Vinaya, were they sitting at the proper distance?
Was the chanting correct?” The doubts come rolling on… “The hall I ordained in, was it proper?
It was so small…” They doubt everything and fall into hell.
So until you know how to ground your mind it's really difficult.
You have to be very cool, you can't just jump into things.
But to be so cool that you don't bother to look into things is wrong also.
I was so confused I almost disrobed because I saw so many faults within my own practice and that of some of my teachers.
I was on fire and couldn't sleep because of those doubts.
The more I doubted, the more I meditated, the more I practiced.
Wherever doubt arose I practiced right at that point.
Wisdom arose.
Things began to change.
It's hard to describe the change that took place.
The mind changed until there was no more doubt.
I don't know how it changed, if I were to tell someone they probably wouldn't understand.
So I reflected on the teaching Paccattam veditabbo viññuhi — the wise must know for themselves.
It must be a knowing that arises through direct experience.
Studying the Dhamma-vinaya is certainly correct but if it's just the study it's still lacking.
If you really get down to the practice you begin to doubt everything.
Before I started to practice I wasn't interested in the minor offenses, but when I started practicing, even the dukkata offenses became as important as the parajika offenses.
Before, the dukkata offenses seemed like nothing, just a trifle.
That's how I saw them.
In the evening you could confess them and they would be done with.
Then you could transgress them again.
This sort of confession is impure, because you don't stop, you don't decide to change.
There is no restraint, you simply do it again and again.
There is no perception of the truth, no letting go.
Actually, in terms of ultimate truth, it's not necessary to go through the routine of confessing offenses.
If we see that our mind is pure and there is no trace of doubt, then those offenses drop off right there.
That we are not yet pure is because we still doubt, we still waver.
We are not really pure so we can't let go.
We don't see ourselves, this is the point.
This Vinaya of ours is like a fence to guard us from making mistakes, so it's something we need to be scrupulous with.
If you don't see the true value of the Vinaya for yourself it's difficult.
Many years before I came to Wat Ba Pong I decided I would give up money.
For the greater part of a Rains Retreat I had thought about it.
In the end I grabbed my wallet and walked over to a certain Maha who was living with me at the time, setting the wallet down in front of him.
“Here, Maha, take this money.
From today onwards, as long as I'm a monk, I will not receive or hold money.
You can be my witness.
“You keep it, Venerable, you may need it for your studies”… The Venerable Maha wasn't keen to take the money, he was embarrassed…
“Why do you want to throw away all this money?
“You don't have to worry about me.
I've made my decision.
I decided last night.
From the day he took that money it was as if a gap had opened between us.
We could no longer understand each other.
He's still my witness to this very day.
Ever since that day I haven't used money or engaged in any buying or selling.
I've been restrained in every way with money.
I was constantly wary of wrongdoing, even though I hadn't done anything wrong.
Inwardly I maintained the meditation practice.
I no longer needed wealth, I saw it as a poison.
Whether you give poison to a human being, a dog or anything else, it invariably causes death or suffering.
If we see clearly like this we will be constantly on our guard not to take that “poison.” When we clearly see the harm in it, it's not difficult to give up.
Regarding food and meals brought as offerings, if I doubted them I wouldn't accept them.
No matter how delicious or refined the food might be, I wouldn't eat it.
Take a simple example, like raw pickled fish.
Suppose you are living in a forest and you go on almsround and receive only rice and some pickled fish wrapped in leaves.
When you return to your dwelling and open the packet you find that it's raw pickled fish… just throw it away!
Eating plain rice is better than transgressing the precepts.
It has to be like this before you can say you really understand, then the Vinaya becomes simpler.
If other monks wanted to give me requisites, such as bowl, razor or whatever, I wouldn't accept, unless I knew them as fellow practitioners with a similar standard of Vinaya.
Why not?
How can you trust someone who is unrestrained?
They can do all sorts of things.
Unrestrained monks don't see the value of the Vinaya, so it's possible that they could have obtained those things in improper ways.
I was as scrupulous as this.
As a result, some of my fellow monks would look askance at me… “He doesn't socialize, he won't mix…” I was unmoved: “Sure, we can mix when we die.
When it comes to death we are all in the same boat,” I thought.
I lived with endurance.
I was one who spoke little.
If others criticized my practice I was unmoved.
Why?
Because even if I explained to them they wouldn't understand.
They knew nothing about practice.
Like those times when I would be invited to a funeral ceremony and somebody would say, “…Don't listen to him!
Just put the money in his bag and don't say anything about it… don't let him know.” I would say, “Hey, do you think I'm dead or something?
Just because one calls alcohol perfume doesn't make it become perfume, you know.
But you people, when you want to drink alcohol you call it perfume, then go ahead and drink.
You must be crazy!”.
The Vinaya, then, can be difficult.
You have to be content with little, aloof.
You must see, and see right.
Once, when I was traveling through Saraburi, my group went to stay in a village temple for a while.
The Abbot there had about the same seniority as myself.
In the morning, we would all go on almsround together, then come back to the monastery and put down our bowls.
Presently the laypeople would bring dishes of food into the hall and set them down.
Then the monks would go and pick them up, open them and lay them in a line to be formally offered.
One monk would put his hand on the dish at the other end.
And that was it!
With that the monks would bring them over and distribute them to be eaten.
About five monks were traveling with me at the time, but not one of us would touch that food.
On almsround all we received was plain rice, so we sat with them and ate plain rice, none of us would dare eat the food from those dishes.
This went on for quite a few days, until I began to sense that the Abbot was disturbed by our behavior.
One of his monks had probably gone to him and said, “Those visiting monks won't eat any of the food.
I don't know what they're up to.
I had to stay there for a few days more, so I went to the Abbot to explain.
I said, “Venerable Sir, may I have a moment please?
At this time I have some business which means I must call on your hospitality for some days, but in doing so I'm afraid there may be one or two things which you and your fellow monks find puzzling: namely, concerning our not eating the food which has been offered by the laypeople.
I'd like to clarify this with you, sir.
It's really nothing, it's just that I've learned to practice like this… that is, the receiving of the offerings, sir.
When the lay people lay the food down and then the monks go and open the dishes, sort them out and then have them formally offered… this is wrong.
It's a dukkata offense.
Specifically, to handle or touch food which hasn't yet been formally offered into a monk's hands, “ruins” that food.
According to the Vinaya, any monk who eats that food incurs an offense.
“It's simply this one point, sir.
It's not that I'm criticizing anybody, or that I'm trying to force you or your monks to stop practicing like this… not at all.
I just wanted to let you know of my good intentions, because it will be necessary for me to stay here for a few more days.
He lifted his hands in añjali, “Sadhu!
Excellent!
I've never yet seen a monk who keeps the minor rules in Saraburi.
there aren't any to be found these days.
If there still are such monks they must live outside of Saraburi.
May I commend you.
I have no objections at all, that's very good.
The next morning when we came back from almsround not one of the monks would go near those dishes.
The laypeople themselves sorted them out and offered them, because they were afraid the monks wouldn't eat.
From that day onwards the monks and novices there seemed really on edge, so I tried to explain things to them, to put their minds at rest.
I think they were afraid of us, they just went into their rooms and closed themselves in in silence.
For two or three days I tried to make them feel at ease because they were so ashamed, I really had nothing against them.
I didn't say things like “There's not enough food,” or “bring 'this' or 'that' food.” Why not?
Because I had fasted before, sometimes for seven or eight days.
Here I had plain rice, I knew I wouldn't die.
Where I got my strength from was the practice, from having studied and practiced accordingly.
I took the Buddha as my example.
Wherever I went, whatever others did, I wouldn't involve myself.
I devoted myself solely to the practice, because I cared for myself, I cared for the practice.
Those who don't keep the Vinaya or practice meditation and those who do practice can't live together, they must go separate ways.
I didn't understand this myself in the past.
As a teacher I taught others but I didn't practice.
This is really bad.
When I looked deeply into it, my practice and my knowledge were as far apart as earth and sky.
Therefore, those who want to go and set up meditation centers in the forest… don't do it.
If you don't yet really know, don't bother trying, you'll only make a mess of it.
Some monks think that going to live in the forest they will find peace, but they still don't understand the essentials of practice.
They cut grass for themselves, do everything themselves… Those who really know the practice aren't interested in places like this, they won't prosper.
Doing it like that won't lead to progress.
No matter how peaceful the forest may be you can't progress if you do it wrong.
They see the forest monks living in the forest and go to live in the forest like them, but it's not the same.
The robes are not the same, eating habits are not the same, everything is different.
Namely, they don't train themselves, they don't practice.
The place is wasted, it doesn't really work.
If it does work, it does so only as a venue for showing off or publicizing, just like a medicine show.
It goes no further than that.
Those who have only practiced a little and then go to teach others are not yet ripe, they don't really understand.
In a short time they give up and it falls apart.
It just brings trouble.
So we must study somewhat, look at the Navakovada, what does it say?
Study it, memorize it, until you understand.
From time to time ask your teacher concerning the finer points, he will explain them.
Study like this until you really understand the Vinaya.
Today we are meeting together as we do every year after the annual Dhamma examinations.
At this time all of you should reflect on the importance of carrying out the various duties of the monastery, those toward the preceptor and those toward the teachers.
These are what hold us together as a single group, enabling us to live in harmony and concord.
They are also what lead us to have respect for each other, which in turn benefits the community.
In all communities, from the time of the Buddha till the present, no matter what form they may take, if the residents have no mutual respect they cannot succeed.
Whether they be secular communities or monastic ones, if they lack mutual respect they have no solidarity.
If there is no mutual respect, negligence sets in and the practice eventually degenerates.
Our community of Dhamma practitioners has lived here for about twenty five years now, steadily growing, but it could deteriorate.
We must understand this point.
But if we are all heedful, have mutual respect and continue to maintain the standards of practice, I feel that our harmony will be firm.
Our practice as a group will be a source of growth for Buddhism for a long time to come.
Now in regard to the study and the practice, they are a pair.
Buddhism has grown and flourished until the present time because of the study going hand in hand with practice.
If we simply learn the scriptures in a heedless way negligence sets in… For example, in the first year here we had seven monks for the Rains Retreat.
At that time, I thought to myself, “Whenever monks start studying for Dhamma Examinations the practice seems to degenerate.” Considering this, I tried to determine the cause, so I began to teach the monks who were there for the Rains Retreat — all seven of them.
I taught for about forty days, from after the meal till six in the evening, every day.
The monks went for the exams and it turned out there was a good result in that respect, all seven of them passed.
That much was good, but there was a certain complication regarding those who were lacking in circumspection.
To study, it is necessary to do a lot of reciting and repeating.
Those who are unrestrained and unreserved tend to grow lax with the meditation practice and spend all their time studying, repeating and memorizing.
This causes them to throw out their old abiding, their standards of practice.
And this happens very often.
So it was when they had finished their studies and taken their exams I could see a change in the behavior of the monks.
There was no walking meditation, only a little sitting, and an increase in socializing.
There was less restraint and composure.
Actually, in our practice, when you do walking meditation, you should really determine to walk; when sitting in meditation, you should concentrate on doing just that.
Whether you are standing, walking, sitting or lying down, you should strive to be composed.
But when people do a lot of study, their minds are full of words, they get high on the books and forget themselves.
They get lost in externals.
Now this is so only for those who don't have wisdom, who are unrestrained and don't have steady sati.
For these people studying can be a cause for decline.
When such people are engaged in study they don't do any sitting or walking meditation and become less and less restrained.
Their minds become more and more distracted.
Aimless chatter, lack of restraint and socializing become the order of the day.
This is the cause for the decline of the practice.
It's not because of the study in itself, but because certain people don't make the effort, they forget themselves.
Actually the scriptures are pointers along the path of practice.
If we really understand the practice, then reading or studying are both further aspects of meditation.
But if we study and then forget ourselves it gives rise to a lot of talking and fruitless activity.
People throw out the meditation practice and soon want to disrobe.
Most of those who study and fail soon disrobe.
It's not that the study is not good, or that the practice is not right.
It's that people fail to examine themselves.
Seeing this, in the second rains retreat I stopped teaching the scriptures.
Many years later more and more young men came to become monks.
Some of them knew nothing about the Dhamma-Vinaya and were ignorant of the texts, so I decided to rectify the situation, asking those senior monks who had already studied to teach, and they have taught up until the present time.
This is how we came to have studying here.
However, every year when the exams are finished, I ask all the monks to re-establish their practice.
All those scriptures which aren't directly concerned with the practice, put them away in the cupboards.
Re-establish yourselves, go back to the regular standards.
Re-establish the communal practices such as coming together for the daily chanting.
This is our standard.
Do it even if only to resist your own laziness and aversion.
This encourages diligence.
Don't discard your basic practices: eating little, speaking little, sleeping little; restraint and composure; aloofness; regular walking and sitting meditation; meeting together regularly at the appropriate times.
Please make an effort with these, every one of you.
Don't let this excellent opportunity go to waste.
Do the practice.
You have this chance to practice here because you live under the guidance of the teacher.
He protects you on one level, so you should all devote yourselves to the practice.
You've done walking meditation before, now also you should sit.
In the past you've chanted together in the mornings and evenings, and now also you should make the effort.
These are your specific duties, please apply yourselves to them.
Those who simply “kill time” in the robes don't have any strength, you know.
The ones who are floundering, homesick, confused… do you see them?
These are the ones who don't put their minds into the practice.
They don't have any work to do.
We can't just lie around here.
Being a Buddhist monk or novice you live and eat well, you shouldn't take it for granted.
Kamasukhallikanuyogo is a danger.
Make an effort to find your own practice.
Whatever is faulty, work to rectify, don't get lost in externals.
One who has zeal never misses walking and sitting meditation, never lets up in the maintenance of restraint and composure.
Just observe the monks here.
Whoever, having finished the meal and any business there may be, having hung out his robes, walks meditation — and when we walk past his kuti we see the walking path a well-worn trail, and we see it often — this monk is not bored with the practice.
This is one who has effort, who has zeal.
If all of you devote yourselves like this to the practice, then not many problems will arise.
If you don't abide with the practice, the walking and sitting meditation, there's nothing more than just traveling around.
Not liking it here you go traveling over there; not liking it there you come touring back here.
That's all there is to it, following your noses everywhere.
These people don't persevere, it's good enough.
You don't have to do a lot of traveling around, just stay here and develop the practice, learn it in detail.
Traveling round can wait till later, it's not difficult.
Make an effort, all of you.
Prosperity and decline hinge on this.
If you really want to do things properly, then study and practice in proportion; use both of them together.
It's like the body and the mind.
If the mind is at ease and the body free of disease and healthy, then the mind becomes composed.
If the mind is confused, even if the body is strong there will be difficulty, let alone when the body experiences discomfort.
The study of meditation is the study of cultivation and relinquishment.
What I mean by study here is: whenever the mind experiences a sensation, do we still cling to it?
Do we still create problems around it?
Do we still experience enjoyment or aversion over it?
To put it simply: Do we still get lost in our thoughts?
Yes, we do.
If we don't like something we react with aversion; if we do like it we react with pleasure, the mind becomes defiled and stained.
If this is the case then we must see that we still have faults, we are still imperfect, we still have work to do.
There must be more relinquishing and more persistent cultivation.
This is what I mean by studying.
If we get stuck on anything, we recognize that we are stuck.
We know what state we're in, and we work to correct ourselves.
Living with the teacher or apart from the teacher should be the same.
Some people are afraid.
They're afraid that if they don't walk meditation the teacher will upbraid or scold them.
This is good in a way, but in the true practice you don't need to be afraid of others, just be wary of faults arising within your own actions, speech or thoughts.
When you see faults in your actions, speech or thoughts you must guard yourselves.
Attano jodayattanam — “you must exhort yourself,” don't leave it to others to do.
We must quickly improve ourselves, know ourselves.
This is called “studying,” cultivating and relinquishing.
Look into this till you see it clearly.
Living in this way we rely on endurance, persevering in face of all defilements.
Although this is good, it is still on the level of “practicing the Dhamma without having seen it.” If we have practiced the Dhamma and seen it, then whatever is wrong we will have already given up, whatever is useful we will have cultivated.
Seeing this within ourselves, we experience a sense of well-being.
No matter what others say, we know our own mind, we are not moved.
We can be at peace anywhere.
Now the younger monks and novices who have just begun to practice may think that the senior Ajahn doesn't seem to do much walking or sitting meditation.
Don't imitate him in this.
You should emulate, but not imitate.
To emulate is one thing, to imitate another.
The fact is that the senior Ajahn dwells within his own particular contented abiding.
Even though he doesn't seem to practice externally, he practices inwardly.
Whatever is in his mind cannot be seen by the eye.
The practice of Buddhism is the practice of the mind.
Even though the practice may not be apparent in his actions or speech, the mind is a different matter.
Thus, a teacher who has practiced for a long time, who is proficient in the practice, may seem to let go of his actions and speech, but he guards his mind.
He is composed.
Seeing only his outer actions you may try to imitate him, letting go and saying whatever you want to say, but it's not the same thing.
You're not in the same league.
Think about this.
There's a real difference, you are acting from different places.
Although the Ajahn seems to simply sit around, he is not being careless.
He lives with things but it is not confused by them.
We can't see this, whatever is in his mind is invisible to us.
Don't judge simply by external appearances, the mind is the important thing.
When we speak, our minds follow that speech.
Whatever actions we do, our minds follow, but one who has practiced already may do or say things which his mind doesn't follow, because it adheres to Dhamma and Vinaya.
For example, sometimes the Ajahn may be severe with his disciples, his speech may appear to be rough and careless, his actions may seem coarse.
Seeing this, all we can see are his bodily and verbal actions, but the mind which adheres to Dhamma and Vinaya can't be seen.
Adhere to the Buddha's instruction: “Don't be heedless.” “Heedfulness is the way to the Deathless.
Heedfulness is death.” Consider this.
Whatever others do is not important, just don't be heedless, this is the important thing.
All I have been saying here is simply to warn you that now, having completed the exams, you have a chance to travel around and do many things.
May you all constantly remember yourselves as practitioners of the Dhamma; a practitioner must be collected, restrained and circumspect.
Consider the teaching which says “Bhikkhu: one who seeks alms.” If we define it this way our practice takes on one form… very coarse.
If we understand this word the way the Buddha defined it, as one who sees the danger of samsara, this is much more profound.
One who sees the danger of samsara is one who sees the faults, the liability of this world.
In this world there is so much danger, but most people don't see it, they see the pleasure and happiness of the world.
Now the Buddha says that a bhikkhu is one who sees the danger of samsara.
What is samsara?
The suffering of samsara is overwhelming, it's intolerable.
Happiness is also samsara.
The Buddha taught us not to cling to them.
If we don't see the danger of samsara, then when there is happiness we cling to the happiness and forget suffering.
We are ignorant of it, like a child who doesn't know fire.
If we understand Dhamma practice in this way… “Bhikkhu: one who sees the danger of samsara”… if we have this understanding, walking, sitting or lying down, wherever we may be, we will feel dispassion.
We reflect on ourselves, heedfulness is there.
Even sitting at ease, we feel this way.
Whatever we do we see this danger, so we are in a very different state.
This practice is called being “one who sees the danger of samsara.
One who sees the danger of samsara lives within samsara and yet doesn't.
That is, he understands concepts and he understands their transcendence.
Whatever such a person says is not like ordinary people.
Whatever he does is not the same, whatever he thinks is not the same.
His behavior is much wiser.
Therefore it is said: “Emulate but don't imitate.” There are two ways — emulation and imitation.
One who is foolish will grab on to everything.
You mustn't do that!
Don't forget yourselves.
As for me, this year my body is not so well.
Some things I will leave to the other monks and novices to help take care of.
Perhaps I will take a rest.
From time immemorial it's been this way, and in the world it's the same: as long as the father and mother are still alive, the children are well and prosperous.
When the parents die, the children separate.
Having been rich they become poor.
This is usually how it is, even in the lay life, and one can see it here as well.
For example, while the Ajahn is still alive everybody is well and prosperous.
As soon as he passes away decline begins to set in immediately.
Why is this?
Because while the teacher is still alive people become complacent and forget themselves.
They don't really make an effort with the study and the practice.
As in lay life, while the mother and father are still alive, the children just leave everything up to them.
They lean on their parents and don't know how to look after themselves.
When the parents die they become paupers.
In the monkhood it's the same.
If the Ajahn goes away or dies, the monks tend to socialize, break up into groups and drift into decline, almost every time.
Why is this?
It's because they forget themselves.
Living off the merits of the teacher everything runs smoothly.
When the teacher passes away, the disciples tend to split up.
Their views clash.
Those who think wrongly live in one place, those who think rightly live in another.
Those who feel uncomfortable leave their old associates and set up new places and start new lineages with their own groups of disciples.
This is how it goes.
In the present it's the same.
This is because we are at fault.
While the teacher is still alive we are at fault, we live heedlessly.
We don't take up the standards of practice taught by the Ajahn and establish them within our own hearts.
We don't really follow in his footsteps.
Even in the Buddha's time it was the same, remember the scriptures?
That old monk, what was his name…?
Subhadda Bhikkhu!
When Venerable Maha Kassapa was returning from Pava he asked an ascetic on the way, “Is the Lord Buddha faring well?” The ascetic answered: “The Lord Buddha entered Parinibbana seven days ago.
Those monks who were still unenlightened were grief-stricken, crying and wailing.
Those who had attained the Dhamma reflected to themselves, “Ah, the Buddha has passed away.
He has journeyed on.” But those who were still thick with defilements, such as Venerable Subhadda, said:
“What are you all crying for?
The Buddha has passed away.
That's good!
Now we can live at ease.
When the Buddha was still alive he was always bothering us with some rule or other, we couldn't do this or say that.
Now the Buddha has passed away, that's fine!
We can do whatever we want, say what we want… Why should you cry?
It's been so from way back then till the present day.
However that may be, even though it's impossible to preserve entirely… Suppose we had a glass and we took care to preserve it.
Each time we used it we cleaned it and put it away in a safe place.
Being very careful with that glass we can use it for a long time, and then when we've finished with it others can also use it.
Now, using glasses carelessly and breaking them every day, and using one glass for ten years before it breaks — which is better?
Our practice is like this.
For instance, if out of all of us living here, practicing steadily, only ten of you practice well, then Wat Ba Pong will prosper.
Just as in the villages: in the village of one hundred houses, even if there are only fifty good people that village will prosper.
Actually to find even ten would be difficult.
Or take a monastery like this one here: it is hard to find even five or six monks who have real commitment, who really do the practice.
In any case, we don't have any responsibilities now, other than to practice well.
Think about it, what do we own here?
We don't have wealth, possessions, and families any more.
Even food we take only once a day.
We've given up many things already, even better things than these.
As monks and novices we give up everything.
We own nothing.
All those things people really enjoy have been discarded by us.
Going forth as a Buddhist monk is in order to practice.
Why then should we hanker for other things, indulging in greed, aversion or delusion?
To occupy our hearts with other things is no longer appropriate.
Consider: why have we gone forth?
Why are we practicing?
We have gone forth to practice.
If we don't practice then we just lie around.
If we don't practice, then we are worse off than lay people, we don't have any function.
If we don't perform any function or accept our responsibilities it's a waste of the samana's life.
It contradicts the aims of a samana.
If this is the case then we are heedless.
Being heedless is like being dead.
Ask yourself, will you have time to practice when you die?
Constantly ask yourself, “When will I die?” If we contemplate in this way our mind will be alert every second, heedfulness will always be present.
When there is no heedlessness, sati — recollection of what is what — will automatically follow.
Wisdom will be clear, seeing all the things clearly as they are.
Recollection guards the mind, knowing the arising of sensations at all times, day and night.
that is to have sati.
To have sati is to be composed.
To be composed is to be heedful.
If one is heedful then one is practicing rightly.
This is our specific responsibility.
So today I would like to present this to you all.
If in the future you leave here for one of the branch monasteries or anywhere else, don't forget yourselves.
The fact is you are still not perfect, still not completed.
You still have a lot of work to do, many responsibilities to shoulder.
Namely, the practices of cultivation and relinquishment.
Be concerned about this, every one of you.
Whether you live at this monastery or a branch monastery, preserve the standards of practice.
Nowadays there are many of us, many branch temples.
All the branch monasteries owe their origination to Wat Ba Pong.
We could say that Wat Ba Pong was the 'parent', the teacher, the example for all branch monasteries.
So, especially the teachers, monks and novices of Wat Ba Pong should try to set the example, to be the guide for all the other branch monasteries, continuing to be diligent in the practices and responsibilities of a samana.
Wat Wana Potiyahn here is certainly very peaceful, but this is meaningless if our minds are not calm.
All places are peaceful.
That some may seem distracting is because of our minds.
However, a quiet place can help to become calm, by giving one the opportunity to train and thus harmonize with its calm.
You should all bear in mind that this practice is difficult.
To train other things is not so difficult, it's easy, but the human mind is hard to train.
The Lord Buddha trained his mind.
The mind is the important thing.
Everything within this body-mind system comes together at the mind.
The eyes, ears, nose, tongue and body all receive sensations and send them into the mind, which is the supervisor of all the other sense organs.
Therefore it is important to train the mind.
If the mind is well trained all problems come to an end.
If there are still problems it's because the mind still doubts, it doesn't know in accordance with the truth.
That is why there are problems.
So recognize that all of you have come fully prepared for practicing Dhamma.
Whether standing, walking, sitting or reclining, the tools you need with which to practice are well-provided, wherever you are.
They are there, just like the Dhamma.
The Dhamma is something which abounds everywhere.
Right here, on land or in water… wherever… the Dhamma is always there.
The Dhamma is perfect and complete, but it's our practice that's not yet complete.
The Lord, Fully Enlightened Buddha taught a means by which all of us may practice and come to know this Dhamma.
It isn't a big thing, only a small thing, but it's right.
For example, look at hair.
If we know even one strand of hair, then we know every strand, both our own and also that of others.
We know that they are all simply “hair.” By knowing one strand of hair we know it all.
Or consider people.
If we see the true nature of conditions within ourselves then we know all the other people in the world also, because all people are the same.
Dhamma is like this.
It's a small thing and yet it's big.
That is, to see the truth of one condition is to see the truth of them all.
When we know the truth as it is all problems come to an end.
Nevertheless, the training is difficult.
Why is it difficult?
It's difficult because of wanting, tanha.
If you don't “want” then you don't practice.
But if you practice out of desire you won't see the Dhamma.
Think about it, all of you.
If you don't want to practice you can't practice.
You must first want to practice in order to actually do the practice.
Whether stepping forward or stepping back you meet desire.
This is why the cultivators of the past have said that this practice is something that's extremely difficult to do.
You don't see Dhamma because of desire.
Sometimes desire is very strong, you want to see the Dhamma immediately, but the Dhamma is not your mind — your mind is not yet Dhamma.
The Dhamma is one thing and the mind is another.
It's not that whatever you like is Dhamma and whatever you don't like isn't.
That's not the way it goes.
Actually this mind of ours is simply a condition of Nature, like a tree in the forest.
If you want a plank or a beam it must come from the tree, but the tree is still only a tree.
It's not yet a beam or a plank.
Before it can really be of use to us we must take that tree and saw it into beams or planks.
It's the same tree but it becomes transformed into something else.
Intrinsically it's just a tree, a condition of Nature.
But in its raw state it isn't yet of much use to those who need timber.
Our mind is like this.
It is a condition of Nature.
As such it perceives thoughts, it discriminates into beautiful and ugly and so on.
This mind of ours must be further trained.
We can't just let it be.
It's a condition of Nature… train it to realize that it's a condition of Nature.
Improve on Nature so that it's appropriate to our needs, which is Dhamma.
Dhamma is something which must be practiced and brought within.
If you don't practice you won't know.
Frankly speaking, you won't know the Dhamma by just reading it or studying it.
Or if you do know it your knowledge is still defective.
For example, this spittoon here.
Everybody knows it's a spittoon but they don't fully know the spittoon.
Why don't they fully know it?
If I called this spittoon a saucepan, what would you say?
Suppose that every time I asked for it I said, “Please bring that saucepan over here,” that would confuse you.
Why so?
Because you don't fully know the spittoon.
If you did there would be no problem.
You would simply pick up that object and hand it to me, because actually there isn't any spittoon.
Do you understand?
It's a spittoon due to convention.
This convention is accepted all over the country, so it's spittoon.
But there isn't any real “spittoon.” If somebody wants to call it a saucepan it can be a saucepan.
It can be whatever you call it.
This is called “concept.” If we fully know the spittoon, even if somebody calls it a saucepan there's no problem.
Whatever others may call it we are unperturbed because we are not blind to its true nature.
This is one who knows Dhamma.
Now let's come back to ourselves.
Suppose somebody said, “You're crazy!”, or, “You're stupid,” for example.
Even though it may not be true, you wouldn't feel so good.
Everything becomes difficult because of our ambitions to have and to achieve.
Because of these desires to get and to be, because we don't know according to the truth, we have no contentment.
If we know the Dhamma, are enlightened to the Dhamma, greed, aversion and delusion will disappear.
When we understand the way things are there is nothing for them to rest on.
Why is the practice so difficult and arduous?
Because of desires.
As soon as we sit down to meditate we want to become peaceful.
If we didn't want to find peace we wouldn't sit, we wouldn't practice.
As soon as we sit down we want peace to be right there, but wanting the mind to be calm makes for confusion, and we feel restless.
This is how it goes.
So the Buddha says, “Don't speak out of desire, don't sit out of desire, don't walk out of desire,… Whatever you do, don't do it with desire.” Desire means wanting.
If you don't want to do something you won't do it.
If our practice reaches this point we can get quite discouraged.
How can we practice?
As soon as we sit down there is desire in the mind.
It's because of this that the body and mind are difficult to observe.
If they are not the self nor belonging to self then who do they belong to?
It's difficult to resolve these things, we must rely on wisdom.
The Buddha says we must practice by letting go.
It's hard to understand this practice of “letting go,” isn't it?
If we let go then we just don't practice, right?
Because we've let go.
Suppose we went to buy some coconuts in the market, and while we were carrying them back someone asked:
“What did you buy those coconuts for?
“I bought them to eat.
“Are you going to eat the shells as well?
“No.
“I don't believe you.
If you're not going to eat the shells then why did you buy them also?
Well what do you say?
How are you going to answer their question?
We practice with desire.
If we didn't have desire we wouldn't practice.
Practicing with desire is tanha.
Contemplating in this way can give rise to wisdom, you know.
For example, those coconuts: Are you going to eat the shells as well?
Of course not.
Then why do you take them?
Because the time hasn't yet come for you to throw them away.
They're useful for wrapping up the coconut in.
If, after eating the coconut, you throw the shells away, there is no problem.
Our practice is like this.
The Buddha said, “Don't act on desire, don't speak from desire, don't eat with desire.” Standing, walking, sitting or reclining… whatever… don't do it with desire.
This means to do it with detachment.
It's just like buying the coconuts from the market.
We're not going to eat the shells but it's not yet time to throw them away.
We keep them first.
This is how the practice is.
Concept and Transcendence are co-existent, just like a coconut.
The flesh, the husk and the shell are all together.
When we buy it we buy the whole lot.
If somebody wants to accuse us of eating coconut shells that's their business, we know what we're doing.
Wisdom is something each of us find for oneself.
To see it we must go neither fast nor slow.
What should we do?
Go to where there is neither fast nor slow.
Going fast or going slow are not the way.
But we're all impatient, we're in a hurry.
As soon as we begin we want to rush to the end, we don't want to be left behind.
We want to succeed.
When it comes to fixing their minds for meditation some people go too far… They light the incense, prostrate and make a vow, “As long as this incense is not yet completely burnt I will not rise from my sitting, even if I collapse or die, no matter what… I'll die sitting” Having made their vow they start their sitting.
As soon as they start to sit Mara's hordes come rushing at them from all sides.
They've only sat for an instant and already they think the incense must be finished.
They open their eyes for a peek… “Oh, There's still ages left!
They grit their teeth and sit some more, feeling hot, flustered, agitated and confused… Reaching the breaking point they think, “it must be finished by now.”… Have another peek… “Oh, no!
It's not even half-way yet!
Two or three times and it's still not finished, so they just give up, pack it in and sit there hating themselves.
“I'm so stupid, I'm so hopeless!” They sit and hate themselves, feeling like a hopeless case.
This just gives rise to frustration and hindrances.
This is called the hindrance of ill-will.
They can't blame others so they blame themselves.
And why is this?
It's all because of wanting.
Actually it isn't necessary to go through all that.
To concentrate means to concentrate with detachment, not to concentrate yourself into knots.
But maybe we read the scriptures, about the life of the Buddha, how he sat under the Bodhi tree and determined to himself,
“As long as I have still not attained Supreme Enlightenment I will not rise from this place, even if my blood dries up.
Reading this in the books you may think of trying it yourself.
You'll do it like the Buddha.
But you haven't considered that your car is only a small one.
The Buddha's car was a really big one, he could take it all in one go.
With only your tiny, little car, how can you possibly take it all at once?
It's a different story altogether.
Why do we think like that?
Because we're too extreme.
Sometimes we go too low, sometimes we go too high.
The point of balance is so hard to find.
Now I'm only speaking from experience.
In the past my practice was like this.
Practicing in order to get beyond wanting… if we don't want, can we practice?
I was stuck here.
But to practice with wanting is suffering.
I didn't know what to do, I was baffled.
Then I realized that the practice which is steady is the important thing.
One must practice consistently.
They call this the practice that is “consistent in all postures.” Keep refining the practice, don't let it become a disaster.
Practice is one thing, disaster is another.
Most people usually create disaster.
When they feel lazy they don't bother to practice, they only practice when they feel energetic.
This is how I tended to be.
All of you ask yourselves now, is this right?
To practice when you feel like it, not when you don't: is that in accordance with the Dhamma?
Is it straight?
Is it in line with the Teaching?
This is what makes practice inconsistent.
Whether you feel like it or not you should practice just the same: this is how the Buddha taught.
Most people wait till they're in the mood before practicing, when they don't feel like it they don't bother.
This is as far as they go.
This is called “disaster,” it's not practice.
In the true practice, whether you are happy or depressed you practice; whether it's easy or difficult you practice; whether it's hot or cold you practice.
It's straight like this.
In the real practice, whether standing, walking, sitting or reclining you must have the intention to continue the practice steadily, making your sati consistent in all postures.
At first thought it seems as if you should stand for as long as you walk, walk for as long as you sit, sit for as long as you lie down… I've tried it but I couldn't do it.
If a meditator were to make his standing, walking, sitting and lying down all equal, how many days could he keep it up for?
Stand for five minutes, sit for five minutes, lie down for five minutes… I couldn't do it for very long.
So I sat down and thought about it some more.
“What does it all mean?
People in this world can't practice like this!
Then I realized… “Oh, that's not right, it can't be right because it's impossible to do.
Standing, walking, sitting, reclining… make them all consistent.
To make the postures consistent the way they explain it in the books is impossible.
But it is possible to do this: The mind… just consider the mind.
To have sati, recollection, sampajañña, self awareness and pañña, all-round wisdom… this you can do.
This is something that's really worth practicing.
This means that while standing we have sati, while walking we have sati, while sitting we have sati, and while reclining we have sati, — consistently.
This is possible.
We put awareness into our standing, walking, sitting, lying down — into all postures.
When the mind has been trained like this it will constantly recollect Buddho, Buddho, Buddho… which is knowing.
Knowing what?
Knowing what is right and what is wrong at all times.
Yes, this is possible.
This is getting down to the real practice.
That is, whether standing, walking, sitting or lying down there is continuous sati.
Then you should understand those conditions which should be given up and those which should be cultivated.
You know happiness, you know unhappiness.
When you know happiness and unhappiness your mind will settle at the point which is free of happiness and unhappiness.
Happiness is the loose path, kamasukhallikanuyogo.
Unhappiness is the tight path, attakilamathanuyogo.
If we know these two extremes, we pull it back.
We know when the mind is inclining towards happiness or unhappiness and we pull it back, we don't allow it to lean over.
We have this sort of awareness, we adhere to the One Path, the single Dhamma.
We adhere to the awareness, not allowing the mind to follow its inclinations.
But in your practice it doesn't tend to be like that, does it?
You follow your inclinations.
If you follow your inclinations it's easy, isn't it?
But this is the ease which causes suffering, like someone who can't be bothered working.
He takes it easy, but when the time comes to eat he hasn't got anything.
This is how it goes.
So I've contended with many aspects of the Buddha's teaching in the past, but I couldn't really beat him.
Nowadays I accept it.
I accept that the many teachings of the Buddha are straight down the line, so I've taken those teachings and used them to train both myself and others.
The practice which is important is patipada.
What is patipada?
It is simply all our various activities, standing, walking, sitting, reclining and everything else.
This is the patipada of the body.
Now the patipada of the mind: how many times in the course of today have you felt low?
How many times have you felt high?
Have there been any noticeable feelings?
We must know ourselves like this.
Having seen those feelings can we let go?
Whatever we can't yet let go of we must work with.
When we see that we can't yet let go of some particular feeling we must take it and examine it with wisdom.
Reason it out.
Work with it.
This is practice.
For example when you are feeling zealous, practice, and then when you feel lazy, try to continue the practice.
If you can't continue at “full speed” then at least do half as much.
Don't just waste the day away by being lazy and not practicing.
Doing that will lead to disaster, it's not the way of a cultivator.
Now I've heard some people say, “Oh, this year I was really in a bad way.
“How come?
“I was sick all year.
I couldn't practice at all.
Oh!
If they don't practice when death is near when will they ever practice?
If they're feeling well do you think they'll practice?
No, they only get lost in happiness.
If they're suffering they still don't practice, they get lost in that.
I don't know when people think they're going to practice!
They can only see that they're sick, in pain, almost dead from fever… that's right, bring it on heavy, that's where the practice is.
When people are feeling happy it just goes to their heads and they get vain and conceited.
We must cultivate our practice.
What this means is that whether you are happy or unhappy you must practice just the same.
If you are feeling well you should practice, and if you are feeling sick you should also practice.
Those who think, “This year I couldn't practice at all, I was sick the whole time”… if these people are feeling well, they just walk around singing songs.
This is wrong thinking, not right thinking.
This is why the cultivators of the past have all maintained the steady training of the heart.
If things are to go wrong, just let them be with the body, not in mind.
There was a time in my practice, after I had been practicing about five years, when I felt that living with others was a hindrance.
I would sit in my kuti and try to meditate and people would keep coming by for a chat and disturbing me.
I ran off to live by myself.
I thought I couldn't practice with those people bothering me.
I was fed up, so I went to live in a small, deserted monastery in the forest, near a small village.
I stayed there alone, speaking to no-one — because there was nobody else to speak to.
After I'd been there about fifteen days the thought arose, “Hmm.
It would be good to have a novice or pa-kow here with me.
He could help me out with some small jobs.” I knew it would come up, and sure enough, there it was!
“Hey!
You're a real character!
You say you're fed up with your friends, fed up with your fellow monks and novices, and now you want a novice.
What's this?
“No,” it says, “I want a good novice.
“There!
Where are all the good people, can you find any?
Where are you going to find a good person?
In the whole monastery there were only no-good people.
You must have been the only good person, to have run away like this!
…You have to follow it up like this, follow up the tracks of your thoughts until you see…
“Hmm.
This is the important one.
Where is there a good person to be found?
There aren't any good people, you must find goodness anywhere else, you must look within yourself.
If you are good in yourself then wherever you go will be good.
Whether others criticize or praise you, you are still good.
If you aren't good, then when others criticize you, you get angry, and when they praise you, you get pleased.
At that time I reflected on this and have found it to be true from that day up until the present.
Goodness must be found within.
As soon as I saw this, that feeling of wanting to run away disappeared.
In later times, whenever I had that desire arise I let it go.
Whenever it arose I was aware of it and kept my awareness on that.
Thus I had a solid foundation.
Wherever I lived, whether people condemned me or whatever they would say, I would reflect that the point is not whether they were good or bad.
Good or evil must be seen within ourselves.
However other people are, that's their concern.
Don't go thinking, “Oh, today is too hot,” or, “Today is too cold,” or, “Today is…”.
Whatever the day is like that's just the way it is.
Really you are simply blaming the weather for your own laziness.
We must see the Dhamma within ourselves, then there is a surer kind of peace.
So for all of you who have come to practice here, even though it's only for a few days, still many things will arise.
Many things may be arising which you're not even aware of.
There is some right thinking, some wrong thinking… many, many things.
So I say this practice is difficult.
Even though some of you may experience some peace when you sit in meditation, don't be in a hurry to congratulate yourselves.
Likewise, if there is some confusion, don't blame yourselves.
If things seem to be good, don't delight in them, and if they're not good don't be averse to them.
Just look at it all, look at what you have.
Just look, don't bother judging.
If it's good don't hold fast to it; if it's bad, don't cling to it.
Good and bad can both bite, so don't hold fast to them.
The practice is simply to sit, sit and watch it all.
Good moods and bad moods come and go as is their nature.
Don't only praise your mind or only condemn it, know the right time for these things.
When it's time for congratulations then congratulate it, but just a little, don't overdo it.
Just like teaching a child, sometimes you may have to spank it a little.
In our practice sometimes we may have to punish ourselves, but don't punish yourself all the time.
If you punish yourself all the time in a while you'll just give up the practice.
But then you can't give yourself a good time and take it easy either.
That's not the way to practice.
We practice according to the Middle Way.
What is the Middle Way?
This Middle Way is difficult to follow, you can't rely on your moods and desires.
Don't think that only sitting with the eyes closed is practice.
If you do think this way then quickly change your thinking!
Steady practice is having the attitude of practice while standing, walking, sitting and lying down.
When coming out of sitting meditation, reflect that you're simply changing postures.
If you reflect in this way you will have peace.
Wherever you are you will have this attitude of practice with you constantly, you will have a steady awareness within yourself.
Those of you who, having finished their evening sitting, simply indulge in their moods, spending the whole day letting the mind wander where it wants, will find that the next evening when sitting meditation all they get is the “backwash” from the day's aimless thinking.
There is no foundation of calm because they have let it go cold all day.
If you practice like this your mind gets gradually further and further from the practice.
When I ask some of my disciples, “How is your meditation going?”.
They say, “Oh, it's all gone now.” You see?
They can keep it up for a month or two but in a year or two it's all finished.
Why is this?
It's because they don't take this essential point into their practice.
When they've finished sitting they let go of their samadhi.
They start to sit for shorter and shorter periods, till they reach the point where as soon as they start to sit they want to finish.
Eventually they don't even sit.
It's the same with bowing to the Buddha-image.
At first they make the effort to prostrate every night before going to sleep, but after a while their minds begin to stray.
Soon they don't bother to prostrate at all, they just nod, till eventually it's all gone.
They throw out the practice completely.
Therefore, understand the importance of sati, practice constantly.
Right practice is steady practice.
Whether standing, walking, sitting or reclining the practice must continue.
This means that practice, meditation, is done in the mind, not in the body.
If our mind has zeal, is conscientious and ardent, then there will be awareness.
The mind is the important thing.
The mind is that which supervises everything we do.
When we understand properly then we practice properly.
When we practice properly we don't go astray.
Even if we only do a little that is still all right.
For example, when you finish sitting in meditation, remind yourselves that you are not actually finishing meditation, you are simply changing postures.
Your mind is still composed.
Whether standing, walking, sitting or reclining you have sati with you.
If you have this kind of awareness you can maintain your internal practice.
In the evening when you sit again the practice continues uninterrupted.
Your effort is unbroken, allowing the mind to attain calm.
This is called steady practice.
Whether we are talking or doing other things we should try to make the practice continuous.
If our mind has recollection and self-awareness continuously, our practice will naturally develop, it will gradually come together.
The mind will find peace, because it will know what is right and what is wrong.
It will see what is happening within us and realize peace.
If we are to develop sila, or samadhi we must first have pañña.
Some people think that they'll develop moral restraint one year, samadhi the next year and the year after that they'll develop wisdom.
They think these three things are separate.
They think that this year they will develop sila, but if the mind is not firm, how can they do it?
If there is no understanding, how can they do it?
Without samadhi or pañña, sila will be sloppy.
In fact these three come together at the same point.
When we have sila we have samadhi, when we have samadhi we have pañña.
They are all one, like a mango.
Whether it's small or fully grown, it's still a mango.
When it's ripe it's still the same mango.
If we think in simple terms like this we can see it more easily.
We don't have to learn a lot of things, just to know these things, to know our practice.
When it comes to meditation some people don't get what they want, so they just give up, saying they don't yet have the merit to practice meditation.
They can do bad things, they have that sort of talent, but they don't have the talent to do good.
They throw it in, saying they don't have a good enough foundation.
This is the way people are, they side with their defilements.
Now that you have this chance to practice, please understand that whether you find it difficult or easy to develop samadhi is entirely up to you, not the samadhi.
If it is difficult, it is because you are practicing wrongly.
In our practice we must have “Right View”.
If our view is right then everything else is right: Right View, Right Intention, Right Speech, Right Action, Right Livelihood, Right Effort, Right Recollection, Right Concentration — the Eightfold Path.
When there is Right View all the other factors will follow on.
Whatever happens, don't let your mind stray off the track.
Look within yourself and you will see clearly.
For the best practice, as I see it, it isn't necessary to read many books.
Take all the books and lock them away.
Just read your own mind.
You have all been burying yourselves in books from the time you entered school.
I think that now you have this opportunity and have the time, take the books, put them in a cupboard and lock the door.
Just read your mind.
Whenever something arises within the mind, whether you like it or not, whether it seems right or wrong, just cut it off with, “this is not a sure thing.” Whatever arises just cut it down, “not sure, not sure.” With just this single ax you can cut it all down.
It's all “not sure.
For the duration of this next month that you will be staying in this forest monastery, you should make a lot of headway.
You will see the truth.
This “not sure” is really an important one.
This one develops wisdom.
The more you look the more you will see “not sure”-ness.
After you've cut something off with “not sure” it may come circling round and pop up again.
Yes, it's truly “not sure.” Whatever pops up just stick this one label on it all…“not sure.” You stick the sign on…“not sure”… and in a while, when its turn comes, it crops up again… “Ah, not sure.” Dig here!
Not sure.
You will see this same old one who's been fooling you month in, month out, year in, year out, from the day you were born.
There's only this one who's been fooling you all along.
See this and realize the way things are.
When your practice reaches this point you won't cling to sensations, because they are all uncertain.
Have you ever noticed?
Maybe you see a clock and think, “Oh, this is nice.” Buy it and see… in not many days you're bored with it already.
“This pen is really beautiful,” so you take the trouble to buy one.
In not many months you tire of it again.
This is how it is.
Where is there any certainty?
If we see all these things as uncertain then their value fades away.
All things become insignificant.
Why should we hold on to things that have no value?
We keep them only as we might keep an old rag to wipe our feet with.
We see all sensations as equal in value because they all have the same nature.
When we understand sensations we understand the world.
The world is sensations and sensations are the world.
If we aren't fooled by sensations we aren't fooled by the world.
If we aren't fooled by the world we aren't fooled by sensations.
The mind which sees this will have a firm foundation of wisdom.
Such a mind will not have many problems.
Any problems it does have it can solve.
When there are no more problems there are no more doubts.
Peace arises in their stead.
This is called “Practice.” If we really practice it must be like this.
Take a look at the example of the Buddha.
Both in his own practice and in his methods for teaching the disciples he was exemplary.
The Buddha taught the standards of practice as skillful means for getting rid of conceit, he couldn't do the practice for us.
Having heard that teaching we must further teach ourselves, practice for ourselves.
The results will arise here, not at the teaching.
The Buddha's teaching can only enable us to get an initial understanding of the Dhamma, but the Dhamma is not yet within our hearts.
Why not?
Because we haven't yet practiced, we haven't yet taught ourselves.
The Dhamma arises at the practice.
If you know it, you know it through the practice.
If you doubt it, you doubt it at the practice.
Teachings from the Masters may be true, but simply listening to Dhamma is not yet enough to enable us to realize it.
The teaching simply points out the way to realize.
To realize the Dhamma we must take that teaching and bring it into our hearts.
That part which is for the body we apply to the body, that part which is for the speech we apply to the speech, and that part which is for the mind we apply to the mind.
This means that after hearing the teaching we must further teach ourselves to know that Dhamma, to be that Dhamma.
The Buddha said that those who simply believe others are not truly wise.
A wise person practices until he is one with the Dhamma, until he can have confidence in himself, independent of others.
On one occasion, while Venerable Sariputta was sitting, listening respectfully at his feet as the Buddha expounded the Dhamma, the Buddha turned to him and asked,
“Sariputta, do you believe this teaching?
Venerable Sariputta replied, “No, I don't yet believe it.
Now this is a good illustration.
Venerable Sariputta listened, and he took note.
When he said he didn't yet believe he wasn't being careless, he was speaking the truth.
He simply took note of that teaching, because he had not yet developed his own understanding of it, so he told the Buddha that he didn't yet believe — because he really didn't believe.
These words almost sound as if Venerable Sariputta was being rude, but actually he wasn't.
He spoke the truth, and the Buddha praised him for it.
“Good, good, Sariputta.
A wise person doesn't readily believe, he should consider first before believing.
Conviction in a belief can take various forms.
One form reasons according to Dhamma, while another form is contrary to the Dhamma.
This second way is heedless, it is a foolhardy understanding, micchaditthi, wrong view.
One doesn't listen to anybody else.
Take the example of Dighanakha the Brahman.
This Brahman only believed himself, he wouldn't believe others.
At one time when the Buddha was resting at Rajagaha, Dighanakha went to listen to his teaching.
Or you might say that Dighanakha went to teach the Buddha because he was intent on expounding his own views…
“I am of the view that nothing suits me.
This was his view.
The Buddha listened to Dighanakha's view and then answered,
“Brahman, this view of yours doesn't suit you either.
When the Buddha had answered in this way, Dighanakha was stumped.
He didn't know what to say.
The Buddha explained in many ways, till the Brahman understood.
He stopped to reflect and saw…
“Hmm, this view of mine isn't right.
On hearing the Buddha's answer the Brahman abandoned his conceited views and immediately saw the truth.
He changed right then and there, turning right around, just as one would invert one's hand.
He praised the teaching of the Buddha thus:
“Listening to the Blessed One's teaching, my mind was illumined, just as one living in darkness might perceive light.
My mind is like an overturned basin which has been uprighted, like a man who has been lost and finds the way.
Now at that time a certain knowledge arose within his mind, within that mind which had been uprighted.
Wrong view vanished and right view took its place.
Darkness disappeared and light arose.
The Buddha declared that the Brahman Dighanakha was one who had opened the Dhamma Eye.
Previously Dighanakha clung to his own views and had no intention of changing them.
But when he heard the Buddha's teaching his mind saw the truth, he saw that his clinging to those views was wrong.
When the right understanding arose he was able to perceive his previous understanding as mistaken, so he compared his experience with a person living in darkness who had found light.
This is how it is.
At that time the Brahman Dighanakha transcended his wrong view.
Now we must change in this way.
Before we can give up defilements we must change our perspective.
We must begin to practice rightly and practice well.
Previously we didn't practice rightly or well, and yet we thought we were right and good just the same.
When we really look into the matter we upright ourselves, just like turning over one's hand.
This means that the “One Who Knows,” or wisdom, arises in the mind, so that it is able to see things anew.
A new kind of awareness arises.
Therefore cultivators must practice to develop this knowing, which we call Buddho, the One Who Knows, in their minds.
Originally the one who knows is not there, our knowledge is not clear, true or complete.
This knowledge is therefore too weak to train the mind.
But then the mind changes, or inverts, as a result of this awareness, called wisdom or insight, which exceeds our previous awareness.
That previous “one who knows” did not yet know fully and so was unable to bring us to our objective.
The Buddha therefore taught to look within, opanayiko.
Look within, don't look outwards.
Or if you look outwards then look within, to see the cause and effect therein.
Look for the truth in all things, because external objects and internal objects are always affecting each other.
Our practice is to develop a certain type of awareness until it becomes stronger than our previous awareness.
This causes wisdom and insight to arise within the mind, enabling us to clearly know the workings of the mind, the language of the mind and the ways and means of all the defilements.
The Buddha, when he first left his home in search of liberation, was probably not really sure what to do, much like us.
He tried many ways to develop his wisdom.
He looked for teachers, such as Udaka Ramaputta, going there to practice meditation… right leg on left leg, right hand on left hand… body erect… eyes closed… letting go of everything… until he was able to attain a high level of absorption samadhi.
But when he came out of that samadhi his old thinking came up and he would attach to it just as before.
Seeing this, he knew that wisdom had not yet arisen.
His understanding had not yet penetrated to the truth, it was still incomplete, still lacking.
Seeing this he nonetheless gained some understanding — that this was not yet the summation of practice — but he left that place to look for a new teacher.
When the Buddha left his old teacher he didn't condemn him, he did as does the bee which takes nectar from the flower without damaging the petals.
The Buddha then proceeded on to study with Alara Kalama and attained an even higher state of samadhi, but when he came out of that state Bimba and Rahula came back into his thoughts again, the old memories and feelings came up again.
He still had lust and desire.
Reflecting inward he saw that he still hadn't reached his goal, so he left that teacher also.
He listened to his teachers and did his best to follow their teachings.
He continually surveyed the results of his practice, he didn't simply do things and then discard them for something else.
Even when it came to ascetic practices, after he had tried them he realized that starving until one is almost skeleton is simply a matter for the body.
The body doesn't know anything.
practicing in that way was like executing an innocent person while ignoring the real thief.
When the Buddha really looked into the matter he saw that practice is not a concern of the body, it is a concern of the mind.
Attakilamathanuyogo — the Buddha had tried it and found that it was limited to the body.
In fact, all Buddhas are enlightened in mind.
Whether in regard to the body or to the mind, just throw them all together as Transient, Imperfect and Ownerless — aniccam, dukkham and anatta.
They are simply conditions of Nature.
They arise depending on supporting factors, exist for a while and then cease.
When there are appropriate conditions they arise again; having arisen they exist for a while, then cease once more.
These things are not a “self,” a “being,” an “us” or a “them.” There's nobody there, simply feelings.
Happiness has no intrinsic self, suffering has no intrinsic self.
No self can be found, there are simply elements of Nature which arise, exist and cease.
They go through this constant cycle of change.
All beings, including humans, tend to see the arising as themselves, the existence as themselves, and the cessation as themselves.
Thus they cling to everything.
They don't want things to be the way they are, they don't want them to be otherwise.
For instance, having arisen they don't want things to cease; having experienced happiness, they don't want suffering.
If suffering does arise they want it to go away as quickly as possible, but even better if it doesn't arise at all.
This is because they see this body and mind as themselves, or belonging to themselves, and so they demand those things to follow their wishes.
This sort of thinking is like building a dam or a dike without making an outlet to let the water through.
The result is that the dam bursts.
And so it is with this kind of thinking.
The Buddha saw that thinking in this way is the cause of suffering.
Seeing this cause, the Buddha gave it up.
This is the Noble Truth of the Cause of Suffering.
The Truths of Suffering, its Cause, its Cessation and the Way leading to that Cessation… people are stuck right here.
If people are to overcome their doubts it's right at this point.
Seeing that these things are simply rupa and nama, or corporeality and mentality, it becomes obvious that they are not a being, a person, an “us,” or a “them.” They simply follow the laws of Nature.
Our practice is to know things in this way.
We don't have the power to really control these things, we aren't really their owners.
Trying to control them causes suffering, because they aren't really ours to control.
Neither body nor mind are self or others.
If we know this as it really is then we see clearly.
We see the truth, we are at one with it.
It's like seeing a lump of red hot iron which has been heated in a furnace.
It's hot all over.
Whether we touch it on top, the bottom or the sides it's hot.
No matter where we touch it, it's hot.
This is how you should see things.
Mostly when we start to practice we want to attain, to achieve, to know and to see, but we don't yet know what it is we're going to achieve or know.
There was once a disciple of mine whose practice was plagued with confusion and doubts.
But he kept practicing, and I kept instructing him, till he began to find some peace.
But when he eventually became a bit calm he got caught up in his doubts again, saying, “What do I do next?” There!
the confusion arises again.
He says he wants peace but when he gets it, he doesn't want it, he asks what he should do next!
So in this practice we must do everything with detachment.
How are we to detach?
We detach by seeing things clearly.
Know the characteristics of the body and mind as they are.
We meditate in order to find peace, but in doing so we see that which is not peaceful.
This is because movement is the nature of the mind.
When practicing samadhi we fix our attention on the in and out-breaths at the nose tip or the upper lip.
This “lifting” the mind to fix it is called vitakka, or “lifting up.” When we have thus “lifted” the mind and are fixed on an object, this is called vicara, the contemplation of the breath at the nose tip.
This quality of vicara will naturally mingle with other mental sensations, and we may think that our mind is not still, that it won't calm down, but actually this is simply the workings of vicara as it mingles with those sensations.
Now if this goes too far in the wrong direction, our mind will lose its collectedness, so then we must set up the mind afresh, lifting it up to the object of concentration with vitakka.
As soon as we have thus established our attention vicara takes over, mingling with the various mental sensations.
Now when we see this happening, our lack of understanding may lead us to wonder: “Why has my mind wandered?
I wanted it to be still, why isn't it still?” This is practicing with attachment.
Actually the mind is simply following its nature, but we go and add on to that activity by wanting the mind to be still and thinking “Why isn't it still?” Aversion arises and so we add that on to everything else, increasing our doubts, increasing our suffering and increasing our confusion.
So if there is vicara, reflecting on the various happenings within the mind in this way, we should wisely consider… “Ah, the mind is simply like this.” There, that's the One Who Knows talking, telling you to see things as they are.
The mind is simply like this.
We let it go at that and the mind becomes peaceful.
When it's no longer centered we bring up vitakka once more, and shortly there is calm again.
Vitakka and vicara work together like this.
We use vicara to contemplate the various sensations which arise.
When vicara becomes gradually more scattered we once again “lift” our attention with vitakka.
The important thing here is that our practice at this point must be done with detachment.
Seeing the process of vicara interacting with the mental sensations we may think that the mind is confused and become averse to this process.
This is the cause right here.
We aren't happy simply because we want the mind to be still.
This is the cause — wrong view.
If we correct our view just a little, seeing this activity as simply the nature of mind, just this is enough to subdue the confusion.
This is called letting go.
Now, if we don't attach, if we practice with “letting go”… detachment within activity and activity within detachment… if we learn to practice like this, then vicara will naturally tend to have less to work with.
If our mind ceases to be disturbed, then vicara will incline to contemplating Dhamma, because if we don't contemplate Dhamma the mind returns to distraction.
So there is vitakka then vicara, vitakka then vicara, vitakka then vicara and so on, until vicara becomes gradually more subtle.
At first vicara goes all over the place.
When we understand this as simply the natural activity of the mind, it won't bother us unless we attach to it.
It's like flowing water.
If we get obsessed with it, asking “Why does it flow?” then naturally we suffer.
If we understand that the water simply flows because that's its nature then there's no suffering.
Vicara is like this.
There is vitakka, then vicara, interacting with mental sensations.
We can take these sensations as our object of meditation, calming the mind by noting those sensations.
If we know the nature of the mind like this then we let go, just like letting the water flow by.
Vicara becomes more and more subtle.
Perhaps the mind inclines to contemplating the body, or death for instance, or some other theme of Dhamma.
When the theme of contemplation is right there will arise a feeling of well-being.
What is that well-being?
It is piti.
Piti, well-being, arises.
It may manifest as goose-pimples, coolness or lightness.
The mind is enrapt.
This is called piti.
There are also pleasures, sukha, the coming and going of various sensations; and the state of ekaggatarammana, or one-pointedness.
Now if we talk in terms of the first stage of concentration it must be like this: vitakka, vicara, piti, sukha, ekaggata.
So what is the second stage like?
As the mind becomes progressively more subtle, vitakka and vicara become comparatively coarser, so that they are discarded, leaving only piti, sukha, and ekaggata.
This is something that the mind does of itself, we don't have to conjecture about it, just to know things as they are.
As the mind becomes more refined, piti is eventually thrown off, leaving only sukha and ekaggata, and so we take note of that.
Where does piti go to?
It doesn't go anywhere, it's just that the mind becomes increasingly more subtle so that it throws off those qualities that are too coarse for it.
Whatever's too coarse it throws out, and it keeps throwing off like this until it reaches the peak of subtlety, known in the books as the Fourth Jhana, the highest level of absorption.
Here the mind has progressively discarded whatever becomes too coarse for it, until there remain only ekaggata and upekkha, equanimity.
There's nothing further, this is the limit.
When the mind is developing the stages of samadhi it must proceed in this way, but please let us understand the basics of practice.
We want to make the mind still but it won't be still.
This is practicing out of desire, but we don't realize it.
We have the desire for calm.
The mind is already disturbed and then we further disturb things by wanting to make it calm.
This very wanting is the cause.
We don't see that this wanting to calm the mind is tanha.
It's just like increasing the burden.
The more we desire calm the more disturbed the mind becomes, until we just give up.
We end up fighting all the time, sitting and struggling with ourselves.
Why is this?
Because we don't reflect back on how we have set up the mind.
Know that the conditions of mind are simply the way they are.
Whatever arises, just observe it.
It is simply the nature of the mind, it isn't harmful unless we don't understand its nature.
It's not dangerous if we see its activity for what it is.
So we practice with vitakka and vicara until the mind begins to settle down and become less forceful.
When sensations arise we contemplate them, we mingle with them and come to know them.
However, usually we tend to start fighting with them, because right from the beginning we're determined to calm the mind.
As soon as we sit the thoughts come to bother us.
As soon as we set up our meditation object our attention wanders, the mind wanders off after all the thoughts, thinking that those thoughts have come to disturb us, but actually the problem arises right here, from the very wanting.
If we see that the mind is simply behaving according to its nature, that it naturally comes and goes like this, and if we don't get over-interested in it, we can understand its ways as much the same as a child.
Children don't know any better, they may say all kinds of things.
If we understand them we just let them talk, children naturally talk like that.
When we let go like this there is no obsession with the child.
We can talk to our guests undisturbed, while the child chatters and plays around.
The mind is like this.
It's not harmful unless we grab on to it and get obsessed over it.
That's the real cause of trouble.
When piti arises one feels an indescribable pleasure, which only those who experience can appreciate.
Sukha arises, and there is also the quality of one-pointedness.
There are vitakka, vicara, piti, sukha and ekaggata.
These five qualities all converge at the one place.
Even though they are different qualities they are all collected in the one place, and we can see them all there, just like seeing many different kinds of fruit in the one bowl.
Vitakka, vicara, piti, sukha and ekaggata — we can see them all in the one mind, all five qualities.
If one were to ask, “How is there vitakka, how is there vicara, how are there piti and sukha?…” it would be difficult to answer, but when they converge in the mind we will see how it is for ourselves.
At this point our practice becomes somewhat special.
We must have recollection and self-awareness and not lose ourselves.
Know things for what they are.
These are stages of meditation, the potential of the mind.
Don't doubt anything with regard to the practice.
Even if you sink into the earth or fly into the air, or even “die” while sitting, don't doubt it.
Whatever the qualities of the mind are, just stay with the knowing.
This is our foundation: to have sati, recollection, and sampajañña, self-awareness, whether standing, walking, sitting, or reclining.
Whatever arises, just leave it be, don't cling to it.
Be it like or dislike, happiness or suffering, doubt or certainty, contemplate with vicara and gauge the results of those qualities.
Don't try to label everything, just know it.
See that all the things that arise in the mind are simply sensations.
They are transient.
They arise, exist and cease.
That's all there is to them, they have no self or being, they are neither “us” nor “them.” They are not worthy of clinging to, any of them.
When we see all rupa and nama in this way with wisdom, then we will see the old tracks.
We will see the transience of the mind, the transience of the body, the transience of happiness, suffering, love and hate.
They are all impermanent.
Seeing this, the mind becomes weary; weary of the body and mind, weary of the things that arise and cease and are transient.
When the mind becomes disenchanted it will look for a way out of all those things.
It no longer wants to be stuck in things, it sees the inadequacy of this world and the inadequacy of birth.
When the mind sees like this, wherever we go, we see aniccam, dukkham and anatta.
There's nothing left to hold on to.
Whether we go to sit at the foot of a tree, on a mountain top or into a valley, we can hear the Buddha's teaching.
All trees will seem as one, all beings will be as one, there's nothing special about any of them.
They arise, exist for a while, age and then die, all of them.
We thus see the world more clearly, seeing this body and mind more clearly.
They are clearer in the light of Transience, clearer in the light of Imperfection and clearer in the light of Ownerlessness.
If people hold fast to things they suffer.
This is how suffering arises.
If we see that body and mind are simply the way they are, no suffering arises, because we don't hold fast to them.
Wherever we go we will have wisdom.
Even seeing a tree we can consider it with wisdom.
Seeing grass and the various insects will be food for reflection.
When it all comes down to it they all fall into the same boat.
They are all Dhamma, they are invariably transient.
This is the truth, this is the true Dhamma, this is certain.
How is it certain?
It is certain in that the world is that way and can never be otherwise.
There's nothing more to it than this.
If we can see in this way then we have finished our journey.
In Buddhism, with regard to view, it is said that to feel that we are more foolish than others is not right: to feel that we are equal to others is not right; and to feel that we better than others is not right… because there isn't any “we.” This is how it is, we must uproot conceit.
This is called lokavidu — knowing the world clearly as it is.
If we thus see the truth, the mind will know itself completely and will sever the cause of suffering.
When there is no longer any cause, the results cannot arise.
This is the way our practice should proceed.
The basics which we need to develop are: firstly, to be upright and honest; secondly, to be wary of wrong-doing; thirdly, to have the attribute of humility within one's heart, to be aloof and content with little.
If we are content with little in regards to speech and in all other things, we will see ourselves, we won't be drawn into distractions.
The mind will have a foundation of sila, samadhi, and pañña.
Therefore cultivators of the path should not be careless.
Even if you are right don't be careless.
And if you are wrong, don't be careless.
If things are going well or you're feeling happy, don't be careless.
Why do I say “don't be careless”?
Because all of these things are uncertain.
Note them as such.
If you get peaceful just leave the peace be.
You may really want to indulge in it but you should simply know the truth of it, the same as for unpleasant qualities.
This practice of the mind is up to each individual.
The teacher only explains the way to train the mind, because that mind is within each individual.
We know what's in there, nobody else can know our mind as well as we can.
The practice requires this kind of honesty.
Do it properly, don't do it half-heartedly.
When I say “do it properly,” does that mean you have to exhaust yourselves?
No, you don't have to exhaust yourselves, because the practice is done in the mind.
If you know this then you will know the practice.
You don't need a whole lot.
Just use the standards of practice to reflect on yourself inwardly.
Now the Rains Retreat is half way over.
For most people it's normal to let the practice slacken off after a while.
They aren't consistent from beginning to end.
This shows that their practice is not yet mature.
For instance, having determined a particular practice at the beginning of the retreat, whatever it may be, then we must fulfill that resolution.
For these three months make the practice consistent.
You must all try.
Whatever you have determined to practice, consider that and reflect whether the practice has slackened off.
If so, make an effort to re-establish it.
Keep shaping up the practice, just the same as when we practice meditation on the breath.
As the breath goes in and out the mind gets distracted.
Then re-establish your attention on the breath.
When your attention wanders off again bring it back once more.
This is the same.
In regard to both the body and the mind the practice proceeds like this.
Please make an effort with it.
Kamogha… the flood of sensuality: sunk in sights, in sounds, in smells, in tastes, in bodily sensations.
Sunk because we only look at externals, we don't look inwardly.
People don't look at themselves, they only look at others.
They can see everybody else but they can't see themselves.
It's not such a difficult thing to do, but it's just that people don't really try.
For example, look at a beautiful woman.
What does that do to you?
As soon as you see the face you see everything else.
Do you see it?
Just look within your mind.
What is it like to see a woman?
As soon as the eyes see just a little bit the mind sees all the rest.
Why is it so fast?
It's because you are sunk in the “water.” You are sunk, you think about it, fantasize about it, are stuck in it.
It's just like being a slave… somebody else has control over you.
When they tell you to sit you've got to sit, when they tell you to walk you've got to walk… you can't disobey them because you're their slave.
Being enslaved by the senses is the same.
No matter how hard you try you can't seem to shake it off.
And if you expect others to do it for you, you really get into trouble.
You must shake it off for yourself.
Therefore the Buddha left the practice of Dhamma, the transcendence of suffering, up to us.
Take nibbana for example.
The Buddha was thoroughly enlightened, so why didn't he describe nibbana in detail?
Why did he only say that we should practice and find out for ourselves.
Why is that?
Shouldn't he have explained what nibbana is like?
“The Buddha practiced, developing the perfections over countless world ages for the sake of all sentient beings, so why didn't he point out nibbana so that they all could see it and go there too?” Some people think like this.
“If the Buddha really knew he would tell us.
Why should he keep anything hidden?
Actually this sort of thinking is wrong.
We can't see the truth in that way.
We must practice, we must cultivate, in order to see.
The Buddha only pointed out the way to develop wisdom, that's all.
He said that we ourselves must practice.
Whoever practices will reach the goal.
But that path which the Buddha taught goes against our habits.
To be frugal, to be restrained… we don't really like these things, so we say, “Show us the way, show us the way to nibbana, so that those who like it easy like us can go there too.” It's the same with wisdom.
The Buddha can't show you wisdom, it's not something that can be simply handed around.
The Buddha can show the way to develop wisdom, but whether you develop much or only a little depends on the individual.
Merit and accumulated virtues of people naturally differ.
Just look at a material object, such as the wooden lions in front of the hall here.
People come and look at them and can't seem to agree: one person says, “Oh, how beautiful,” while another says, “How revolting!” It's the one lion, both beautiful and ugly.
Just this is enough to know how things are.
Therefore the realization of Dhamma is sometimes slow, sometimes fast.
The Buddha and his disciples were all alike in that they had to practice for themselves, but even so they still relied on teachers to advise them and give them techniques in the practice.
Now, when we listen to Dhamma we may want to listen until all our doubts are cleared up, but they'll never be cleared up simply by listening.
Doubt is not overcome simply by listening or thinking, we must first clean out the mind.
To clean out the mind means to revise our practice.
No matter how long we were to listen to the teacher talk about the truth we couldn't know or see that truth just from listening.
If we did it would be only through guesswork or conjecture.
However, even though simply listening to the Dhamma may not lead to realization, it is beneficial.
There were, in the Buddha's time, those who realized the Dhamma, even realizing the highest realization — arahantship, while listening to a discourse.
But those people were already highly developed, their minds already understood to some extent.
It's like a football.
When a football is pumped up with air it expands.
Now the air in that football is all pushing to get out, but there's no hole for it to do so.
As soon as a needle punctures the football the air comes bursting out.
This is the same.
The minds of those disciples who were enlightened while listening to the Dhamma were like this.
As long as there was no catalyst to cause the reaction this “pressure” was within them, like the football.
The mind was not yet free because of this very small thing concealing the truth.
As soon as they heard the Dhamma and it hit the right spot, wisdom arose.
They immediately understood, immediately let go and realized the true Dhamma.
That's how it was.
It was easy.
The mind uprighted itself.
It changed, or turned, from one view to another.
You could say it was far, or you could say it was very near.
This is something we must do for ourselves.
The Buddha was only able to give techniques on how to develop wisdom, and so with the teachers these days.
They give Dhamma talks, they talk about the truth, but still we can't make that truth our own.
Why not?
There's a “film” obscuring it.
You could say that we are sunk, sunk in the water.
Kamogha — the “flood” of sensuality.
Bhavogha — the “flood” of becoming.
“Becoming” means “the sphere of birth.” Sensual desire is born at sights, sounds, tastes, smells, feelings and thoughts, identifying with these things.
The mind holds fast and is stuck to sensuality.
Some cultivators get bored, fed up, tired of the practice and lazy.
You don't have to look very far, just look at how people can't seem to keep the Dhamma in mind, and yet if they get scolded they'll hold on to it for ages.
They may get scolded at the beginning of the Rains, and even after the Rains Retreat has ended they still haven't forgotten it.
Their whole lives they still won't forget it if it goes down deep enough.
But when it comes to the Buddha's teaching, telling us to be moderate, to be restrained, to practice conscientiously… why don't people take these things to their hearts?
Why do they keep forgetting these things?
You don't have to look very far, just look at our practice here.
For example, establishing standards such as: after the meal while washing your bowls, don't chatter!
Even this much seems to be beyond people.
Even though we know that chattering is not particularly useful and binds us to sensuality… people still like talking.
Pretty soon they start to disagree and eventually get into arguments and squabbles.
There's nothing more to it than this.
Now this isn't anything subtle or refined, it's pretty basic, and yet people don't seem to really make much effort with it.
They say they want to see the Dhamma, but they want to see it on their own terms, they don't want to follow the path of practice.
That's as far as they go.
All these standards of practice are skillful means for penetrating to and seeing the Dhamma, but people don't practice accordingly.
To say “real practice” or “ardent practice” doesn't necessarily mean you have to expend a whole lot of energy — just put some effort into the mind, making some effort with all the feelings that arise, especially those which are steeped in sensuality.
These are our enemies.
But people can't seem to do it.
Every year, as the end of the Rains Retreat approaches, it gets worse and worse.
Some of the monks have reached the limit of their endurance, the “end of their tether.” The closer we get to the end of the Rains the worse they get, they have no consistency in their practice.
I speak about this every year and yet people can't seem to remember it.
We establish a certain standard and in not even a year it's fallen apart.
Almost finished the Retreat and it starts — the chatter, the socializing and everything else.
It all goes to pieces.
This is how it tends to be.
Those who are really interested in the practice should consider why this is so.
It's because people don't see the adverse results of these things.
When we are accepted into the Buddhist monkhood we live simply.
And yet some of them disrobe to go to the front, where the bullets fly past them every day — they prefer it like that.
They really want to go.
Danger surrounds them on all sides and yet they're prepared to go.
Why don't they see the danger?
They're prepared to die by the gun but nobody wants to die developing virtue.
Just seeing this is enough… it's because they're slaves, nothing else.
See this much and you know what it's all about.
People don't see the danger.
This is really amazing, isn't it?
You'd think they could see it but they can't.
If they can't see it even then, then there's no way they can get out.
They're determined to whirl around in samsara.
This is how things are.
Just talking about simple things like this we can begin to understand.
If you were to ask them, “Why were you born?” They'd probably have a lot of trouble answering, because they can't see it.
They're sunk in the world of the senses and sunk in becoming.
Bhava is the sphere of birth, our birthplace.
To put it simply, where are beings born from?
Bhava is the preliminary condition for birth.
Wherever birth takes place, that's bhava.
For example, suppose we had an orchard of apple trees that we were particularly fond of.
That's a bhava for us if we don't reflect with wisdom.
How so?
Suppose our orchard contained a hundred or a thousand apple trees… it doesn't really matter what kind of trees they are, just so long as we consider them to be “our own” trees… then we are going to be “born” as a “worm” in every single one of those trees.
We bore into every one, even though our human body is still back there in the house, we send out “tentacles” into every one of those trees.
Now, how do we know that it's a bhava?
It's a bhava because of our clinging to the idea that those trees are our own, that that orchard is our own.
If someone were to take an ax and cut one of the trees down, the owner over there in the house “dies” along with the tree.
He gets furious, and has to go and set things right, to fight and maybe even kill over it.
That quarreling is the “birth.” The “sphere of birth” is the orchard of trees that we cling to as our own.
We are “born” right at the point where we consider them to be our own, born from that bhava.
Even if we had a thousand apple trees, if someone were to cut down just one it'd be like cutting the owner down.
Whatever we cling to we are born right there, we exist right there.
We are born as soon as we “know.” This is knowing through not-knowing: we know that someone has cut down one of our trees.
But we don't know that those trees are not really ours.
This is called “knowing through not-knowing.” We are bound to be born into that bhava.
Vatta the wheel of conditioned existence, operates like this.
People cling to bhava, they depend on bhava.
If they cherish bhava, this is birth.
And if they fall into suffering over that same thing, this is also a birth.
As long as we can't let go we are stuck in the rut of samsara, spinning around like a wheel.
Look into this, contemplate it.
Whatever we cling to as being us or ours, that is a place for birth.
There must be a bhava, a sphere of birth, before birth can take place.
Therefore the Buddha said, whatever you have, don't “have” it.
Let it be there but don't make it yours.
You must understand this “having” and “not having,” know the truth of them, don't flounder in suffering.
The place that we were born from; you want to go back there and be born again, don't you?
All of you monks and novices, do you know where you were born from?
You want to go back there, don't you?
Right there, look into this.
All of you getting ready.
The nearer we get to the end of the retreat the more you start preparing to go back and be born there.
Really, you'd think that people could appreciate what it would be like, living in a person's belly.
How uncomfortable would that be?
Just look, merely staying in your kuti for one day is enough.
Shut all the doors and windows and you're suffocating already.
How would it be to lie in a person's belly for nine or ten months?
Think about it.
People don't see the liability of things.
Ask them why they are living, or why they are born, and they have no idea.
Do you still want to get back in there?
Why?
It should be obvious but you don't see it.
Why can't you see it?
What are you stuck on, what are you holding onto?
Think it out for yourself.
It's because there is a cause for becoming and birth.
Just take a look at the preserved baby in the main hall, have you seen it?
Isn't anybody alarmed by it?
No, no-one's alarmed by it.
A baby lying in its mother's belly is just like that preserved baby.
And yet you want to make more of those things, and even want to get back and soak in there yourself.
Why don't you see the danger of it and the benefit of the practice?
You see?
That's bhava.
The root is right there, it revolves around that.
The Buddha taught to contemplate this point.
People think about it but still don't see.
They're all getting ready to go back there again.
they know that it wouldn't be very comfortable in there, to put their necks in the noose is really uncomfortable, they still want to lay their heads in there.
Why don't they understand this?
This is where wisdom comes in, where we must contemplate.
When I talk like this people say, “If that's the case then everybody would have to become monks… and then how would the world be able to function?” You'll never get everybody to become monks, so don't worry.
The world is here because of deluded beings, so this is no trifling matter.
I first became a novice at the age of nine.
I started practicing from way back then.
But in those days I didn't really know what it was all about.
I found out when I became a monk.
Once I became a monk I became so wary.
The sensual pleasures people indulged in didn't seem like so much fun to me.
I saw the suffering in them.
It was like seeing a delicious banana which I knew was very sweet but which I also knew to be poisoned.
No matter how sweet or tempting it was, if I ate it I would die.
I considered in this way every time… every time I wanted to “eat a banana” I would see the “poison” steeped inside, and so eventually I could withdraw my interest from those things.
Now at this age, such things are not at all tempting.
Some people don't see the “poison'; some see it but still want to try their luck.
“If your hand is wounded don't touch poison, it may seep into the wound.
I used to consider trying it out as well.
When I had lived as a monk for five or six years, I thought of the Buddha.
He practiced for five or six years and was finished, but I was still interested in the worldly life, so I thought of going back to it: “Maybe I should go and “build the world” for a while, I would gain some experience and learning.
Even the Buddha had his son, Rahula.
Maybe I'm being too strict?… I sat and considered this for some time, until I realized: “Yes, well, that's all very fine, but I'm just afraid that this 'Buddha' won't be like the last one,” a voice in me said, “I'm afraid this 'Buddha' will just sink into the mud, not like the last one.” And so I resisted those worldly thoughts.
From my sixth or seventh rains retreat up until the twentieth, I really had to put up a fight.
These days I seem to have run out of bullets, I've been shooting for a long time.
I'm just afraid that you younger monks and novices have still got so much ammunition, you may just want to go and try out your guns.
Before you do, consider carefully first.
Speaking of sensual desire, it's hard to give up.
It's really difficult to see it as it is.
We must use skillful means.
Consider sensual pleasures as like eating meat which gets stuck in your teeth.
Before you finish the meal you have to find a toothpick to pry it out.
When the meat comes out you feel some relief for a while, maybe you even think that you won't eat any more meat.
But when you see it again you can't resist it.
You eat some more and then it gets stuck again.
When it gets stuck you have to pick it out again, which gives some relief once more, until you eat some more meat… That's all there is to it.
Sensual pleasures are just like this, no better than this.
When the meat gets stuck in your teeth there's discomfort.
You take a toothpick and pick it out and experience some relief.
There's nothing more to it than this sensual desire… The pressure builds up and up until you let a little bit out… Oh!
That's all there is to it.
I don't know what all the fuss is about.
I didn't learn these things from anybody else, they occurred to me in the course of my practice.
I would sit in meditation and reflect on sensual pleasure as being like a red ants' nest.
Someone takes a piece of wood and pokes the nest until the ants come running out, crawling down the wood and into their faces, biting their eyes and ears.
And yet they still don't see the difficulty they are in.
However it's not beyond our ability.
In the teaching of the Buddha it is said that if we've seen the harm of something, no matter how good it may seem to be, we know that it's harmful.
Whatever we haven't yet seen the harm of, we just think it's good.
If we haven't yet seen the harm of anything we can't get out of it.
Have you noticed?
No matter how dirty it may be people like it.
This kind of “work” isn't clean but you don't even have to pay people to do it, they'll gladly volunteer.
With other kinds of dirty work, even if you pay a good wage people won't do it, but this kind of work they submit themselves to gladly, you don't even have to pay them.
It's not that it's clean work, either, it's dirty work.
Yet why do people like it?
How can you say that people are intelligent when they behave like this?
Think about it.
Have you ever noticed the dogs in the monastery ground here?
There are packs of them.
They run around biting each other, some of them even getting maimed.
In another month or so they'll be at it.
As soon as one of the smaller ones gets into the pack the bigger ones are at him… out he comes yelping, dragging his leg behind him.
But when the pack runs on he hobbles on after it.
He's only a little one, but he thinks he'll get his chance one day.
They bite his leg for him and that's all he gets for his trouble.
For the whole of the mating season he may not even get one chance.
You can see this for yourself in the monastery here.
These dogs when they run around howling in packs… I figure if they were humans they'd be singing songs!
They think it's such great fun they're singing songs, but they don't have a clue what it is that makes them do it, they just blindly follow their instincts.
Think about this carefully.
If you really want to practice you should understand your feelings.
For example, among the monks, novices or laypeople, who should you socialize with?
If you associate with people who talk a lot they induce you to talk a lot also.
Your own share is already enough, theirs is even more… put them together and they explode!
People like to socialize with those who chatter a lot and talk of frivolous things.
They can sit and listen to that for hours.
When it comes to listening to Dhamma, talking about practice, there isn't much of it to be heard.
Like when giving a Dhamma talk: As soon as I start off… “Namo Tassa Bhagavato'… they're all sleepy already.
They don't take in the talk at all.
When I reach the “Evam” they all open their eyes and wake up.
Every time there's a Dhamma talk people fall asleep.
How are they going to get any benefit from it?
Real Dhamma cultivators will come away from a talk feeling inspired and uplifted, they learn something.
Every six or seven days the teacher gives another talk, constantly boosting the practice.
This is your chance, now that you are ordained.
There's only this one chance, so take a close look.
Look at things and consider which path you will choose.
You are independent now.
Where are you going to go from here?
You are standing at the crossroads between the worldly way and the Dhamma way.
Which way will you choose?
You can take either way, this is the time to decide.
The choice is yours to make.
If you are to be liberated it is at this point.
Take a look at your fear… One day, as it was nearing nightfall, there was nothing else for it… If I tried to reason with myself I'd never go, so I grabbed a pa-kow and just went.
“If it's time for it to die then let it die.
If my mind is going to be so stubborn and stupid then let it die”… that's how I thought to myself.
Actually in my heart I didn't really want to go but I forced myself to.
When it comes to things like this, if you wait till everything's just right you'll end up never going.
When would you ever train yourself?
So I just went.
I'd never stayed in a charnel ground before.
When I got there, words can't describe the way I felt.
The pa-kow wanted to camp right next to me but I wouldn't have it.
I made him stay far away.
Really I wanted him to stay close to keep me company but I wouldn't have it.
I made him move away, otherwise I'd have counted on him for support.
“If it's going to be so afraid then let it die tonight.
I was afraid, but I dared.
It's not that I wasn't afraid, but I had courage.
In the end you have to die anyway.
Well, just as it was getting dark I had my chance, in they came carrying a corpse.
Just my luck!
I couldn't even feel my feet touch the ground, I wanted to get out of there so badly.
They wanted me to do some funeral chants but I wouldn't get involved, I just walked away.
In a few minutes, after they'd gone, I just walked back and found that they had buried the corpse right next to my spot, making the bamboo used for carrying it into a bed for me to stay on.
So now what was I do?
It's not that the village was nearby, either, a good two or three kilometers away.
“Well, if I'm going to die, I'm going to die”… If you've never dared to do it you'll never know what it's like.
It's really an experience.
As it got darker and darker I wondered where there was to run to in the middle of that charnel ground.
“Oh, let it die.
One is born to this life only to die, anyway.
As soon as the sun sank the night told me to get inside my glot.
I didn't want to do any walking meditation, I only wanted to get into my net.
Whenever I tried to walk towards the grave it was as if something was pulling me back from behind, to stop me from walking.
It was as if my feelings of fear and courage were having a tug-of-war with me.
But I did it.
This is the way you must train yourself.
When it was dark I got into my mosquito net.
It felt as if I had a seven-tiered wall all around me.
Seeing my trusty alms bowl there beside me was like seeing an old friend.
Even a bowl can be a friend sometimes!
Its presence beside me was comforting.
I had a bowl for a friend at least.
I sat in my net watching over the body all night.
I didn't lie down or even doze off, I just sat quietly.
I couldn't be sleepy even if I wanted to, I was so scared.
Yes, I was scared, and yet I did it.
I sat through the night.
Now who would have the guts to practice like this?
Try it and see.
When it comes to experiences like this who would dare to go and stay in a charnel ground?
If you don't actually do it you don't get the results, you don't really practice.
This time I really practiced.
When day broke I felt, “Oh!
I've survived!” I was so glad, I just wanted to have daytime, no night time at all.
I wanted to kill off the night and leave only daylight.
I felt so good, I had survived.
I thought, “Oh, there's nothing to it, it's just my own fear, that's all.
After almsround and eating the meal I felt good, the sunshine came out, making me feel warm and cozy.
I had a rest and walked a while.
I thought, “This evening I should have some good, quiet meditation, because I've already been through it all last night.
There's probably nothing more to it.
Then, later in the afternoon, wouldn't you know it?
In comes another one, a big one this time.
They brought the corpse in and cremated it right beside my spot, right in front of my glot.
This was even worse than last night!
“Well, that's good,” I thought, “bringing in this corpse to burn here is going to help my practice.
But still I wouldn't go and do any rites for them, I waited for them to leave first before taking a look.
Burning that body for me to sit and watch over all night, I can't tell you how it was.
Words can't describe it.
Nothing I could say could convey the fear I felt.
In the dead of night, remember.
The fire from the burning corpse flickered red and green and the flames pattered softly.
I wanted to do walking meditation in front of the body but could hardly bring myself to do it.
Eventually I got into my net.
The stench from the burning flesh lingered all through the night.
And this was before things really started to happen… As the flames flickered softly I turned my back on the fire.
I forgot about sleep, I couldn't even think of it, my eyes were fixed rigid with fear.
And there was nobody to turn to, there was only me.
I had to rely on myself.
I could think of nowhere to go, there was nowhere to run to in that pitch black night.
“Well, I'll sit and die here.
I'm not moving from this spot.
Here, talking of the ordinary mind, would it want to do this?
Would it take you to such a situation?
If you tried to reason it out you'd never go.
Who would want to do such a thing?
If you didn't have strong faith in the teaching of the Buddha you'd never do it.
Now, about p.m., I was sitting with my back to the fire.
I don't know what it was, but there came a sound of shuffling from the fire behind me.
Had the coffin just collapsed?
Or maybe a dog was getting the corpse?
But no, it sounded more like a buffalo walking steadily around.
“Oh, never min… But then it started walking towards me, just like a person!
It walked up behind me, the footsteps heavy, like a buffalo's, and yet not… The leaves crunched under the footsteps as it made its way round to the front.
Well, I could only prepare for the worst, where else was there to go?
But it didn't really come up to me, it just circled around in front and then went off in the direction of the pa-kow.
Then all was quiet.
I don't know what it was, but my fear made me think of many possibilities.
It must have been about half-an-hour later, I think, when the footsteps started coming back from the direction of the pa-kow.
Just like a person!
It came right up to me, this time, heading for me as if to run me over!
I closed my eyes and refused to open them.
“I'll die with my eyes closed.
It got closer and closer until it stopped dead in front of me and just stood stock still.
I felt as if it were waving burnt hands back and forth in front of my closed eyes.
Oh!
This was really it!
I threw out everything, forgot all about Buddho, Dhammo and Sangho.
I forgot everything else, there was only the fear in me, stacked in full to the brim.
My thoughts couldn't go anywhere else, there was only fear.
From the day I was born I had never experienced such fear.
Buddho and Dhammo had disappeared, I don't know where.
There was only fear welling up inside my chest until it felt like a tightly-stretched drumskin.
“Well, I'll just leave it as it is, there's nothing else to do.
I sat as if I wasn't even touching the ground and simply noted what was going on.
The fear was so great that it filled me, like a jar completely filled with water.
If you pour water until the jar is completely full, and then pour some more, the jar will overflow.
Likewise, the fear built up so much within me that it reached its peak and began to overflow.
“What am I so afraid of anyway?” a voice inside me asked.
“I'm afraid of death,” another voice answered.
“Well, then, where is this thing 'death'?
Why all the panic?
Look where death abides.
Where is death?
“Why, death is within me!
“If death is within you, then where are you going to run to escape it?
If you run away you die, if you stay here you die.
Wherever you go it goes with you because death lies within you, there's nowhere you can run to.
Whether you are afraid or not you die just the same, there's nowhere to escape death.
As soon as I had thought this, my perception seemed to change right around.
All the fear completely disappeared as easily as turning over one's own hand.
It was truly amazing.
So much fear and yet it could disappear just like that!
Non-fear arose in its place.
Now my mind rose higher and higher until I felt as if I was in the clouds.
As soon as I had conquered the fear, rain began to fall.
I don't know what sort of rain it was, the wind was so strong.
But I wasn't afraid of dying now.
I wasn't afraid that the branches of the trees might come crashing down on me.
I paid it no mind.
The rain thundered down like a hot-season torrent, really heavy.
By the time the rain had stopped everything was soaking wet.
I sat unmoving.
So what did I do next, soaking wet as I was?
I cried!
The tears flowed down my cheeks.
I cried as I thought to myself,
“Why am I sitting here like some sort of orphan or abandoned child, sitting, soaking in the rain like a man who owns nothing, like an exile?
And then I thought further, “All those people sitting comfortably in their homes right now probably don't even suspect that there is a monk sitting, soaking in the rain all night like this.
What's the point of it all?” Thinking like this I began to feel so thoroughly sorry for myself that the tears came gushing out.
“They're not good things anyway, these tears, let them flow right on out until they're all gone.
This was how I practiced.
Now I don't know how I can describe the things that followed.
I sat… sat and listened.
After conquering my feelings I just sat and watched as all manner of things arose in me, so many things that were possible to know but impossible to describe.
And I thought of the Buddha's words…Paccattam veditabbo viññuhi — “the wise will know for themselves.
That I had endured such suffering and sat through the rain like this… who was there to experience it with me?
Only I could know what it was like.
There was so much fear and yet the fear disappeared.
Who else could witness this?
The people in their homes in the town couldn't know what it was like, only I could see it.
It was a personal experience.
Even if I were to tell others they wouldn't really know, it was something for each individual to experience for himself.
The more I contemplated this the clearer it became.
I became stronger and stronger, my conviction become firmer and firmer, until daybreak.
When I opened my eyes at dawn, everything was yellow.
I had been wanting to urinate during the night but the feeling had eventually stopped.
When I got up from my sitting in the morning everywhere I looked was yellow, just like the early morning sunlight on some days.
When I went to urinate there was blood in the urine!
“Eh?
Is my gut torn or something?” I got a bit of fright… “Maybe it's really torn inside there.
“Well, so what?
If it's torn it's torn, who is there to blame?” a voice told me straight away.
“If it's torn it's torn, if I die I die.
I was only sitting here, I wasn't doing any harm.
If it's going to burst, let it burst,” the voice said.
My mind was as if arguing or fighting with itself.
One voice would come from one side, saying, “Hey, this is dangerous!” Another voice would counter it, challenge it and over-rule it.
My urine was stained with blood.
“Hmm.
Where am I going to find medicine?
“I'm not going to bother with that stuff.
A monk can't cut plants for medicine anyway.
If I die, I die, so what?
What else is there to do?
If I die while practicing like this then I'm ready.
if I were to die doing something bad that's no good, but to die practicing like this I'm prepared.
Don't follow your moods.
Train yourself.
The practice involves putting your very life at stake.
You must have cried at least two or three times.
That's right, that's the practice.
If you're sleepy and want to lie down then don't let it sleep.
Make the sleepiness go away before you lie down.
But look at you all, you don't know how to practice.
Sometimes, when you come back from almsround and you're contemplating the food before eating, you can't settle down, your mind is like a mad dog.
The saliva flows, you're so hungry.
Sometimes you may not even bother to contemplate, you just dig in.
That's a disaster.
If the mind won't calm down and be patient then just push your bowl away and don't eat.
Train yourself, drill yourself, that's practice.
Don't just keep on following your mind.
Push your bowl away, get up and leave, don't allow yourself to eat.
If it really wants to eat so much and acts so stubborn then don't let it eat.
The saliva will stop flowing.
If the defilements know that they won't get anything to eat they'll get scared.
They won't dare bother you next day, they'll be afraid they won't get anything to eat.
Try it out if you don't believe me.
People don't trust the practice, they don't dare to really do it.
They're afraid they'll go hungry, afraid they'll die.
If you don't try it out you won't know what it's about.
Most of us don't dare to do it, don't dare to try it out, we're afraid.
When it comes to eating and the like I've suffered over them for a long time now so I know what they're about.
And that's only a minor thing as well.
So this practice is not something one can study easily.
Consider: What is the most important thing of all?
There's nothing else, just death.
Death is the most important thing in the world.
Consider, practice, inquire… If you don't have clothing you won't die.
If you don't have betel nut to chew or cigarettes to smoke you still won't die.
But if you don't have rice or water, then you will die.
I see only these two things as being essential in this world.
You need rice and water to nourish the body.
So I wasn't interested in anything else, I just contented myself with whatever was offered.
As long as I had rice and water it was enough to practice with, I was content.
Is that enough for you?
All those other things are extras, whether you get them or not doesn't matter, the only really important things are rice and water.
“If I live like this can I survive?” I asked myself, “There's enough to get by on all right.
I can probably get at least rice on almsround in just about any village, a mouthful from each house.
Water is usually available.
Just these two are enough…” I didn't aim to be particularly rich.
In regards to the practice, right and wrong are usually co-existent.
You must dare to do it, dare to practice.
If you've never been to a charnel ground you should train yourself to go.
If you can't go at night then go during the day.
Then train yourself to go later and later until you can go at dusk and stay there.
Then you will see the effects of the practice, then you will understand.
This mind has been deluded now for who knows how many lifetimes.
Whatever we don't like or love we want to avoid, we just indulge in our fears.
And then we say we're practicing.
This can't be called “practice.” If it's real practice you'll even risk your life.
If you've really made up your mind to practice why would you take an interest in petty concerns?… “I only got a little, you got a lot.” “You quarreled with me so I'm quarreling with you…” I had none of these thoughts because I wasn't looking for such things.
Whatever others did was their business.
Going to other monasteries I didn't get involved in such things.
However high or low others practiced I wouldn't take any interest, I just looked after my own business.
And so I dared to practice, and the practice gave rise to wisdom and insight.
If your practice has really hit the spot then you really practice.
Day or night you practice.
At night, when it's quiet, I'd sit in meditation, then come down to walk, alternating back and forth like this at least two or three times a night.
Walk, then sit, then walk some more… I wasn't bored, I enjoyed it.
Sometimes it'd be raining softly and I'd think of the times I used to work the rice paddies.
My pants would still be wet from the day before but I'd have to get up before dawn and put them on again.
Then I'd have to go down to below the house to get the buffalo out of its pen.
All I could see of the buffalo would be covered in buffalo shit.
Then the buffalo's tail would be sore with athlete's foot and I'd walk along thinking, “Why is life so miserable?” And now here I was walking meditation… what was a little bit of rain to me?
Thinking like this I encouraged myself in the practice.
If the practice has entered the stream then there's nothing to compare with it.
There's no suffering like the suffering of a Dhamma cultivator and there's no happiness like the happiness of one either.
There's no zeal to compare with the zeal of the cultivator and there's no laziness to compare with them either.
Practitioners of the Dhamma are tops.
That's why I say if you really practice it's a sight to see.
But most of us just talk about practice without having done it or reached it.
Our practice is like the man whose roof is leaking on one side so he sleeps on the other side of the house.
When the sunshine comes in on that side he rolls over to the other side, all the time thinking, “When will I ever get a decent house like everyone else?” If the whole roof leaks then he just gets up and leaves.
This is not the way to do things, but that's how most people are.
This mind of ours, these defilements… if you follow them they'll cause trouble.
The more you follow them the more the practice degenerates.
With the real practice sometimes you even amaze yourself with your zeal.
Whether other people practice or not, don't take any interest, simply do your own practice consistently.
Whoever comes or goes it doesn't matter, just do the practice.
You must look at yourself before it can be called “practice.” When you really practice there are no conflicts in your mind, there is only Dhamma.
Wherever you are still inept, wherever you are still lacking, that's where you must apply yourself.
If you haven't yet cracked it don't give up.
Having finished with one thing you get stuck on another, so persist with it until you crack it, don't let up.
Don't be content until it's finished.
Put all your attention on that point.
While sitting, lying down or walking, watch right there.
It's just like a farmer who hasn't yet finished his fields.
Every year he plants rice but this year he still hasn't gotten it finished, so his mind is stuck on that, he can't rest content.
His work is still unfinished.
Even when he's with friends he can't relax, he's all the time nagged by his unfinished business.
Or like a mother who leaves her baby upstairs in the house while she goes to feed the animals below: she's always got her baby in mind, lest it should fall from the house.
Even though she may do other things, her baby is never far from her thoughts.
It's just the same for us and our practice — we never forget it.
Even though we may do other things our practice is never far from our thoughts, it's constantly with us, day and night.
It has to be like this if you are really going to make progress.
In the beginning you must rely on a teacher to instruct and advise you.
When you understand, then practice.
When the teacher has instructed you follow the instructions.
If you understand the practice it's no longer necessary for the teacher to teach you, just do the work yourselves.
Whenever heedlessness or unwholesome qualities arise know for yourself, teach yourself.
Do the practice yourself.
The mind is the one who knows, the witness.
The mind knows for itself if you are still very deluded or only a little deluded.
Wherever you are still faulty try to practice right at that point, apply yourself to it.
Practice is like that.
It's almost like being crazy, or you could even say you are crazy.
When you really practice you are crazy, you “flip.” You have distorted perception and then you adjust your perception.
If you don't adjust it, it's going to be just as troublesome and just as wretched as before.
So there's a lot of suffering in the practice, but if you don't know your own suffering you won't understand the Noble Truth of Suffering.
To understand suffering, to kill it off, you first have to encounter it.
If you want to shoot a bird but don't go out and find it how will you ever to shoot it?
Suffering, suffering… the Buddha taught about suffering: The suffering of birth, the suffering you won't see suffering.
If you don't understand suffering you won't be able to get rid of suffering.
Now people don't want to see suffering, they don't want to experience it.
If they suffer here they run over there.
You see?
They're simply dragging their suffering around with them, they never kill it.
They don't contemplate or investigate it.
If they feel suffering here they run over there; if it arises there they run back here.
They try to run away from suffering physically.
As long as you are still ignorant, wherever you go you'll find suffering.
Even if you boarded an airplane to get away from it, it would board the plane with you.
If you dived under the water it would dive in with you, because suffering lies within us.
But we don't know that.
If it lies within us where can we run to escape it?
People have suffering in one place so they go somewhere else.
When suffering arises there they run off again.
They think they're running away from suffering but they're not, suffering goes with them.
They carry suffering around without knowing it.
If we don't know the cause of suffering then we can't know the cessation of suffering, there's no way we can escape it.
You must look into this intently until you're beyond doubt.
You must dare to practice.
Don't shirk it, either in a group or alone.
If others are lazy it doesn't matter.
Whoever does a lot of walking meditation, a lot of practice… I guarantee results.
If you really practice consistently, whether others come or go or whatever, one rains retreat is enough.
Do it like I've been telling you here.
Listen to the teacher's words, don't quibble, don't be stubborn.
Whatever he tells you to do go right ahead and do it.
You needn't be timid of the practice, knowledge will surely arise from it.
Practice is also patipada.
What is patipada?
Practice evenly, consistently.
Don't practice like Old Reverend Peh.
One Rains Retreat he determined to stop talking.
He stopped talking all right but then he started writing notes… “Tomorrow please toast me some rice.” He wanted to eat toasted rice!
He stopped talking but ended up writing so many notes that he was even more scattered than before.
One minute he'd write one thing, the next another, what a farce!
I don't know why he bothered determining not to talk.
He didn't know what practice is.
Actually our practice is to be content with little, to just be natural.
Don't worry whether you feel lazy or diligent.
Don't even say “I'm diligent” or “I'm lazy.” Most people practice only when they feel diligent, if they feel lazy they don't bother.
This is how people usually are.
But monks shouldn't think like that.
If you are diligent you practice, when you are lazy you still practice.
Don't bother with other things, cut them off, throw them out, train yourself.
Practice consistently, whether day or night, this year, next year, whatever the time… don't pay attention to thoughts of diligence or laziness, don't worry whether it's hot or cold, just do it.
This is called sammapatipada — Right Practice.
Some people really apply themselves to the practice for six or seven days, then, when they don't get the results they wanted, give it up and revert completely, indulging in chatter, socializing and whatever.
Then they remember the practice and go at it for another six or seven days, then give it up again… It's like the way some people work.
At first they throw themselves into it… then, when they stop, they don't even bother picking up their tools, they just walk off and leave them there.
Later on, when the soil has all caked up, they remember their work and do a bit more, only to leave it again.
Doing things this way you'll never get a decent garden or paddy.
Our practice is the same.
If you think this patipada is unimportant you won't get anywhere with the practice.
Sammapatipada is unquestionably important.
Do it constantly.
Don't listen to your moods.
So what if your mood is good or not?
The Buddha didn't bother with those things.
He had experienced all the good things and bad things, the right things and wrong things.
That was his practice.
Taking only what you like and discarding whatever you don't like isn't practice, it's disaster.
Wherever you go you will never be satisfied, wherever you stay there will be suffering.
Practicing like this is like the Brahmans making their sacrifices.
Why do they do it?
Because they want something in exchange.
Some of us practice like this.
Why do we practice?
Because we seek re-birth, another state of being, we want to attain something.
If we don't get what we want then we don't want to practice, just like the Brahmans making their sacrifices.
They do so because of desire.
The Buddha didn't teach like that.
The cultivation of the practice is for giving up, for letting go, for stopping, for uprooting.
You don't do it for re-birth into any particular state.
There was once a Thera who had initially gone forth into the Mahanikai sect.
But he found it not strict enough so he took Dhammayuttika ordination.
Then he started practicing.
Sometimes he would fast for fifteen days, then when he ate he'd eat only leaves and grass.
He thought that eating animals was bad kamma, that it would be better to eat leaves and grass.
After a while… “Hmm.
Being a monk is not so good, it's inconvenient.
It's hard to maintain my vegetarian practice as a monk.
Maybe I'll disrobe and become a pa-kow.” So he disrobed and became a pa-kow so that he could gather the leaves and grass for himself and dig for roots and yams.
He carried on like that for a while till in the end he didn't know what he should be doing.
He gave it all up.
He gave up being a monk, gave up being a pa-kow, gave up everything.
These days I don't know what he's doing.
Maybe he's dead, I don't know.
This is because he couldn't find anything to suit his mind.
He didn't realize that he was simply following defilements.
The defilements were leading him on but he didn't know it.
“Did the Buddha disrobe and become a pa-kow?
How did the Buddha practice?
What did he do?” He didn't consider this.
Did the Buddha go and eat leaves and grass like a cow?
Sure, if you want to eat like that go ahead, if that's all you can manage, but don't go round criticizing others.
Whatever standard of practice you find suitable then persevere with that.
“Don't gouge or carve too much or you won't have a decent handle.” You'll be left with nothing and in the end just give up.
Some people are like this.
When it comes to walking meditation they really go at it for fifteen days or so.
They don't even bother eating, just walk.
Then when they finish that they just lie around and sleep.
They don't bother considering carefully before they start to practice.
In the end nothing suits them.
Being a monk doesn't suit them, being a pa-kow doesn't suit them… so they end up with nothing.
People like this don't know practice, they don't look into the reasons for practicing.
Think about what you're practicing for.
They teach this practice for throwing off.
The mind wants to love this person and hate that person… these things may arise but don't take them for real.
So what are we practicing for?
Simply so that we can give up these very things.
Even if you attain peace, throw out the peace.
If knowledge arises, throw out the knowledge.
If you know then you know, but if you take that knowing to be your own then you think you know something.
Then you think you are better than others.
After a while you can't live anywhere, wherever you live problems arise.
If you practice wrongly it's just as if you didn't practice at all.
Practice according to your capacity.
Do you sleep a lot?
Then try going against the grain.
Do you eat a lot?
Then try eating less.
Take as much practice as you need, using sila, samadhi and pañña as your basis.
Then throw in the dhutanga practices also.
These dhutanga practices are for digging into the defilements.
You may find the basic practices still not enough to really uproot the defilements, so you have to incorporate the dhutanga practices as well.
These dhutanga practices are really useful.
Some people can't kill off the defilements with basic sila and samadhi, they have to bring in the dhutanga practices to help out.
The dhutanga practices cut off many things.
Living at the foot of a tree… Living at the foot of a tree isn't against the precepts.
But if you determine the dhutanga practice of living in a charnel ground and then don't do it, that's wrong.
Try it out.
What's like to live in a charnel ground?
Is it the same as living in a group?
DHU-TAN-GA: This translates as “the practices which are hard to do.” These are the practices of the Noble Ones.
Whoever wants to be a Noble One must use the dhutanga practices to cut the defilements.
It's difficult to observe them and it's hard to find people with the commitment to practice them, because they go against the grain.
Such as with robes; they say to limit your robes to the basic three robes; to maintain yourself on almsfood; to eat only in the bowl; to eat only what you get on almsround, if anyone brings food to offer afterwards you don't accept it.
Keeping this last practice in central Thailand is easy, the food is quite adequate, because there they put a lot of food in your bowl.
But when you come to the Northeast here this dhutanga takes on subtle nuances — here you get plain rice!
In these parts the tradition is to put only plain rice in the almsbowl.
In central Thailand they give rice and other foods also, but around these parts you get only plain rice.
This dhutanga practice becomes really ascetic.
You eat only plain rice, whatever is brought to offer afterwards you don't accept.
Then there is eating once a day, at one sitting, from only one bowl — when you've finished eating you get up from your seat and don't eat again that day.
These are called dhutanga practices.
Now who will practice them?
It's hard these days to find people with enough commitment to practice them because they are demanding, but that is why they are so beneficial.
What people call practice these days is not really practice.
If you really practice it's no easy matter.
Most people don't dare to really practice, don't dare to really go against the grain.
They don't want to do anything which runs contrary to their feelings.
People don't want to resist the defilements, they don't want to dig at them or get rid of them.
In our practice they say not to follow your own moods.
Consider: we have been fooled for countless lifetimes already into believing that the mind is our own.
Actually it isn't, it's just an impostor.
It drags us into greed, drags us into aversion, drags us into delusion, drags us into theft, plunder, desire and hatred.
These things aren't ours.
Just ask yourself right now: do you want to be good?
Everybody wants to be good.
Now doing all these things, is that good?
There!
People commit malicious acts and yet they want to be good.
That's why I say these things are tricksters, that's all they are.
The Buddha didn't want us to follow this mind, he wanted us to train it.
If it goes one way then take cover another way.
When it goes over there then take cover back here.
To put it simply: whatever the mind wants, don't let it have it.
It's as if we've been friends for years but we finally reach a point where our ideas are no longer the same.
We split up and go our separate ways.
We no longer understand each other, in fact we even argue, so we break up.
That's right, don't follow your own mind.
Whoever follows his own mind, follows its likes and desires and everything else, that person hasn't yet practiced at all.
This is why I say that what people call practice is not really practice… it's disaster.
if you don't stop and take a look, don't try the practice, you won't see, you won't attain the Dhamma.
To put it straight, in our practice you have to commit your very life.
It's not that it isn't difficult, this practice, it has to entail some suffering.
Especially in the first year or two, there's a lot of suffering.
The young monks and novices really have a hard time.
I've had a lot of difficulties in the past, especially with food.
What can you expect?
Becoming a monk at twenty when you are just getting into your food and sleep… some days I would sit alone and just dream of food.
I'd want to eat bananas in syrup, or papaya salad, and my saliva would start to run.
This is part of the training.
All these things are not easy.
This business of food and eating can lead one into a lot of bad kamma.
Take someone who's just growing up, just getting into his food and sleep, and constrain him in these robes and his feelings run amok.
It's like damming a flowing torrent, sometimes the dam just breaks.
If it survives that's fine, but if not it just collapses.
My meditation in the first year was nothing else, just food.
I was so restless… Sometimes I would sit there and it was almost as if I was actually popping bananas into my mouth.
I could almost feel myself breaking the bananas into pieces and putting them in my mouth.
And this is all part of the practice.
So don't be afraid of it.
We've all been deluded for countless lifetimes now so coming to train ourselves, to correct ourselves, is no easy matter.
But if it's difficult it's worth doing.
Why should we bother with easy things?
So those things that are difficult, anybody can do the easy things.
We should train ourselves to do that which is difficult.
It must have been the same for Buddha.
If he had just worried about his family and relatives, his wealth and his past sensual pleasures, he'd never have become the Buddha.
These aren't trifling matters, either, they're just what most people are looking for.
So going forth at an early age and giving up these things is just like dying.
And yet some people come up and say, “Oh, it's easy for you, Luang Por.
You never had a wife and children to worry about, so it's easier for you!” I say, “Don't get too close to me when you say that or you'll get a clout over the head!”… as if I didn't have a heart or something!
When it comes to people it's no trifling matter.
It's what life is all about.
So we Dhamma practitioners should earnestly get into the practice, really dare to do it.
Don't believe others, just listen to the Buddha's teaching.
Establish peace in your hearts.
In time you will understand.
Practice, reflect, contemplate, and the fruits of the practice will be there.
The cause and the result are proportional.
Don't give in to your moods.
In the beginning even finding the right amount of sleep is difficult.
You may determine to sleep a certain time but can't manage it.
You must train yourself.
Whatever time you decide to get up, then get up as soon as it comes round.
Sometimes you can do it, but sometimes as soon as you awake you say to yourself “get up!” and it won't budge!
You may have to say to yourself, “One… Two… if I reach the count three and still don't get up may I fall into hell!” You have to teach yourself like this.
When you get to three you'll get up immediately, you'll be afraid of falling into hell.
You must train yourself, you can't dispense with the training.
You must train yourself from all angles.
Don't just lean on your teacher, your friends or the group all the time or you'll never become wise.
It's not necessary to hear so much instruction, just hear the teaching once or twice and then do it.
The well trained mind won't dare cause trouble, even in private.
In the mind of the adept there is no such thing as “private” or “in public.” All Noble Ones have confidence in their own hearts.
We should be like this.
Some people become monks simply to find an easy life.
Where does ease come from?
What is its cause?
All ease has to be preceded by suffering.
In all things it's the same: you must work before you get rice.
In all things you must first experience difficulty.
Some people become monks in order to rest and take it easy, they say they just want to sit around and rest awhile.
If you don't study the books do you expect to be able to read and write?
It can't be done.
This is why most people who have studied a lot and become monks never get anywhere.
Their knowledge is of a different kind, on a different path.
They don't train themselves, they don't look at their minds.
They only stir up their minds with confusion, seeking things which are not conducive to calm and restraint.
The knowledge of the Buddha is not worldly knowledge, it is supramundane knowledge, a different way altogether.
This is why whoever goes forth into the Buddhist monkhood must give up whatever level or status or position they have held previously.
Even when a king goes forth he must relinquish his previous status, he doesn't bring that worldly stuff into the monkhood with him to throw his weight around with.
He doesn't bring his wealth, status, knowledge or power into the monkhood with him.
The practice concerns giving up, letting go, uprooting, stopping.
You must understand this in order to make the practice work.
If you are sick and don't treat the illness with medicine do you think the illness will cure itself?
Wherever you are afraid you should go.
Wherever there is a cemetery or charnel ground which is particularly fearsome, go there.
Put on your robes, go there and contemplate, Anicca vata sankhara… Stand and walk meditation there, look inward and see where your fear lies.
It will be all too obvious.
Understand the truth of all conditioned things.
Stay there and watch until dusk falls and it gets darker and darker, until you are even able to stay there all night.
The Buddha said, “Whoever sees the Dhamma sees the Tathagata.
Whoever sees the Tathagata sees Nibbana.” If we don't follow his example how will we see the Dhamma?
If we don't see the Dhamma how will we know the Buddha?
If we don't see the Buddha how will we know the qualities of the Buddha?
Only if we practice in the footsteps of the Buddha will we know that what the Buddha taught is utterly certain, that the Buddha's teaching is the supreme truth.
All of us have made up our minds to become bhikkhus and samaneras in the Buddhist Dispensation in order to find peace.
Now what is true peace?
True peace, the Buddha said, is not very far away, it lies right here within us, but we tend to continually overlook it.
People have their ideas about finding peace but still tend to experience confusion and agitation, they still tend to be unsure and haven't yet found fulfillment in their practice.
They haven't yet reached the goal.
It's as if we have left our home to travel to many different places.
Whether we get into a car or board a boat, no matter where we go, we still haven't reached our home.
As long as we still haven't reached home we don't feel content, we still have some unfinished business to take care of.
This is because our journey is not yet finished, we haven't reached our destination.
We travel all over the place in search of liberation.
All of you bhikkhus and samaneras here want peace, every one of you.
Even myself, when I was younger, searched all over for peace.
Wherever I went I couldn't be satisfied.
Going into forests or visiting various teachers, listening to Dhamma talks, I could find no satisfaction.
Why is this?
We look for peace in peaceful places, where there won't be sights, or sounds, or odors, or flavors… thinking that living quietly like this is the way to find contentment, that herein lies peace.
But actually, if we live very quietly in places where nothing arises, can wisdom arise?
Would we be aware of anything?
Think about it.
If our eye didn't see sights, what would that be like?
If the nose didn't experience smells, what would that be like?
If the tongue didn't experience flavors what would that be like?
If the body didn't experience feelings at all, what would that be like?
To be like that would be like being a blind and deaf man, one whose nose and tongue had fallen off and who was completely numb with paralysis.
Would there be anything there?
And yet people tend to think that if they went somewhere where nothing happened they would find peace.
Well, I've thought like that myself, I once thought that way…
When I was a young monk just starting to practice, I'd sit in meditation and sounds would disturb me, I'd think to myself, “What can I do to make my mind peaceful?” So I took some beeswax and stuffed my ears with it so that I couldn't hear anything.
All that remained was a humming sound.
I thought that would be peaceful, but no, all that thinking and confusion didn't arise at the ears after all.
It arose at the mind.
That is the place to search for peace.
To put it another way, no matter where you go to stay, you don't want to do anything because it interferes with your practice.
You don't want to sweep the grounds or do any work, you just want to be still and find peace that way.
The teacher asks you to help out with the chores or any of the daily duties but you don't put your heart into it because you feel it is only an external concern.
I've often brought up the example of one of my disciples who was really eager to “let go” and find peace.
I taught about “letting go” and he accordingly understood that to let go of everything would indeed be peaceful.
Actually right from the day he had come to stay here he didn't want to do anything.
Even when the wind blew half the roof off his kuti he wasn't interested.
He said that that was just an external thing.
So he didn't bother fixing it up.
When the sunlight and rain streamed in from one side he'd move over to the other side.
That wasn't any business of his.
His business was to make his mind peaceful.
That other stuff was a distraction, he wouldn't get involved.
That was how he saw it.
One day I was walking past and saw the collapsed roof.
“Eh?
Whose kuti is this?
Someone told me whose it was, and I thought, “Hmm.
Strange…” So I had a talk with him, explaining many things, such as the duties in regard to our dwellings, the senasanavatta.
“We must have a dwelling place, and we must look after it.
“Letting go” isn't like this, it doesn't mean shirking our responsibilities.
That's the action of a fool.
The rain comes in on one side so you move over to the other side, then the sunshine comes out and you move back to that side.
Why is that?
Why don't you bother to let go there?” I gave him a long discourse on this; then when I'd finished, he said,
“Oh, Luang Por, sometimes you teach me to cling and sometimes you teach me to let go.
I don't know what you want me to do.
Even when my roof collapses and I let go to this extent, still you say it's not right.
And yet you teach me to let go!
I don't know what more you can expect of me… You see?
People are like this.
They can be as stupid as this.
Are there visual objects within the eye?
If there are no external visual objects would our eyes see anything?
Are there sounds within our ears if external sounds don't make contact?
If there are no smells outside would we experience them.
Where are the causes?
Think about what the Buddha said: All dhammas arise because of causes.
If we didn't have ears would we experience sounds?
If we had no eyes would we be able to see sights?
Eyes, ears, nose, tongue, body and mind — these are the causes.
It is said that all dhammas arise because of conditions, when they cease it's because the causal conditions have ceased.
For resulting conditions to arise, the causal conditions must first arise.
If we think that peace lies where there are no sensations would wisdom arise?
Would there be causal and resultant conditions?
Would we have anything to practice with?
If we blame the sounds, then where there are sounds we can't be peaceful.
We think that place is no good.
Wherever there are sights we say that's not peaceful.
If that's the case then to find peace we'd have to be one whose senses have all died, blind, and deaf.
I thought about this…
“Hmm.
This is strange.
Suffering arises because of eyes, ears, nose, tongue, body and mind.
So should we be blind?
If we didn't see anything at all maybe that would be better.
One would have no defilements arising if one were blind, or deaf.
Is this the way it is?”…
But, thinking about it, it was all wrong.
If that was the case then blind and deaf people would be enlightened.
They would all be accomplished if defilements arose at the eyes and ears.
There are the causal conditions.
Where things arise, at the cause, that's where we must stop them.
Where the cause arises, that's where we must contemplate.
Actually, the sense bases of the eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind are all things which can facilitate the arising of wisdom, if we know them as they are.
If we don't really know them we must deny them, saying we don't want to see sights, hear sounds, and so on, because they disturb us.
If we cut off the causal conditions what are we going to contemplate?
Think about it.
Where would there be any cause and effect?
This is wrong thinking on our part.
This is why we are taught to be restrained.
Restraint is sila.
There is the sila of sense restraint: eyes, ears, nose, tongue, body and mind: these are our sila, and they are our samadhi.
Reflect on the story Sariputta.
At the time before he became a bhikkhu he saw Assaji Thera going on almsround.
Seeing him, Sariputta thought,
“This monk is most unusual.
He walks neither too fast nor too slow, his robes are neatly worn, his bearing is restrained.” Sariputta was inspired by him and so approached Venerable Assaji, paid his respects and asked him,
“Excuse me, sir, who are you?
“I am a samana.
“Who is your teacher?
“Venerable Gotama is my teacher.
“What does Venerable Gotama teach?
“He teaches that all things arise because of conditions.
When they cease it's because the causal conditions have ceased.
When asked about the Dhamma by Sariputta, Assaji explained only in brief, he talked about cause and effect.
Dhammas arise because of causes.
The cause arises first and then the result.
When the result is to cease the cause must first cease.
That's all he said, but it was enough for Sariputta.

Now this was a cause for the arising of Dhamma.
At that time Sariputta had eyes, he had ears, he had a nose, a tongue, a body and a mind.
All his faculties were intact.
If he didn't have his faculties would there have been sufficient causes for wisdom to arise for him?
Would he have been aware of anything?
But most of us are afraid of contact.
Either that or we like to have contact but we develop no wisdom from it: instead we repeatedly indulge through eyes, ears, nose, tongue, body and mind, delighting in and getting lost in sense objects.
This is how it is.
These sense bases can entice us into delight and indulgence or they can lead to knowledge and wisdom.
They have both harm and benefit, depending on our wisdom.
So now let us understand that, having gone forth and come to practice, we should take everything as practice.
Even the bad things.
We should know them all.
Why?
So that we may know the truth.
When we talk of practice we don't simply mean those things that are good and pleasing to us.
That's not how it is.
In this world some things are to our liking, some are not.
These things all exist in this world, nowhere else.
Usually whatever we like we want, even with fellow monks and novices.
Whatever monk or novice we don't like we don't want to associate with, we only want to be with those we like.
You see?
This is choosing according to our likes.
Whatever we don't like we don't want to see or know about.
Actually the Buddha wanted us to experience these things.
Lokavidu — look at this world and know it clearly.
If we don't know the truth of the world clearly then we can't go anywhere.
Living in the world we must understand the world.
The Noble Ones of the past, including the Buddha, all lived with these things, they lived in this world, among deluded people.
They attained the truth right in this very world, nowhere else.
They didn't run off to some other world to find the truth.
But they had wisdom.
They restrained their senses, but the practice is to look into all these things and know them as they are.
Therefore the Buddha taught us to know the sense bases, our points of contact.
The eye contacts forms and sends them “in” to become sights.
The ears make contact with sounds, the nose makes contact with odors, the tongue makes contact with tastes, the body makes contact with tactile sensations, and so awareness arises.
Where awareness arises is where we should look and see things as they are.
If we don't know these things as they really are we will either fall in love with them or hate them.
Where these sensations arise is where we can become enlightened, where wisdom can arise.
But sometimes we don't want things to be like that.
The Buddha taught restraint, but restraint doesn't mean we don't see anything, hear anything, smell, taste, feel or think anything.
That's not what it means.
If practitioners don't understand this then as soon as they see or hear anything they cower and run away.
They don't deal with things.
They run away, thinking that by so doing those things will eventually lose their power over them, that they will eventually transcend them.
But they won't.
They won't transcend anything like that.
If they run away not knowing the truth of them, later on the same stuff will pop up to be dealt with again.
For example, those practitioners who are never content, be they in monasteries, forests, or mountains.
They wander on “dhutanga pilgrimage” looking at this, that and the other, thinking they'll find contentment that way.
They go, and then they come back… didn't see anything.
They try going to a mountain top… “Ah!
This is the spot, now I'm right.” They feel at peace for a few days and then get tired of it.
“Oh, well, off to the seaside.” “Ah, here it's nice and cool.
This'll do me fine.” After a while they get tired of the seaside as well… Tired of the forests, tired of the mountains, tired of the seaside, tired of everything.
This is not being tired of things in the right sense, as Right View, it's simply boredom, a kind of Wrong View.
Their view is not in accordance with the way things are.
When they get back to the monastery… “Now, what will I do?
I've been all over and come back with nothing.” So they throw away their bowls and disrobe.
Why do they disrobe?
Because they haven't got any grip on the practice, they don't see anything; go to the north and don't see anything; go to the seaside, to the mountains, into the forests and still don't see anything.
So it's all finished… they “die.” This is how it goes.
It's because they're continually running away from things.
Wisdom doesn't arise.
Now take another example.
Suppose there is one monk who determines to stay with things, not to run away.
He looks after himself.
He knows himself and also knows those who come to stay with him.
He's continually dealing with problems.
For example, the Abbot.
If one is an Abbot of a monastery there are constant problems to deal with, there's a constant stream of things that demand attention.
Why so?
Because people are always asking questions.
The questions never end, so you must be constantly on the alert.
You are constantly solving problems, your own as well as other people's.
That is, you must be constantly awake.
Before you can doze off they wake you up again with another problem.
So this causes you to contemplate and understand things.
You become skillful: skillful in regard to yourself and skillful in regard to others.
Skillful in many, many ways.
This skill arises from contact, from confronting and dealing with things, from not running away.
We don't run away physically but we “run away” in mind, using our wisdom.
We understand with wisdom right here, we don't run away from anything.
This is a source of wisdom.
One must work, must associate with other things.
For instance, living in a big monastery like this we must all help out to look after the things here.
Looking at it in one way you could say that it's all defilement.
Living with lots of monks and novices, with many laypeople coming and going, many defilements may arise.
Yes, I admit… but we must live like this for the development of wisdom and the abandonment of foolishness.
Which way are we to go?
Are we going to live in order to get rid of foolishness or to increase our foolishness?
We must contemplate.
Whenever eyes, ears, nose, tongue, body or mind make contact we should be collected and circumspect.
When suffering arises, who is suffering?
Why did this suffering arise?
The Abbot of a monastery has to supervise many disciples.
Now that may be suffering.
We must know suffering when it arises.
Know suffering.
If we are afraid of suffering and don't want to face it, where are we going to do battle with it?
If suffering arises and we don't know it, how are we going to deal with it?
This is of utmost importance — we must know suffering.
Escaping from suffering means knowing the way out of suffering, it doesn't mean running away from wherever suffering arises.
By doing that you just carry your suffering with you.
When suffering arises again somewhere else you'll have to run away again.
This is not transcending suffering, it's not knowing suffering.
If you want to understand suffering you must look into the situation at hand.
The teachings say that wherever a problem arises it must be settled right there.
Where suffering lies is right where non-suffering will arise, it ceases at the place where it arises.
If suffering arises you must contemplate right there, you don't have to run away.
You should settle the issue right there.
One who runs away from suffering out of fear is the most foolish person of all.
He will simply increases his stupidity endlessly.
We must understand: suffering is none other than the First Noble Truth, isn't that so?
Are you going to look on it as something bad?
Dukkha sacca, samudaya sacca, nirodha sacca, magga sacca… Running away from these things isn't practicing according to the true Dhamma.
When will you ever see the Truth of Suffering?
If we keep running away from suffering we will never know it.
Suffering is something we should recognize — if you don't observe it when will you ever recognize it?
Not being content here you run over there, when discontent arises there you run off again.
You are always running.
If that's the way you practice you'll be racing with the Devil all over the country!
The Buddha taught us to “run away” using wisdom.
For instance: suppose you had stepped on a thorn or splinter and it got embedded in your foot.
As you walk it occasionally hurts, occasionally not.
Sometimes you may step on a stone or a stump and it really hurts, so you feel around your foot.
But not finding anything you shrug it off and walk on a bit more.
Eventually you step on something else, and the pain arises again.
Now this happens many times.
What is the cause of that pain?
The cause is that splinter or thorn embedded in your foot.
The pain is constantly near.
Whenever the pain arises you may take a look and feel around a bit, but, not seeing the splinter, you let it go.
After a while it hurts again so you take another look.
When suffering arises you must note it, don't just shrug it off.
Whenever the pain arises… “Hmm… that splinter is still there.” Whenever the pain arises there arises also the thought that that splinter has got to go.
If you don't take it out there will only be more pain later on.
The pain keeps recurring again and again, until the desire to take out that thorn is constantly with you.
In the end it reaches a point where you make up your mind once and for all to get out that thorn — because it hurts!
Now our effort in the practice must be like this.
Wherever it hurts, wherever there's friction, we must investigate.
Confront the problem, head on.
Take that thorn out of your foot, just pull it out.
Wherever your mind gets stuck you must take note.
As you look into it you will know it, see it and experience it as it is.
But our practice must be unwavering and persistent.
They call it viriyarambha — putting forth constant effort.
Whenever an unpleasant feeling arises in your foot, for example, you must remind yourself to get out that thorn, don't give up your resolve.
Likewise, when suffering arises in our hearts we must have the unwavering resolve to try to uproot the defilements, to give them up.
This resolve is constantly there, unremitting.
Eventually the defilements will fall into our hands where we can finish them off.
So in regard to happiness and suffering, what are we to do?
If we didn't have these things what could we use as a cause to precipitate wisdom?
If there is no cause how will the effect arise?
All dhammas arise because of causes.
When the result ceases it's because the cause has ceased.
This is how it is, but most of us don't really understand.
People only want to run away from suffering.
This sort of knowledge is short of the mark.
Actually we need to know this very world that we are living in, we don't have to run away anywhere.
You should have the attitude that to stay is fine… and to go is fine.
Think about this carefully.
Where do happiness and suffering lie?
Whatever we don't hold fast to, cling to or fix on to, as if it weren't there.
Suffering doesn't arise.
Suffering arises from existence.
If there is existence then there is birth.
Upadana — clinging or attachment — this is the pre-requisite which creates suffering.
Wherever suffering arises look into it.
Don't look too far away, look right into the present moment.
Look at your own mind and body.
When suffering arises… “Why is there suffering?” Look right now.
When happiness arises, what is the cause of that happiness?
Look right there.
Wherever these things arise be aware.
Both happiness and suffering arise from clinging.
The cultivators of old saw their minds in this way.
There is only arising and ceasing.
There is no abiding entity.
They contemplated from all angles and saw that there was nothing much to this mind, nothing is stable.
There is only arising and ceasing, ceasing and arising, nothing is of any lasting substance.
While walking or sitting they saw things in this way.
Wherever they looked there was only suffering, that's all.
It's just like a big iron ball which has just been blasted in a furnace.
It's hot all over.
If you touch the top it's hot, touch the sides and they're hot — it's hot all over.
There isn't any place on it which is cool.
Now if we don't consider these things we know nothing about them.
We must see clearly.
Don't get “born” into things, don't fall into birth.
Know the workings of birth.
Such thoughts as, “Oh, I can't stand that person, he does everything wrongly,” will no longer arise.
Or, “I really like so and so…”, these things don't arise.
There remain merely the conventional worldly standards of like and dislike, but one's speech is one way, one's mind another.
They are separate things.
We must use the conventions of the world to communicate with each other, but inwardly we must be empty.
The mind is above those things.
We must bring the mind to transcendence like this.
This is the abiding of the Noble Ones.
We must all aim for this and practice accordingly.
Don't get caught up in doubts.
Before I started to practice, I thought to myself, “The Buddhist religion is here, available for all, and yet why do only some people practice while others don't?
Or if they do practice, they do so only for a short while then give up.
Or again those who don't give it up still don't knuckle down and do the practice?
Why is this?” So I resolved to myself, “Okay… I'll give up this body and mind for this lifetime and try to follow the teaching of the Buddha down to the last detail.
I'll reach understanding in this very lifetime… because if I don't I'll still be sunk in suffering.
I'll let go of everything else and make a determined effort, no matter how much difficulty or suffering I have to endure, I'll persevere.
If I don't do it I'll just keep on doubting.
Thinking like this I got down to practice.
No matter how much happiness, suffering or difficulty I had to endure I would do it.
I looked on my whole life as if it was only one day and a night.
I gave it up.
“I'll follow the teaching of the Buddha, I'll follow the Dhamma to understanding — Why is this world of delusion so wretched?” I wanted to know, I wanted to master the Teaching, so I turned to the practice of Dhamma.
How much of the worldly life do we monastics renounce?
If we have gone forth for good then it means we renounce it all, there's nothing we don't renounce.
All the things of the world that people enjoy are cast off: sights, sounds, smells, tastes and feelings… we throw them all away.
And yet we experience them.
So Dhamma practitioners must be content with little and remain detached.
Whether in regard to speech, in eating or whatever, we must be easily satisfied: eat simply, sleep simply, live simply.
Just like they say, “an ordinary person,” one who lives simply.
The more you practice the more you will be able to take satisfaction in your practice.
You will see into your own heart.
The Dhamma is paccattam, you must know it for yourself.
To know for yourself means to practice for yourself.
You can depend on a teacher only fifty percent of the way.
Even the teaching I have given you today is completely useless in itself, even if it is worth hearing.
But if you were to believe it all just because I said so you wouldn't be using the teaching properly.
If you believed me completely then you'd be foolish.
To hear the teaching, see its benefit, put it into practice for yourself, see it within yourself, do it yourself… this is much more useful.
You will then know the taste of Dhamma for yourself.
This is why the Buddha didn't talk about the fruits of the practice in much detail, because it's something one can't convey in words.
It would be like trying to describe different colors to a person blind from birth, “Oh, it's so white,” or “it's bright yellow,” for instance.
You couldn't convey those colors to them.
You could try but it wouldn't serve much purpose.
The Buddha brings it back down to the individual — see clearly for yourself.
If you see clearly for yourself you will have clear proof within yourself.
Whether standing, walking, sitting or reclining you will be free of doubt.
Even if someone were to say, “Your practice isn't right, it's all wrong,” still you would be unmoved, because you have your own proof.
A practitioner of the Dhamma must be like this wherever he goes.
Others can't tell you, you must know for yourself.
Sammaditthi, Right View, must be there.
The practice must be like this for every one of us.
To do the real practice like this for even one month out of five or ten rains retreats would be rare.
Our sense organs must be constantly working.
Know content and discontent, be aware of like and dislike.
Know appearance and know transcendence.
The Apparent and the Transcendent must be realized simultaneously.
Good and evil must be seen as co-existent, arising together.
This is the fruit of the Dhamma practice.
So whatever is useful to yourself and to others, whatever practice benefits both yourself and others, is called “following the Buddha.” I've talked about this often.
The things which should be done, people seem to neglect.
For example, the work in the monastery, the standards of practice and so on.
I've talked about them often and yet people don't seem to put their hearts into it.
Some don't know, some are lazy and can't be bothered, some are simply scattered and confused.
But that's a cause for wisdom to arise.
If we go to places where none of these things arise, what would we see?
Take food, for instance.
If food doesn't have any taste is it delicious?
If a person is deaf will he hear anything?
If you don't perceive anything will you have anything to contemplate?
If there are no problems will there be anything to solve?
Think of the practice in this way.
Once I went to live up north.
At that time I was living with many monks, all of them elderly but newly ordained, with only two or three rains retreat.
At the time I had ten rains.
Living with those old monks I decided to perform the various duties — receiving their bowls, washing their robes, emptying their spittoons and so on.
I didn't think in terms of doing it for any particular individual, I simply maintained my practice.
If others didn't do the duties I'd do them myself.
I saw it as a good opportunity for me to gain merit.
It made me feel good and gave me a sense of satisfaction.
On the uposatha days I knew the required duties.
I'd go and clean out the uposatha hall and set out water for washing and drinking.
The others didn't know anything about the duties, they just watched.
I didn't criticize them, because they didn't know.
I did the duties myself, and having done them I felt pleased with myself, I had inspiration and a lot of energy in my practice.
Whenever I could do something in the monastery, whether in my own kuti or others, if it was dirty, I'd clean up.
I didn't do it for anyone in particular, I didn't do it to impress anyone, I simply did it to maintain a good practice.
Cleaning a kuti or dwelling place is just like cleaning rubbish out of your own mind.
Now this is something all of you should bear in mind.
You don't have to worry about harmony, it will automatically be there.
Live together with Dhamma, with peace and restraint, train your mind to be like this and no problems will arise.
If there is heavy work to be done everybody helps out and in no long time the work is done, it gets taken care of quite easily.
That's the best way.
I have come across some other types, though… although I used it as an opportunity to grow.
For instance, living in a big monastery, the monks and novices may agree among themselves to wash robes on a certain day.
I'd go and boil up the jackfruit wood.
Now there'd be some monks who'd wait for someone else to boil up the jackfruit wood and then come along and wash their robes, take them back to their kutis, hang them out and then take a nap.
They didn't have to set up the fire, didn't have to clean up afterwards… they thought they were on a good thing, that they were being clever.
This is the height of stupidity.
These people are just increasing their own stupidity because they don't do anything, they leave all the work up to others.
They wait till everything is ready then come along and make use of it, it's easy for them.
This is just adding to one's foolishness.
Those actions serve no useful purpose whatsoever to them.
Some people think foolishly like this.
They shirk the required duties and think that this is being clever, but it is actually very foolish.
If we have that sort of attitude we won't last.
Therefore, whether speaking, eating or doing anything whatsoever, reflect on yourself.
You may want to live comfortably, eat comfortably, sleep comfortably and so on, but you can't.
What have we come here for?
If we regularly reflect on this we will be heedful, we won't forget, we will be constantly alert.
Being alert like this you will put forth effort in all postures.
If you don't put forth effort things go quite differently… Sitting, you sit like you're in the town, walking, you walk like you're in the town… you just want to go and play around in the town with the laypeople.
If there is no effort in the practice the mind will tend in that direction.
You don't oppose and resist your mind, you just allow it to waft along the wind of your moods.
This is called following one's moods.
Like a child, if we indulge all its wants will it be a good child?
If the parents indulge all their child's wishes is that good?
Even if they do indulge it somewhat at first, by the time it can speak they may start to occasionally spank it because they're afraid it'll end up stupid.
The training of our mind must be like this.
You have to know yourself and how to train yourself.
If you don't know how to train your own mind, waiting around expecting someone else to train it for you, you'll end up in trouble.
So don't think that you can't practice in this place.
Practice has no limits.
Whether standing, walking, sitting or lying down, you can always practice.
Even while sweeping the monastery grounds or seeing a beam of sunlight, you can realize the Dhamma.
But you must have sati at hand.
Why so?
Because you can realize the Dhamma at any time at all, in any place, if you ardently meditate.
Don't be heedless.
Be watchful, be alert.
While walking on almsround there are all sorts of feelings arising, and it's all good Dhamma.
When you get back to the monastery and are eating your food there's plenty of good Dhamma for you to look into.
If you have constant effort all these things will be objects for contemplation, there will be wisdom, you will see the dhamma.
This is called dhamma-vicaya, reflecting on Dhamma.
It's one of the enlightenment factors.
If there is sati, recollection, there will be dhamma-vicaya as a result.
These are factors of enlightenment.
If we have recollection then we won't simply take it easy, there will also be inquiry into Dhamma.
These things become factors for realizing the Dhamma.
If we have reached this stage then our practice will know neither day or night, it will continue on regardless of the time of day.
There will be nothing to taint the practice, or if there is we will immediately know it.
Let there be dhamma-vicaya within our minds constantly, looking into Dhamma.
If our practice has entered the flow the mind will tend to be like this.
It won't go off after other things… “I think I'll go for a trip over there, or perhaps this other place… over in that province should be interesting…” That's the way of the world.
Not long and the practice will die.
So resolve yourselves.
It's not just by sitting with your eyes closed that you develop wisdom.
Eyes, ears, nose, tongue, body and mind are constantly with us, so be constantly alert.
Study constantly.
Seeing trees or animals can all be occasions for study.
Bring it all inwards.
See clearly within your own heart.
If some sensation makes impact on the heart, witness it clearly for yourself, don't simply disregard it.
Take a simple comparison: baking bricks.
Have you ever seen a brick-baking oven?
They build the fire up about two or three feet in front of the oven, then the smoke all gets drawn into it.
Looking at this illustration you can more clearly understand the practice.
Making a brick kiln in the right way you have to make the fire so that all the smoke gets drawn inside, none is left over.
All the heat goes into the oven, and the job gets done quickly.
We Dhamma practitioners should experience things in this way.
All our feelings will be drawn inwards to be turned into Right View.
Seeing sights, hearing sounds, smelling odors, tasting flavors and so on, the mind draws them all inward to be converted into Right View.
Those feelings thus become experiences which give rise to wisdom.
There was once a western monk, a student of mine.
Whenever he saw Thai monks and novices disrobing he would say, “Oh, what a shame!
Why do they do that?
Why do so many of the Thai monks and novices disrobe?” He was shocked.
He would get saddened at the disrobing of the Thai monks and novices, because he had only just come into contact with Buddhism.
He was inspired, he was resolute.
Going forth as a monk was the only thing to do, he thought he'd never disrobe.
Whoever disrobed was a fool.
He'd see the Thais taking on the robes at the beginning of the Rains Retreat as monks and novices and then disrobing at the end of it… “Oh, how sad!
I feel so sorry for those Thai monks and novices.
How could they do such a thing?
Well, as time went by some of the western monks began to disrobe, so he came to see it as something not so important after all.
At first, when he had just begun to practice, he was excited about it.
He thought that it was really important thing, to become a monk.
He thought it would be easy.
When people are inspired it all seems to be so right and good.
There's nothing there to gauge their feelings by, so they go ahead and decide for themselves.
But they don't really know what practice is.
Those who do know will have a thoroughly firm foundation within their hearts — but even so they don't need to advertise it.
As for myself, when I was first ordained I didn't actually do much practice, but I had a lot of faith.
I don't know why, maybe it was there from birth.
The monks and novices who went forth together with me, come the end of the Rains, all disrobed.
I thought to myself, “Eh?
What is it with these people?” However, I didn't dare say anything to them because I wasn't yet sure of my own feelings, I was too stirred up.
But within me I felt that they were all foolish.
“It's difficult to go forth, easy to disrobe.
These guys don't have much merit, they think that the way of the world is more useful than the way of Dhamma.” I thought like this but I didn't say anything, I just watched my own mind.
I'd see the monks who'd gone forth with me disrobing one after the other.
Sometimes they'd dress up and come back to the monastery to show off.
I'd see them and think they were crazy, but they thought they looked snappy.
When you disrobe you have to do this and that… I'd think to myself that that way of thinking was wrong.
I wouldn't say it, though, because I myself was still an uncertain quantity.
I still wasn't sure how long my faith would last.
When my friends had all disrobed I dropped all concern, there was nobody left to concern myself with.
I picked up the Patimokkha and got stuck into learning that.
There was nobody left to distract me and waste my time, so I put my heart into the practice.
Still I didn't say anything because I felt that to practice all one's life, maybe seventy, eighty or even ninety years, and to keep up a persistent effort, without slackening up or losing one's resolve, seemed like an extremely difficult thing to do.
Those who went forth would go forth, those who disrobed would disrobe.
I'd just watch it all.
I didn't concern myself whether they stayed or went.
I'd watch my friends leave, but the feeling I had within me was that these people didn't see clearly.
That western monk probably thought like that.
he'd see people become monks for only one Rains Retreat, and get upset.
Later on he reached a stage we call… bored; bored with the Holy Life.
He let go of the practice and eventually disrobed.
“Why are you disrobing?
Before, when you saw the Thai monks disrobing you'd say, 'Oh, what a shame!
How sad, how pitiful.' Now, when you yourself want to disrobe, why don't you feel sorry now?
He didn't answer.
He just grinned sheepishly.
When it comes to the training of the mind it isn't easy to find a good standard if you haven't yet developed a “witness” within yourself.
In most external matters we can rely on others for feedback, there are standards and precedents.
But when it comes to using the Dhamma as a standard… do we have the Dhamma yet?
Are we thinking rightly or not?
And even if it's right, do we know how to let go of rightness or are we still clinging to it?
You must contemplate until you reach the point where you let go, this is the important thing… until you reach the point where there isn't anything left, where there is neither good nor bad.
You throw it off.
This means you throw out everything.
If it's all gone then there's no remainder; if there's some remainder then it's not all gone.
So in regard to this training of the mind, sometimes we may say it's easy.
it's easy to say, but it's hard to do, very hard.
It's hard in that it doesn't conform to our desires.
Sometimes it seems almost as if the angels were helping us out.
Everything goes right, whatever we think or say seems to be just right.
Then we go and attach to that rightness and before long we go wrong and it all turns bad.
This is where it's difficult.
We don't have a standard to gauge things by.
People who have a lot of faith, who are endowed with confidence and belief but are lacking in wisdom, may be very good at samadhi but they may not have much insight.
They see only one side of everything, and simply follow that.
They don't reflect.
This is blind faith.
In Buddhism we call this Saddha adhimokkha, blind faith.
They have faith all right but it's not born of wisdom.
But they don't see this at the time, they believe they have wisdom, so they don't see where they are wrong.
Therefore they teach about the Five Powers: Saddha, viriya, sati, samadhi, pañña.
Saddha is conviction; viriya is diligent effort; sati is recollection; samadhi is fixedness of mind; pañña is all-embracing knowledge.
Don't say that pañña is simply knowledge — pañña is all-embracing, consummate knowledge.
The wise have given these five steps to us so that we can link them, firstly as an object of study, then as a gauge to compare to the state of our practice as it is.
For example, saddha, conviction.
Do we have conviction, have we developed it yet?
Viriya: do we have diligent effort or not?
Is our effort right or is it wrong?
We must consider this.
Everybody has some sort of effort, but does our effort contain wisdom or not?
Sati is the same.
Even a cat has sati.
When it sees a mouse, sati is there.
The cat's eyes stare fixedly at the mouse.
This is the sati of a cat.
Everybody has sati, animals have it, delinquents have it, sages have it.
Samadhi, fixedness of mind — everybody has this as well.
A cat has it when its mind is fixed on grabbing the mouse and eating it.
It has fixed intent.
That sati of the cat's is sati of a sort; samadhi, fixed intent on what it is doing, is also there.
Pañña, knowledge, like that of human beings.
It knows as an animal knows, it has enough knowledge to catch mice for food.
These five things are called powers.
Have these Five Powers arisen from Right View, sammaditthi, or not?
Saddha, viriya, sati, samadhi, pañña — have these arisen from Right View?
What is Right View?
What is our standard for gauging Right View?
We must clearly understand this.
Right View is the understanding that all these things are uncertain.
Therefore the Buddha and all the Noble Ones don't hold fast to them.
They hold, but not fast.
They don't let that holding become an identity.
The holding which doesn't lead to becoming is that which isn't tainted with desire.
Without seeking to become this or that there is simply the practice itself.
When you hold on to a particular thing is there enjoyment, or is there displeasure?
If there is pleasure, do you hold on to that pleasure?
If there is dislike, do you hold on to that dislike?
Some views can be used as principles for gauging our practice more accurately.
Such as knowing such views as that one is better than others, or equal to others, or more foolish than others, as all wrong views.
We may feel these things but we also know them with wisdom, that they simply arise and cease.
Seeing that we are better than others is not right; seeing that we are equal to others is not right; seeing that we are inferior to others is not right.
The right view is the one that cuts through all of this.
So where do we go to?
If we think we are better than others, pride arises.
It's there but we don't see it.
If we think we are equal to others, we fail to show respect and humility at the proper times.
If we think we are inferior to others we get depressed, thinking we are inferior, born under a bad sign and so on.
We are still clinging to the Five Khandhas, it's all simply becoming and birth.
This is one standard for gauging ourselves by.
Another one is: if we encounter a pleasant experience we feel happy, if we encounter a bad experience we are unhappy.
Are we able to look at both the things we like and the things we dislike as having equal value?
Measure yourself against this standard.
In our everyday lives, in the various experiences we encounter, if we hear something which we like, does our mood change?
If we encounter an experience which isn't to our liking, does our mood change?
Or is the mind unmoved?
Looking right here we have a gauge.
Just know yourself, this is your witness.
Don't make decisions on the strength of your desires.
Desires can puff us up into thinking we are something which we're not.
We must be very circumspect.
There are so many angles and aspects to consider, but the right way is not to follow your desires, but the Truth.
We should know both the good and the bad, and when we know them to let go of them.
If we don't let go we are still there, we still “exist,” we still “have.” If we still “are” then there is a remainder, there are becoming and birth in store.
Therefore the Buddha said to judge only yourself, don't judge others, no matter how good or evil they may be.
The Buddha merely points out the way, saying “The truth is like this.” Now, is our mind like that or not?
For instance, suppose a monk took some things belonging to another monk, then that other monk accused him, “You stole my things.” “I didn't steal them, I only took them.” So we ask a third monk to adjudicate.
How should he decide?
He would have to ask the offending monk to appear before the convened Sangha.
“Yes, I took it, but I didn't steal it.” Or in regard to other rules, such as parajika or sanghadisesa offenses: “Yes, I did it, but I didn't have intention.” How can you believe that?
It's tricky.
If you can't believe it, all you can do is leave the onus with the doer, it rests on him.
But you should know that we can't hide the things that arise in our minds.
You can't cover them up, either the wrongs or the good actions.
Whether actions are good or evil, you can't dismiss them simply by ignoring them, because these things tend to reveal themselves.
They conceal themselves, they reveal themselves, they exist in and of themselves.
They are all automatic.
This is how things work.
Don't try to guess at or speculate about these things.
As long as there is still avijja they are not finished with.
The Chief Privy Councilor once asked me, “Luang Por, is the mind of an anagami pure yet?
“It's partly pure.
“Eh?
An anagami has given up sensual desire, how is his mind not yet pure?
“He may have let go of sensual desire, but there is still something remaining, isn't there?
There is still avijja.
If there is still something left then there is still something left.
It's like the bhikkhus' alms bowls.
There are “a large-size large bowl; a medium-sized large bowl, a small-sized large bowl; then a large-sized medium bowl, a medium-sized medium bowl, a small-sized medium bowl; then there are a large-sized small bowl, a medium-sized small bowl and a small-sized small bowl… No matter how small it is there is still a bowl there, right?
That's how it is with this…sotapanna, sakadagami, anagami… they have all given up certain defilements, but only to their respective levels.
Whatever still remains, those Noble Ones don't see.
If they could they would all be arahants.
They still can't see all.
Avijja is that which doesn't see.
If the mind of the anagami was completely straightened out he wouldn't be an anagami, he would be fully accomplished.
But there is still something remaining.
“Is his mind purified?
“Well, it is somewhat, but not %.
How else could I answer?
He said that later on he would come and question me about it further.
He can look into it, the standard is there.
Don't be careless.
Be alert.
The Lord Buddha exhorted us to be alert.
In regards to this training of the heart, I've had my moments of temptation too, you know.
I've often been tempted to try many things but they've always seemed like they're going astray of the path.
It's really just a sort of swaggering in one's mind, a sort of conceit.
Ditthi, views, and mana, pride, are there.
It's hard enough just to be aware of these two things.
There was once a man who wanted to become a monk here.
He carried in his robes, determined to become a monk in memory of his late mother.
He came into the monastery, laid down his robes, and without so much as paying respects to the monks, started walking meditation right in front of the main hall… back and forth, back and forth, like he was really going to show his stuff.
I thought, “Oh, so there are people around like this, too!” This is called saddha adhimokkha — blind faith.
He must have determined to get enlightened before sundown or something, he thought it would be so easy.
He didn't look at anybody else, just put his head down and walked as if his life depended on it.
I just let him carry on, but I thought, “Oh, man, you think it's that easy or something?” In the end I don't know how long he stayed, I don't even think he ordained.
As soon as the mind thinks of something we send it out, send it out every time.
We don't realize that it's simply the habitual proliferation of the mind.
It disguises itself as wisdom and waffles off into minute detail.
This mental proliferation seems very clever, if we didn't know we would mistake it for wisdom.
But when it comes to the crunch it's not the real thing.
When suffering arises where is that so-called wisdom then?
Is it of any use?
It's only proliferation after all.
So stay with the Buddha.
As I've said before many times, in our practice we must turn inwards and find the Buddha.
Where is the Buddha?
The Buddha is still alive to this very day, go in and find him.
Where is he?
At aniccam, go in and find him there, go and bow to him: aniccam, uncertainty.
You can stop right there for starters.
If the mind tries to tell you, “I'm a sotapanna now,” go and bow to the sotapanna.
He'll tell you himself, “It's all uncertain.” If you meet a sakadagami go and pay respects to him.
When he sees you he'll simply say “Not a sure thing!” If there is an anagami go and bow to him.
He'll tell you only one thing… “Uncertain.” If you meet even an arahant, go and bow to him, he'll tell you even more firmly, “It's all even more uncertain!” You'll hear the words of the Noble Ones… “Everything is uncertain, don't cling to anything.
Don't just look at the Buddha like a simpleton.
Don't cling to things, holding fast to them without letting go.
Look at things as functions of the Apparent and then send them on to Transcendence.
That's how you must be.
There must be Appearance and there must be Transcendence.
So I say “Go to the Buddha.” Where is the Buddha?
The Buddha is the Dhamma.
All the teachings in this world can be contained in this one teaching: aniccam.
Think about it.
I've searched for over forty years as a monk and this is all I could find.
That and patient endurance.
This is how to approach the Buddha's teaching… aniccam: it's all uncertain.
No matter how sure the mind wants to be, just tell it “Not sure!.” Whenever the mind wants to grab on to something as a sure thing, just say, “It's not sure, it's transient.” Just ram it down with this.
Using the Dhamma of the Buddha it all comes down to this.
It's not that it's merely a momentary phenomenon.
Whether standing, walking, sitting or lying down, you see everything in that way.
Whether liking arises or dislike arises you see it all in the same way.
This is getting close to the Buddha, close to the Dhamma.
Now I feel that this is more valuable way to practice.
All my practice from the early days up to the present time has been like this.
I didn't actually rely on the scriptures, but then I didn't disregard them either.
I didn't rely on a teacher but then I didn't exactly “go it alone.” My practice was all “neither this nor that.
Frankly it's a matter of “finishing off,” that is, practicing to the finish by taking up the practice and then seeing it to completion, seeing the Apparent and also the Transcendent.
I've already spoken of this, but some of you may be interested to hear it again: if you practice consistently and consider things thoroughly, you will eventually reach this point… At first you hurry to go forward, hurry to come back, and hurry to stop.
You continue to practice like this until you reach the point where it seems that going forward is not it, coming back is not it, and stopping is not it either!
It's finished.
This is the finish.
Don't expect anything more than this, it finishes right here.
Khinasavo — one who is completed.
He doesn't go forward, doesn't retreat and doesn't stop.
There's no stopping, no going forward and no coming back.
It's finished.
Consider this, realize it clearly in your own mind.
Right there you will find that there is really nothing at all.
Whether this is old or new to you depends on you, on your wisdom and discernment.
One who has no wisdom or discernment won't be able to figure it out.
Just take a look at trees, like mango or jackfruit trees.
If they grow up in a clump, one tree may get bigger first and then the others will bend away, growing outwards from that bigger one.
Why does this happen?
Who tells them to do that?
This is Nature.
Nature contains both the good and the bad, the right and the wrong.
It can either incline to the right or incline to the wrong.
If we plant any kind of trees at all close together, the trees which mature later will branch away from the bigger tree.
How does this happen?
Who determines it thus?
This is Nature, or Dhamma.
Likewise, tanha, desire, leads us to suffering.
Now, if we contemplate it, it will lead us out of desire, we will outgrow tanha.
By investigating tanha we will shake it up, making it gradually lighter and lighter until it's all gone.
The same as the trees: does anybody order them to grow the way they do?
They can't talk or move around and yet they know how to grow away from obstacles.
Wherever it's cramped and crowded and growing will be difficult, they bend outwards.
Right here is Dhamma, we don't have to look at a whole lot.
One who is astute will see the Dhamma in this.
Trees by nature don't know anything, they act on natural laws, yet they do know enough to grow away from danger, to incline towards a suitable place.
Reflective people are like this.
We go forth into the homeless life because we want to transcend suffering.
What is it that make us suffer?
If we follow the trail inwards we will find out.
That which we like and that which we don't like are suffering.
If they are suffering then don't go so close to them.
Do you want to fall in love with conditions or hate them?… they're all uncertain.
When we incline towards the Buddha all this comes to an end.
Don't forget this.
And patient endurance.
Just these two are enough.
If you have this sort of understanding this is very good.
Actually in my own practice I didn't have a teacher to give as much teachings as all of you get from me.
I didn't have many teachers.
I ordained in an ordinary village temple and lived in village temples for quite a few years.
In my mind I conceived the desire to practice, I wanted to be proficient, I wanted to train.
There wasn't anybody giving any teaching in those monasteries but the inspiration to practice arose.
I traveled and I looked around.
I had ears so I listened, I had eyes so I looked.
Whatever I heard people say, I'd tell myself, “Not sure.” Whatever I saw, I told myself, “Not sure,” or when the tongue contacted sweet, sour, salty, pleasant or unpleasant flavors, or feelings of comfort or pain arose in the body, I'd tell myself, “This is not a sure thing”!
And so I lived with Dhamma.
In truth it's all uncertain, but our desires want things to be certain.
what can we do?
We must be patient.
The most important thing is khanti, patient endurance.
Don't throw out the Buddha, what I call “uncertainty” — don't throw that away.
Sometimes I'd go to see old religious sites with ancient monastic buildings, designed by architects, built by craftsmen.
In some places they would be cracked.
Maybe one of my friends would remark, “Such a shame, isn't it?
It's cracked.” I'd answer, “If that weren't the case then there'd be no such thing as the Buddha, there'd be no Dhamma.
It's cracked like this because it's perfectly in line with the Buddha's teaching.” Really down inside I was also sad to see those buildings cracked but I'd throw off my sentimentality and try to say something which would be of use to my friends, and to myself.
Even though I also felt that it was a pity, still I tended towards the Dhamma.
“If it wasn't cracked like that there wouldn't be any Buddha!
I'd say it really heavy for the benefit of my friends… or perhaps they weren't listening, but still I was listening.
This is a way of considering things which is very, very useful.
For instance, say someone were to rush in and say, “Luang Por!
Do you know what so and so just said about you?” or, “He said such and such about you…” Maybe you even start to rage.
As soon as you hear words of criticism you start getting these moods every step of the way.
As soon as we hear words like this we may start getting ready to retaliate, but on looking into the truth of the matter we may find that… no, they had said something else after all.
And so it's another case of “uncertainty.” So why should we rush in and believe things?
Why should we put our trust so much in what others say?
Whatever we hear we should take note, be patient, look into the matter carefully… stay straight.
It's not that whatever pops into our heads we write it all down as some sort of truth.
Any speech which ignores uncertainty is not the speech of a sage.
Remember this.
As for being wise, we are no longer practicing.
Whatever we see or hear, be it pleasant or sorrowful, just say “This is not sure!” Say it heavy to yourself, hold it all down with this.
Don't build those things up into major issues, just keep them all down to this one.
This point is the important one.
This is the point where defilements die.
Practitioners shouldn't dismiss it.
If you disregard this point you can expect only suffering, expect only mistakes.
If you don't make this a foundation for your practice you are going to go wrong… but then you will come right again later on, because this principle is a really good one.
Actually the real Dhamma, the gist of what I have been saying today, isn't so mysterious.
Whatever you experience is simply form, simply feeling, simply perception, simply volition, and simply consciousness.
There are only these basic qualities, where is there any certainty within them?
If we come to understand the true nature of things like this, lust, infatuation and attachment fade away.
why do they fade away?
Because we understand, we know.
We shift from ignorance to understanding.
Understanding is born from ignorance, knowing is born from unknowing, purity is born from defilement.
It works like this.
Not discarding aniccam, the Buddha — This is what it means to say that the Buddha is still alive.
To stay that the Buddha has passed into Nibbana is not necessarily true.
In a more profound sense the Buddha is still alive.
It's much like how we define the word “bhikkhu.” If we define it as “one who asks,” the meaning is very broad.
We can define it this way, but to use this definition too much is not so good — we don't know when to stop asking!
If we were to define this word in a more profound way we would say: “Bhikkhu — one who sees the danger of Samsara.
Isn't this more profound?
It doesn't go in the same direction as the previous definition, it runs much deeper.
The practice of Dhamma is like this.
If you don't fully understand it, it becomes something else again.
It becomes priceless, it becomes a source of peace.
When we have sati we are close to the Dhamma.
If we have sati we will see aniccam, the transience of all things.
We will see the Buddha and transcend the suffering of samsara, if not now then sometime in the future.
If we throw away the attribute of the Noble Ones, the Buddha or the Dhamma, our practice will become barren and fruitless.
We must maintain our practice constantly, whether we are working or sitting or simply lying down.
When the eye sees form, the ear hears sound, the nose smells an odor, the tongue tastes a flavor or the body experiences sensation… in all things, don't throw away the Buddha, don't stray from the Buddha.
This is to be one who has come close to the Buddha, who reveres the Buddha constantly.
We have ceremonies for revering the Buddha, such as chanting in the morning Araham Samma Sambuddho Bhagava… This is one way of revering the Buddha but it's not revering the Buddha in such a profound way as I've described here.
It's the same as with that word “bhikkhu.” If we define it as “one who asks” then they keep on asking… because it's defined like that.
To define it in the best way we should say “Bhikkhu — one who sees the danger of samsara.
Now revering the Buddha is the same.
Revering the Buddha by merely reciting Pali phrases as a ceremony in the mornings and evenings is comparable to defining the word “bhikkhu” as “one who asks.” If we incline towards aniccam, dukkham and anatta whenever the eye sees form, the ear hears sound, the nose smells an odor, the tongue tastes a flavor, the body experiences sensation or the mind cognizes mental impressions, at all times, this is comparable to defining the word “bhikkhu” as “one who sees the danger of samsara.” It's so much more profound, cuts through so many things.
If we understand this teaching we will grow in wisdom and understanding.
This is called patipada.
Develop this attitude in the practice and you will be on the right path.
If you think and reflect in this way, even though you may be far from your teacher you will still be close to him.
If you live close to the teacher physically but your mind has not yet met him you will spend your time either looking for his faults or adulating him.
If he does something which suits you, you say he's no good — and that's as far as your practice goes.
You won't achieve anything by wasting your time looking at someone else.
But if you understand this teaching you can become a Noble One in the present moment.
That's why this year I've distanced myself from my disciples, both old and new, and not given much teaching: so that you can all look into things for yourselves as much as possible.
For the newer monks I've already laid down the schedule and rules of the monastery, such as: “don't talk too much.” Don't transgress the existing standards, the path to realization, fruition and nibbana.
Anyone who transgresses these standards is not a real practitioner, not one who has with a pure intention to practice.
What can such a person ever hope to see?
Even if he slept near me every day he wouldn't see me.
Even if he slept near the Buddha he wouldn't see the Buddha, if he didn't practice.
So knowing the Dhamma or seeing the Dhamma depends on practice.
Have confidence, purify your own heart.
If all the monks in this monastery put awareness into their respective minds we wouldn't have to reprimand or praise anybody.
We wouldn't have to be suspicious of or favor anybody.
If anger or dislike arise just leave them at the mind, but see them clearly!
Keep on looking at those things.
As long as there is still something there it means we still have to dig and grind away right there.
Some say “I can't cut it, I can't do it,” — if we start saying things like this there will only be a bunch of punks here, because nobody cuts at their own defilements.
You must try.
If you can't yet cut it, dig in deeper.
Dig at the defilements, uproot them.
Dig them out even if they seem hard and fast.
The Dhamma is not something to be reached by following your desires.
Your mind may be one way, the truth another.
You must watch up front and keep a lookout behind as well.
That's why I say, “It's all uncertain, all transient.
This truth of uncertainty, this short and simple truth, at the same time so profound and faultless, people tend to ignore.
They tend to see things differently.
Don't cling to goodness, don't cling to badness.
These are attributes of the world.
We are practicing to be free of the world, so bring these things to an end.
The Buddha taught to lay them down, to give them up, because they only cause suffering.
When the group of five ascetics abandoned the Buddha, he saw it as a stroke of luck, because he would be able to continue his practice unhindered.
With the five ascetics living with him, things weren't so peaceful, he had responsibilities.
And now the five ascetics had abandoned him because they felt that he had slackened his practice and reverted to indulgence.
Previously he had been intent on his ascetic practices and self-mortification.
In regards to eating, sleeping and so on, he had tormented himself severely, but it came to a point where, looking into it honestly, he saw that such practices just weren't working.
It was simply a matter of views, practicing out of pride and clinging.
He had mistaken worldly values and mistaken himself for the truth.
For example if one decides to throw oneself into ascetic practices with the intention of gaining praise — this kind of practice is all “world-inspired,” practicing for adulation and fame.
Practicing with this kind of intention is called “mistaking worldly ways for truth.
Another way to practice is “to mistake one's own views for truth.” You only believe yourself, in your own practice.
No matter what others say you stick to your own preferences.
You don't carefully consider the practice.
this is called “mistaking oneself for truth.
Whether you take the world or take yourself to be truth, it's all simply blind attachment.
The Buddha saw this, and saw that there was no “adhering to the Dhamma,” practicing for the truth.
So his practice had been fruitless, he still hadn't given up defilements.
Then he turned around and reconsidered all the work he had put into practice right from the beginning in terms of results.
What were the results of all that practice?
Looking deeply into it he saw that it just wasn't right.
It was full of conceit, and full of the world.
There was no dhamma, no insight into anatta no emptiness or letting go.
There may have been letting go of a kind, but it was the kind that still hadn't let go.
Looking carefully at the situation, the Buddha saw that even if he were to explain these things to the five ascetics they wouldn't be able to understand.
It wasn't something he could easily convey to them, because those ascetics were still firmly entrenched in the old way of practice and seeing things.
The Buddha saw that you could practice like that until your dying day, maybe even starve to death, and achieve nothing, because such practice is inspired by worldly values and by pride.
Considering deeply, he saw the right practice, samma patipada: the mind is the mind, the body is the body.
The body isn't desire or defilement.
Even if you were to destroy the body you wouldn't destroy defilements.
That's not their source.
Even fasting and going without sleep until the body was a shrivelled-up wraith wouldn't exhaust the defilements.
But the belief that defilements could be dispelled in that way, the teaching of self-mortification, was deeply ingrained into the five ascetics.
The Buddha then began to take more food, eating as normal, practicing in a more natural way.
When the five ascetics saw the change in the Buddha's practice they figured that he had given up and reverted to sensual indulgence.
One person's understanding was shifting to a higher level, transcending appearances, while the other saw that that person's view was sliding downwards, reverting to comfort.
Self-mortification was deeply ingrained into the minds of the five ascetics because the Buddha had previously taught and practiced like that.
Now he saw the fault in it.
By seeing the fault in it clearly, he was able to let it go.
When the five ascetics saw the Buddha doing this they left him, feeling that he was practicing wrongly and that they would no longer follow him.
Just as birds abandon a tree which no longer offers sufficient shade, or fish leave a pool of water that is too small, too dirty or not cool, just so did the five ascetics abandon the Buddha.
So now the Buddha concentrated on contemplating the Dhamma.
He ate more comfortably and lived more naturally.
He let the mind be simply the mind, the body simply the body.
He didn't force his practice in excess, just enough to loosen the grip of greed, aversion, and delusion.
Previously he had walked the two extremes: kamasukhallikanuyogo — if happiness or love arose he would be aroused and attach to them.
He would identify with them and wouldn't let go.
If he encountered pleasantness he would stick to that, if he encountered suffering he would stick to that.
These two extremes he called kamasukhallikanuyogo and attakilamathanuyogo.
The Buddha had been stuck on conditions.
He saw clearly that these two ways are not the way for a samana.
Clinging to happiness, clinging to suffering: a samana is not like this.
To cling to those things is not the way.
Clinging to those things he was stuck in the views of self and the world.
If he were to flounder in these two ways he would never become one who clearly knew the world.
He would be constantly running from one extreme to the other.
Now the Buddha fixed his attention on the mind itself and concerned himself with training that.
All facets of nature proceed according to their supporting conditions, they aren't any problem in themselves.
For instance, illnesses in the body.
The body experiences pain, sickness, fever and colds and so on.
These all naturally occur.
Actually people worry about their bodies too much.
That they worry about and cling to their bodies so much is because of wrong view, they can't let go.
Look at this hall here.
We build the hall and say it's ours, but lizards come and live here, rats and geckoes come and live here, and we are always driving them away, because we see that the hall belongs to us, not the rats and lizards.
It's the same with illnesses in the body.
We take this body to be our home, something that really belongs to us.
If we happen to get a headache or stomach-ache we get upset, we don't want the pain and suffering.
These legs are “our legs,” we don't want them to hurt, these arms are “our arms,” we don't want anything to go wrong with it.
We've got to cure all pains and illnesses at all costs.
This is where we are fooled and stray from the truth.
We are simply visitors to this body.
Just like this hall here, it's not really ours.
We are simply temporary tenants, like the rats, lizards and geckoes… but we don't know this.
This body is the same.
Actually the Buddha taught that there is no abiding self within this body but we go and grasp on to it as being our self, as really being “us” and “them.” When the body changes we don't want it to do so.
No matter how much we are told we don't understand.
If I say it straight you get even more fooled.
“This isn't yourself,” I say, and you go even more astray, you get even more confused and your practice just reinforces the self.
So most people don't really see the self.
One who sees the self is one who sees that “this is neither the self nor belonging to self.” He sees the self as it is in Nature.
Seeing the self through the power of clinging is not real seeing.
Clinging interferes with the whole business.
It's not easy to realize this body as it is because upadana clings fast to it all.
Therefore it is said that we must investigate to clearly know with wisdom.
This means to investigate the sankhara according to their true nature.
Use wisdom.
To know the true nature of sankhara is wisdom.
If you don't know the true nature of sankhara you are at odds with them, always resisting them.
Now, it is better to let go of the sankhara or to try to oppose or resist them.
And yet we plead with them to comply with our wishes.
We look for all sorts of means to organize them or “make a deal” with them.
If the body gets sick and is in pain we don't want it to be, so we look for various Suttas to chant, such as Bojjhango, the Dhammacakkappavattana-sutta, the Anattalakkhanasutta and so on.
We don't want the body to be in pain, we want to protect it, control it.
These Suttas become some form of mystical ceremony, getting us even more entangled in clinging.
This is because they chant them in order to ward off illness, to prolong life and so on.
Actually the Buddha gave us these teachings in order to see clearly but we end up chanting them to increase our delusion.
Rupam aniccam, vedana anicca, sañña anicca, sankhara anicca, viññanam aniccam… We don't chant these words for increasing our delusion.
They are recollections to help us know the truth of the body, so that we can let it go and give up our longing.
This is called chanting to cut things down, but we tend to chant in order to extend them all, or if we feel they're too long we try chanting to shorten them, to force nature to conform to our wishes.
It's all delusion.
All the people sitting there in the hall are deluded, every one of them.
The ones chanting are deluded, the ones listening are deluded, they're all deluded!
All they can think is “How can we avoid suffering?” Where are they ever going to practice?
Whenever illnesses arise, those who know see nothing strange about it.
Getting born into this world entails experiencing illness.
However, even the Buddha and the Noble Ones, contracting illness in the course of things, would also, in the course of things, treat it with medicine.
For them it was simply a matter of correcting the elements.
They didn't blindly cling to the body or grasp at mystic ceremonies and such.
They treated illnesses with Right View, they didn't treat them with delusion.
“If it heals, it heals, if it doesn't then it doesn't” — that's how they saw things.
They say that nowadays Buddhism in Thailand is thriving, but it looks to me like it's sunk almost as far as it can go.
The Dhamma Halls are full of attentive ears, but they're attending wrongly.
Even the senior members of the community are like this, so everybody just leads each other into more delusion.
One who sees this will know that the true practice is almost opposite from where most people are going, the two sides can barely understand each other.
How are those people going to transcend suffering?
They have chants for realizing the truth but they turn around and use them to increase their delusion.
They turn their backs on the right path.
One goes eastward, the other goes west — how are they ever going to meet?
They're not even close to each other.
If you have looked into this you will see that this is the case.
Most people are lost.
But how can you tell them?
Everything has become rites and rituals and mystic ceremonies.
they chant but they chant with foolishness, they don't chant with wisdom.
They study, but they study with foolishness, not with wisdom.
They know, but they know foolishly, not with wisdom.
So they end up going with foolishness, living with foolishness, knowing with foolishness.
That's how it is.
And teaching… all they do these days is teach people to be stupid.
They say they're teaching people to be clever, giving them knowledge, but when you look at it in terms of truth, you see that they're really teaching people to go astray and grasp at deceptions.
The real foundation of the teaching is in order to see atta, the self, as being empty, having no fixed identity.
It's void of intrinsic being.
But people come to the study of Dhamma to increase their self-view, so they don't want to experience suffering or difficulty.
They want everything to be cozy.
They may want to transcend suffering, but if there is still a self how can they ever do so?
Just consider… Suppose we came to possess a very expensive object.
The minute that thing comes into our possession our mind changes… “Now, where can I keep it?
If I leave it there somebody might steal it”… We worry ourselves into a state, trying to find a place to keep it.
And when did the mind change?
It changed the minute we obtained that object — suffering arose right then.
No matter where we leave that object we can't relax, so we're left with trouble.
Whether sitting, walking, or lying down, we are lost in worry.
This is suffering.
And when did it arise?
It arose as soon as we understood that we had obtained something, that's where the suffering lies.
Before we had that object there was no suffering.
It hadn't yet arisen because there wasn't yet an object for it to cling to.
Atta, the self, is the same.
if we think in terms of “my self,” then everything around us becomes “mine.” Confusion follows.
Why so?
The cause of it all is that there is a self, we don't peel off the apparent in order to see the Transcendent.
You see, the self is only an appearance.
You have to peel away the appearances in order to see the heart of the matter, which is Transcendence.
Upturn the apparent to find the Transcendent.
You could compare it to unthreshed rice.
Can unthreshed rice be eaten?
Sure it can, but you must thresh it first.
Get rid of the husks and you will find the grain inside.
Now if we don't thresh the husks we won't find the grain.
Like a dog sleeping on the pile of unthreshed grain.
Its stomach is rumbling “jork-jork-jork,” but all it can do is lie there, thinking “Where can I get something to eat?” When it's hungry it bounds off the pile of rice grain and runs off looking for scraps of food.
Even though it's sleeping right in top of a pile of food it knows nothing of it.
Why?
It can't see the rice.
Dogs can't eat unthreshed rice.
The food is there but the dog can't eat it.
We may have learning but if we don't practice accordingly we still don't really know, just as oblivious as the dog sleeping on the pile of rice grain.
It's sleeping on a pile of food but it knows nothing of it.
When it gets hungry it's got to jump off and go trotting around elsewhere for food.
It's a shame, isn't it?
Now this is the same: there is rice grain but what is hiding it?
The husk hides the grain, so the dog can't eat it.
And there is the Transcendent.
What hides it?
The Apparent conceals the Transcendent, making people simply “sit on top of the pile of rice, unable to eat it,” unable to practice, unable to see the Transcendent.
And so they simply get stuck in appearances time and again.
If you are stuck in appearances suffering is in store, you will be beset by becoming, birth, old age, sickness and death.
So there isn't anything else blocking people off, they are blocked right here.
People who study the Dhamma without penetrating to its true meaning are just like the dog on the pile of unthreshed rice who doesn't know the rice.
He might even starve and still find nothing to eat.
A dog can't eat unthreshed rice, it doesn't even know there is food there.
After a long time without food it may even die… on top of that pile of rice!
People are like this.
No matter how much we study the Dhamma of the Buddha we won't see it if we don't practice.
If we don't see it then we don't know it.
Don't go thinking that by learning a lot and knowing a lot you'll know the Buddha Dhamma.
That's like saying you've seen everything there is to see just because you've got eyes, or that you've got ears.
You may see but you don't see fully.
You see only with the “outer eye,” not with the “inner eye'; you hear with the “outer ear,” not with the “inner ear.
If you upturn the apparent and reveal the Transcendent you will reach the truth and see clearly.
You will uproot the Apparent and uproot clinging.
But this is like some sort of sweet fruit: even though the fruit is sweet we must rely on contact with and experience of that fruit before we will know what the taste is like.
Now that fruit, even though no-one tastes it, is sweet all the same.
But nobody knows of it.
The Dhamma of the Buddha is like this.
Even though it's the truth it isn't true for those who don't really know it.
No matter how excellent or fine it may be it is worthless to them.
So why do people grab after suffering?
Who in this world wants to inflict suffering on themselves?
No-one, of course.
Nobody wants suffering and yet people keep creating the causes of suffering, just as if they were wandering around looking for suffering.
Within their hearts people are looking for happiness, they don't want suffering.
Then why is it that this mind of ours creates so much suffering?
Just seeing this much is enough.
We don't like suffering and yet why do we create suffering for ourselves?
It's easy to see… it can only be because we don't know suffering, don't know the end of suffering.
That's why people behave the way they do.
How could they not suffer when they continue to behave in this way?
These people have micchaditthi but they don't see that it's micchaditthi.
Whatever we say, believe in or do which results in suffering is all wrong view.
If it wasn't wrong view it wouldn't result in suffering.
We couldn't cling to suffering, nor to happiness or to any condition at all.
We would leave things be their natural way, like a flowing stream of water.
We don't have to dam it up, just let it flow along its natural course.
The flow of Dhamma is like this, but the flow of the ignorant mind tries to resist the Dhamma in the form of wrong view.
And yet it flies off everywhere else, seeing wrong view, that is, suffering is there because of wrong view — this people don't see.
This is worth looking into.
Whenever we have wrong view we will experience suffering.
If we don't experience it in the present it will manifest later on.
People go astray right here.
What is blocking them off?
The Apparent blocks off the Transcendent, preventing people from seeing things clearly.
People study, they learn, they practice, but they practice with ignorance, just like a person who's lost his bearings.
He walks to the west but thinks he's walking east, or walks to the north thinking he's walking south.
This is how far people have gone astray.
This kind of practice is really only the dregs of practice, in fact it's a disaster.
It's disaster because they turn around and go in the opposite direction, they fall from the objective of true Dhamma practice.
This state of affairs causes suffering and yet people think that doing this, memorizing that, studying such-and-such will be a cause for the cessation of suffering.
Just like a person who wants a lot of things.
He tries to amass as much as possible, thinking if he gets enough his suffering will abate.
This is how people think, but their thinking is astray of the true path, just like one person going northward, another going southward, and yet believing they're going the same way.
Most people are still stuck in the mass of suffering, still wandering in samsara, just because they think like this.
If illness or pain arise, all they can do is wonder how they can get rid of it.
They want it to stop as fast as possible, they've got to cure it all costs.
They don't consider that this is the normal way of sankhara.
Nobody thinks like this.
The body changes and people can't endure it, they can't accept it, they've got to get rid of it at all costs.
However, in the end they can't win, they can't beat the truth.
It all collapses.
This is something people don't want to look at, they continually reinforce their wrong view.
Practicing to realize the Dhamma is the most excellent of things.
Why did the Buddha develop all the Perfections?
So that he could realize this and enable others to see the Dhamma, know the Dhamma, practice the Dhamma and be the Dhamma — so that they could let go and not be burdened.
“Don't cling to things.” Or to put it another way: “Hold, but don't hold fast.” This is also right.
If we see something we pick it up… “Oh, it's this”… then we lay it down.
We see something else, pick it up… one holds, but not fast.
Hold it just long enough to consider it, to know it, then to let it go.
If you hold without letting go, carry without laying down the burden, then you are going to be heavy.
If you pick something up and carry it for a while, then when it gets heavy you should lay it down, throw it off.
Don't make suffering for yourself.
This we should know as the cause of suffering.
If we know the cause of suffering, suffering cannot arise.
For either happiness or suffering to arise there must be the atta, the self.
There must be the “I” and “mine,” there must be this appearance.
If when all these things arise the mind goes straight to the Transcendent, it removes the appearances.
It removes the delight, the aversion and the clinging from those things.
Just as when something that we value gets lost… when we find it again our worries disappear.
Even before we see that object our worries may be relieved.
At first we think it's lost and suffer over it, but there comes a day when we suddenly remember, “Oh, that's right!
I put it over there, now I remember!” As soon as we remember this, as soon as we see the truth, even if we haven't laid eyes on that object, we feel happy.
This is called “seeing within,” seeing with the mind's eye, not seeing with the outer eye.
If we see with the mind's eye then even though we haven't laid eyes on that object we are already relieved.
This is the same, When we cultivate Dhamma practice and attain the Dhamma, see the Dhamma, then whenever we encounter a problem we solve the problem instantly, right then and there.
It disappears completely, laid down, released.
Now the Buddha wanted us to contact the Dhamma, but people only contact the words, the books and the scriptures.
This is contacting that which is about Dhamma, not contacting the actual Dhamma as taught by our Great Teacher.
How can people say they are practicing well and properly?
They are a long way off.
The Buddha was known as lokavidu, having clearly realized the world.
Right now we see the world all right, but not clearly.
The more we know the darker the world becomes, because our knowledge is murky, it's not clear knowledge.
It's faulty.
This is called “knowing through darkness,” lacking in light and radiance.
People are only stuck here but it's no trifling matter.
It's important.
Most people want goodness and happiness but they just don't know what the causes for that goodness and happiness are.
Whatever it may be, if we haven't yet seen the harm of it we can't give it up.
No matter how bad it may be, we still can't give it up if we haven't truly seen the harm of it.
However, if we really see the harm of something beyond a doubt then we can let it go.
As soon as we see the harm of something, and the benefit of giving it up, there's an immediate change.
Why is it we are still unattained, still cannot let go?
It's because we still don't see the harm clearly, our knowledge is faulty, it's dark.
that's why we can't let go.
If we knew clearly like the Lord Buddha or the arahant disciples we would surely let go, our problems would dissolve completely with no difficulty at all.
When your ears hear sound, then let them do their job.
When your eyes perform their function with forms, then let them do so.
When your nose works with smells, let it do its job.
When your body experiences sensations, then let it perform its natural functions where will problems arise?
There are no problems.
In the same way, all those things which belong to the Apparent, leave them with the Apparent.
And acknowledge that which is the Transcendent.
Simply be the “One Who Knows,” knowing without fixation, knowing and letting things be their natural way.
All things are just as they are.
All our belongings, does anybody really own them?
Does our father own them, or our mother, or our relatives?
Nobody really gets anything.
That's why the Buddha said to let all those things be, let them go.
Know them clearly.
Know then by holding, but not fast.
Use things in a way that is beneficial, not in a harmful way by holding fast to them until suffering arises.
To know Dhamma you must know in this way.
That is, to know in such a way as to transcend suffering.
This sort of knowledge is important.
Knowing about how to make things, to use tools, knowing all the various sciences of the world and so on, all have their place, but they are not the supreme knowledge.
The Dhamma must be known as I've explained it here.
You don't have to know a whole lot, just this much is enough for the Dhamma practitioner — to know and then let go.
It's not that you have to die before you can transcend suffering, you know.
You transcend suffering in this very life because you know how to solve problems.
You know the apparent, you know the Transcendent.
Do it in this lifetime, while you are here practicing.
You won't find it anywhere else.
Don't cling to things.
Hold, but don't cling.
You may wonder, “Why does the Ajahn keep saying this?” How could I teach otherwise, how could I say otherwise, when the truth is just as I've said it?
Even though it's the truth don't hold fast to even that!
If you cling to it blindly it becomes a falsehood.
Like a dog… try grabbing its leg.
If you don't let go the dog will spin around and bite you.
Just try it out.
All animals behave like this.
If you don't let go it's got no choice but to bite.
The Apparent is the same.
We live in accordance with conventions, they are here for our convenience in this life, but they are not things to be clung to so hard that they cause suffering.
Just let things pass.
Whenever we feel that we are definitely right, so much so that we refuse to open up to anything or anybody else, right there we are wrong.
It becomes wrong view.
When suffering arises, where does it arise from?
The cause is wrong view, the fruit of that being suffering.
If it was right view it wouldn't cause suffering.
So I say, “Allow space, don't cling to things.” “Right” is just another supposition, just let it pass.
“Wrong” is another apparent condition, just let it be that.
If you feel you are right and yet others contend the issue, don't argue, just let it go.
As soon as you know, let go.
This is the straight way.
Usually it's not like this.
People don't often give in to each other.
That's why some people, even Dhamma practitioners who still don't know themselves, may say things that are utter foolishness and yet think they're being wise.
They may say something that's so stupid that others can't even bear to listen and yet they think they are being cleverer than others.
Other people can't even listen to it and yet they think they are smart, that they are right.
They are simply advertising their own stupidity.
That's why the wise say, “Whatever speech disregards aniccam is not the speech of a wise person, it's the speech of a fool.
It's deluded speech.
it's the speech of one who doesn't know that suffering is going to arise right there.” For example, suppose you had decided to go to Bangkok tomorrow and someone were to ask, “Are you going to Bangkok tomorrow?
“I hope to go to Bangkok.
If there are no obstacles I'll probably go.” This is called speaking with the Dhamma in mind, speaking with aniccam in mind, taking into account the truth, the transient, uncertain nature of the world.
You don't say, “Yes, I'm definitely going tomorrow.” If it turns out you don't go what are you going to do, send news to all the people who told you were going to?
You'd be just talking non-sense.
There's still much more to it, the practice of Dhamma becomes more and more refined.
But if you don't see it you may think you are speaking right even when you are speaking wrongly and straying from the true nature of things with every word.
And yet you may think you are speaking the truth.
To put it simply: anything that we say or do that causes suffering to arise should be known as micchaditthi.
It's delusion and foolishness.
Most practitioners don't reflect in this way.
Whatever they like they think is right and they just go on believing themselves.
For instance, they may receive some gift or title, be it an object, rank or even words of praise, and they think it's good.
They take it as some sort of permanent condition.
So they get puffed up with pride and conceit, they don't consider, “Who am I?
Where is this so-called “goodness”?
Where did it come from?
Do others have the same things?
The Buddha taught that we should conduct ourselves normally.
If we don't dig in, chew over and look into this point it means it's still sunk within us.
It means these conditions are still buried within our hearts — we are still sunk in wealth, rank and praise.
So we become someone else because of them.
We think we are better than before, that we are something special and so all sorts of confusion arises.
Actually, in truth there isn't anything to human beings.
Whatever we may be it's only in the realm of appearances.
If we take away the apparent and see the Transcendent we see that there isn't anything there.
There are simply the universal characteristics — birth in the beginning, change in the middle and cessation in the end.
This is all there is.
If we see that all things are like this then no problems arise.
If we understand this we will have contentment and peace.
Where trouble arises is when we think like the five ascetic disciples of the Buddha.
They followed the instruction of their teacher, but when he changed his practice they couldn't understand what he thought or knew.
They decided that the Buddha had given up his practice and reverted to indulgence.
If we were in that position we'd probably think the same thing and there'd be no way to correct it.
Holding on to the old ways, thinking in the lower way, yet believing it's higher.
We'd see the Buddha and think he'd given up the practice and reverted to indulgence, just like he'd given up the practice and reverted to indulgence, just like those Five Ascetics: consider how many years they had been practicing at that time, and yet they still went astray, they still weren't proficient.
So I say to practice and also to look at the results of your practice.
Especially where you refuse to follow, where there is friction.
Where there is no friction, there is no problem, things flow.
If there is friction, they don't flow, you set up a self and things become solid, like a mass of clinging.
There is no give and take.
Most monks and cultivators tend to be like this.
However they've thought in the past they continue to think.
They refuse to change, they don't reflect.
They think they are right so they can't be wrong, but actually “wrongness” is buried within “rightness,” even though most people don't know that.
How is it so?
“This is right”… but if someone else says it's not right you won't give in, you've got to argue.
What is this?
Ditthi mana… Ditthi means views, mana is the attachment to those views.
If we attach even to what is right, refusing to concede to anybody, then it becomes wrong.
To cling fast to rightness is simply the arising of self, there is no letting go.
This is a point which gives people a lot of trouble, except for those Dhamma practitioners who know that this matter, this point, is a very important one.
they will take not of it.
If it arises while they're speaking, clinging comes racing on to the scene.
Maybe it will linger for some time, perhaps one or two days, three or four months, a year or two.
This is for the slow ones, that is.
For the quick response is instant… they just let go.
Clinging arises and immediately there is letting go, they force the mind to let go right then and there.
You must see these two functions operating.
Here there is clinging.
Now who is the one who resists that clinging?
Whenever you experience a mental impression you should observe these two functions operating.
There is clinging, and there is one who prohibits the clinging.
Now just watch these two things.
Maybe you will cling for a long time before you let go.
Reflecting and constantly practicing like this, clinging gets lighter, becomes less and less.
Right view increases as wrong view gradually wanes.
Clinging decreases, non-clinging arises.
This is the way it is for everybody.
That's why I say to consider this point.
Learn to solve problems in the present moment.
Tucked away in the Samyutta Nikaya among the “connected sayings on causality” is a short formalized text entitled the Upanisa Sutta, the “Discourse on Supporting Conditions.” Though at first glance hardly conspicuous among the many interesting suttas in this collection, this little discourse turns out upon repeated examination to be of tremendous doctrinal importance.
Its great significance derives from the striking juxtaposition it makes of two applications of “dependent arising”, the principle of conditionality which lies at the heart of the Buddha's doctrine.
The first application is the usual one, setting forth the causal sequence responsible for the origination of samsaric suffering.
Apart from a slight change it is identical with the twelve-factored formulation recurring throughout the Pali canon.
The change — the substitution of “suffering” for “aging-and-death” as the last member of the series — becomes the lead for the second application of dependent arising.
This application, occurring only sporadically in the Pali canon, allows the same principle of conditionality to structure the path leading to deliverance from suffering.
It begins with faith, emerging out of the suffering with which the first series ended, and continues through to the retrospective knowledge of liberation, which confirms the destruction of the binding defilements.
By linking the two series into a single sequence, the sutta reveals the entire course of man's faring in the world as well as his treading of the path to its transcendence.
It shows, moreover, that these two dimensions of human experience, the mundane and the transcendental, the dimensions of world involvement and world disengagement, are both governed by a single structural principle, that of dependent arising.
Recognizing this broader range of the principle, the Nettipakarana, a Pali exegetical treatise, has called the second application “transcendental dependent arising”.
Despite the great importance of the Upanisa Sutta, traditional commentators have hardly given the text the special attention it would seem to deserve.
Perhaps the reason for this is that, its line of approach being peculiar to itself and a few related texts scattered through the Canon, it has been overshadowed by the many other suttas giving the more usual presentation of doctrine.
But whatever the explanation be, the need has remained for a fuller exploration of the sutta's meaning and implications.
We have sought to remedy this deficiency with the following work offering an English translation of the Upanisa Sutta and an exposition of its message.
The exposition sets out to explore the second, “transcendental” application of dependent arising, drawing freely from other parts of the Canon and the commentaries to fill out the meaning.
Since full accounts of the “mundane” or samsaric side of dependent arising can be readily found elsewhere, we thought it best to limit our exposition to the principle's less familiar application.
A similar project has been undertaken by Bhikshu Sangharakshita in his book The Three Jewels.
However, since this work draws largely from Mahayanist sources to explain the stages in the series, the need has remained for a treatment which elucidates the series entirely from the standpoint of the Theravada tradition, within which the sutta is originally found.
— Bhikkhu Bodhi
References to the Digha Nikaya and the Majjhima Nikaya refer to the number of the sutta.
References to the Samyutta Nikaya refer to the number of the chapter followed by the number of the sutta within that chapter.
References to the Anguttara Nikaya refer to nipata followed by the number of the sutta within that nipata.
While staying at Savatthi the Exalted One said:
“The destruction of the cankers, monks, is for one who knows and sees, I say, not for one who does not know and does not see.
Knowing what, seeing what does the destruction of the cankers occur?
'Such is material form, such is the arising of material form, such is the passing away of material form.
Such is feeling… perception… mental formations… consciousness; such is the arising of consciousness, such is the passing away of consciousness' — for one who knows and sees this, monks, the destruction of the cankers occurs.
“The knowledge of destruction with respect to destruction has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for the knowledge of destruction?
'Emancipation' should be the reply.
“Emancipation, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for emancipation?
'Dispassion' should be the reply.
“Dispassion, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for dispassion?
'Disenchantment' should be the reply.
“Disenchantment, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for disenchantment?
'The knowledge and vision of things as they really are' should be the reply.
“The knowledge and vision of things as they really are, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for the knowledge and vision of things as they really are?
'Concentration' should be the reply.
“Concentration, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for concentration?
'Happiness' should be the reply.
“Happiness, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for happiness?
'Tranquillity' should be the reply.
“Tranquillity, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for tranquillity?
'Rapture' should be the reply.
“Rapture, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for rapture?
'Joy' should be the reply.
“Joy, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for joy?
'Faith' should be the reply.
“Faith, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for faith?
'Suffering' should be the reply.
“Suffering, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for suffering?
'Birth' should be the reply.
“And what is the supporting condition for birth?.
'Existence' should be the reply.
“What is the supporting condition for existence?
'Clinging' should be the reply.
“What is the supporting condition for clinging?
'Craving' should be the reply.
“What is the supporting condition for craving?
'Feeling' should be the reply.
“What is the supporting condition for feeling?
'Contact' should be the reply.
“What is the supporting condition for contact?
'The sixfold sense base' should be the reply.
“What is the supporting condition for the sixfold sense base?
'Mentality-materiality' should be the reply.
“What is the supporting condition for mentality-materiality?
'Consciousness' should be the reply.
“What is the supporting condition for consciousness?
'Kamma formations' should be the reply.
“Kamma formations, monks, also have a supporting condition, I say, they do not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for kamma formations?
'Ignorance' should be the reply.
“Thus, monks, ignorance is the supporting condition for kamma formations, kamma formations are the supporting condition for consciousness, consciousness is the supporting condition for mentality-materiality, mentality-materiality is the supporting condition for the sixfold sense base, the sixfold sense base is the supporting condition for contact, contact is the supporting condition for feeling, feeling is the supporting condition for craving, craving is the supporting condition for clinging, clinging is the supporting condition for existence, existence is the supporting condition for birth, birth is the supporting condition for suffering, suffering is the supporting condition for faith, faith is the supporting condition for joy, joy is the supporting condition for rapture, rapture is the supporting condition for tranquillity, tranquillity is the supporting condition for happiness, happiness is the supporting condition for concentration, concentration is the supporting condition for the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are is the supporting condition for disenchantment, disenchantment is the supporting condition for dispassion, dispassion is the supporting condition for emancipation, and emancipation is the supporting condition for the knowledge of the destruction.
“Just as, monks, when rain descends heavily upon some mountaintop, the water flows down along with the slope, and fills the clefts, gullies, and creeks; these being filled fill up the pools; these being filled fill up the ponds; these being filled fill up the streams; these being filled fill up the rivers; and the rivers being filled fill up the great ocean — in the same way, monks, ignorance is the supporting condition for kamma formations, kamma formations are the supporting condition for consciousness, consciousness is the supporting condition for mentality-materiality, mentality-materiality is the supporting condition for the sixfold sense base, the sixfold sense base is the supporting condition for contact, contact is the supporting condition for feeling, feeling is the supporting condition for craving, craving is the supporting condition for clinging, clinging is the supporting condition for existence, existence is the supporting condition for birth, birth is the supporting condition for suffering, suffering is the supporting condition for faith, faith is the supporting condition for joy, joy is the supporting condition for rapture, rapture is the supporting condition for tranquillity, tranquillity is the supporting condition for happiness, happiness is the supporting condition for concentration, concentration is the supporting condition for the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are is the supporting condition for disenchantment, disenchantment is the supporting condition for dispassion, dispassion is the supporting condition for emancipation, and emancipation is the supporting condition for the knowledge of the destruction.
Dependent arising is the central principle of the Buddha's teaching, constituting both the objective content of its liberating insight and the germinative source for its vast network of doctrines and disciplines.
As the frame behind the four noble truths, the key to the perspective of the middle way, and the conduit to the realization of selflessness, it is the unifying theme running through the teaching's multifarious expressions, binding them together as diversified formulations of a single coherent vision.
The earliest suttas equate dependent arising with the unique discovery of the Buddha's enlightenment, so profound and difficult to grasp that he at first hesitated to announce it to the world.
A simple exposition of the principle sparks off the liberating wisdom in the minds of his foremost disciples, while skill in explaining its workings is made a qualification of an adroit expounder of the Dhamma.
So crucial is this principle to the body of the Buddha's doctrine that an insight into dependent arising is held to be sufficient to yield an understanding of the entire teaching.
In the words of the Buddha: “He who sees dependent arising sees the Dhamma; he who sees the Dhamma sees dependent arising.” 
The Pali texts present dependent arising in a double form.
It appears both as an abstract statement of universal law and as the particular application of that law to the specific problem which is the doctrine's focal concern, namely, the problem of suffering.
In its abstract form the principle of dependent arising is equivalent to the law of the conditioned genesis of phenomena.
It expresses the invariable concomitance between the arising and ceasing of any given phenomenon and the functional efficacy of its originative conditions.
Its phrasing, as terse as any formulation of modern logic, recurs in the ancient texts thus: “This being, that exists; through the arising of this that arises.
This not being, that does not exist; through the ceasing of this that ceases.
When applied to the problem of suffering, the abstract principle becomes encapsulated in a twelve-term formula disclosing the causal nexus responsible for the origination of suffering.
It begins with ignorance, the primary root of the series though not a first cause, conditioning the arising of ethically determinate volitions, which in turn condition the arising of consciousness, and so on through the salient occasions of sentient becoming down to their conclusion in old age and death:
— SN, passim
The corollary of this formula, which constantly accompanies it, describes the conditioned cessation of suffering.
It shows how, when ignorance ceases, all the following conditions successively cease, down to the cessation of the “entire mass of suffering.
Though the principle of dependent arising is applicable to any situation where an origination of phenomena takes place, the Pali Buddhist tradition has focused upon the doctrine almost exclusively in terms of its twelvefold formulation.
So much has this been the case that the two have tended to be blankly identified with each other, dependent arising being equated simply with the twelvefold series and the twelvefold series being regarded as an exhaustive treatment of dependent arising.
This exclusiveness of emphasis doubtlessly poses a certain danger of rigidity; but even despite this danger it is not without its justification.
For the aim of the Buddha's teaching is not abstract and theoretical, but concrete and soteriological.
Its goal is liberation from suffering, understood in its deepest sense as the unsatisfactoriness of sentient existence indefinitely repeated in the wheel of becoming, the cycle of births and deaths, called samsara.
The twelve-term nexus contributes to this liberative thrust by bringing the principle of dependent arising to bear directly on the condition which it is the doctrine's over-riding concern to ameliorate.
If suffering is produced by causes, these causes and the way they can be stopped must be uncovered and exposed.
The twelvefold application accomplishes precisely this.
In its positive or direct aspect it makes known the causal chain behind suffering, demonstrating how the round of existence arises and turns through the impulsions of craving, clinging, and karma, working freely behind the shielding screen of ignorance.
In its negative or reverse side it reveals the way to the cessation of suffering, showing that when ignorance is eliminated by the rise of true knowledge all the factors dependent on ignorance likewise draw to a close.
However, as a consequence of this constriction of attention, sight has tended to be lost of the broader range of exemplifications the principle of dependent arising might have, even within the limits of the soteriological direction of the teaching.
Dependent arising cannot be reduced to any single one of its applications.
Any application is only a pedagogical device framed from the standpoint of the teaching's practical orientation.
Above and beyond its specific instances, dependent arising remains an expression of the invariable structural relatedness of phenomena.
It is a principle to which all phenomena conform by the very nature of their being, the principle that whatever comes into existence does so in dependence on conditions.
From the perspective this teaching affords, things are seen to arise, not from some intrinsic nature of their own, from necessity, chance or accident, but from their causal correlations with other things to which they are connected as part of the fixed order obtaining between phenomena.
Each transient entity, emerging into the present out of the stream of events bearing down from the past, absorbs into itself the causal influx of the past, to which it must be responsive.
During its phase of presence it exercises its own distinctive function with the support of its conditions, expressing thereby its own immediacy of being.
And then, with the completion of its actuality, it is swept away by the universal impermanence to become itself a condition determinant of the future.
When this law of inter-connected becoming, of conditionality and relatedness, is extracted from its usual exemplifications and explored for further doctrinal bearings, it can be found to have other ramifications equally relevant to the realization of the teaching's fundamental aim.
One particular exemplification of dependent arising,; found with minor variations in a number of suttas, shows the basic principle to serve as the scaffolding for the course of spiritual development issuing in final emancipation.
It figures in these suttas as the architectonic underlying the gradual training, governing the process by which one phase of practice conditions the arising of the following phase all the way from the commencement of the path to the realization of the ultimate goal.
To be sure, the application of dependent arising to the achievement of deliverance is already covered from one angle by the reverse or cessation side of the twelvefold formula, according to which the cessation of ignorance sets off a series of cessations culminating in the cessation of suffering.
Thence in itself such an application is not a unique feature of these suttas.
What gives these suttas their distinctive quality and value is the positive form in which they cast the sequential pattern of the liberative venture.
Whereas the series of cessations presents the achievement of liberation logically, in strict doctrinal terms as the consequence following upon the annulment of samsaric bondage, the present sequence views the same chain of events dynamically, from the inner perspective of living experience.
As living experience, the advance to emancipation cannot be tied down to a series of mere negations, for such a mode of treatment omits precisely what is most essential to the spiritual quest — the immediacy of inner striving, growth, and transformation.
Parallel to the demolition of old barriers there occurs, in the quest for deliverance, a widening of vistas characterized by an evolving sense of maturation, enrichment, and fulfillment; the departure from bondage, anxiety, and suffering at the same time means the move towards freedom and peace.
This expansion and enrichment is made possible by the structure of the gradual training, which is not so much a succession of discrete steps one following the other as a locking together of overlapping components in a union at once augmentative, consummative, and projective.
Each pair of stages intertwines in a mutually vitalizing bond wherein the lower, antecedent member nurtures its successor by serving as its generative base, and the higher, consequent member completes its predecessor by absorbing its energies and directing them on to the next phase in the series.
Each link thus performs a double function: while rewarding the efforts expended in the accomplishment of the antecedent stage, it provides the incentive for the commencement of the consequent stage.
In this way the graduated training unfolds organically in a fluid progression in which, as the Buddha says, “stage flows over into stage, stage fulfills stage, for crossing over from the hither shore to the beyond.
All the factors comprised in this sequence come into being in strict subjection to the law of conditioned genesis.
The accidental, the compulsory, and the mysterious are equally excluded by the lawful regularity governing the series.
The stages of the path do not emerge fortuitously or through the operation of some inscrutable power, but originate conditionally, appearing spontaneously in the course of training when their requisite conditions are complete.
Thus the course of spiritual development these suttas reveal is a dependent arising — a coming into being in dependence on conditions.
But this dependent arising differs significantly from its mundane counterpart.
The mundane version, with its twelve links, describes the movement of samsara, which revolves in a perpetually self-regenerating circle leading from beginning to end only to find the end lead back to the beginning.
The mechanism of this process, by which defilements and renewed existence mutually kindle one another, is fueled by the hope that some-how some solution will yet emerge within the framework of laws set for the turning of the wheel, a hope repeatedly disappointed.
The present version of dependent arising delineates a type of development that only becomes possible when this hope has been dispensed with.
It hinges on the prior recognition that any attempt to eliminate suffering through the gratification of craving is doomed to failure, and that the only way to stop it is to cut through the vicious nexus at its base.
Though the movement it describes is still cyclic, it is not the circular revolution of samsara it is concerned with but a different kind of rotation that only comes into play when the essentially defective nature of the ordinary human condition has been clearly perceived and the urge towards liberation from it made the dominant motive of the inner life.
The present sequence depicts the movement towards release.
It sets forth a drive which, in contrast to the pointless repetition of samsara, evolves up and outwards in an unbroken spiral ascent — a pattern in which each turn supports and strengthens its successor's capacity for liberation, enabling the series as a whole to pick up the momentum needed to break the gravitational pull of the mundane sphere.
Since all the phases in this progression arise in dependence on their antecedents, the series represents a dependent arising.
But unlike the familiar version of dependent arising, the present version leads, not back to the round of becoming, but to the overcoming of samsara and all its attendant sufferings.
Hence the Nettippakarana calls this sequence “transcendental dependent arising” — a dependent arising that leads to the transcendence of the world.
The sutta we will investigate here for an account of “transcendental dependent arising, is the Upanisa Sutta of the Nidanasamyutta.
In addition to giving a clear, explicit account of the conditional structure of the liberative progression, this sutta has the further advantage of bringing the supramundane form of dependent arising into immediate connection with its familiar samsaric counterpart.
By making this connection it brings into prominence the comprehensive character of the principle of conditionality — its ability to support and explain both the process of compulsive involvement which is the origin of suffering and the process of disengagement which leads to deliverance from suffering.
Thereby it reveals dependent arising to be the key to the unity and coherence of the Buddha's teaching.
When the Buddha declares, “I teach only suffering and the cessation of suffering,” the bond which unites these two terminals of the doctrine as complementary sides of a single, internally consistent system is simply the law of dependent arising.
The Upanisa Sutta gives three expositions of “transcendental dependent arising.” The first expounds the sequence in reverse order, beginning with the last link in the series, the knowledge of the destruction of the cankers, and tracing the chain backwards to the first link in the liberative sequence, namely, faith.
At this point it crosses over to the mundane order, explaining faith as arising through suffering, suffering as conditioned by birth, birth as conditioned by existence, and so on back through the familiar links to ignorance as the first member of the chain.
After completing the reverse exposition, the Buddha then expounds the same series in forward order, beginning with ignorance and following through to the knowledge of destruction.
This he does twice, in exactly the same way, once before and once after the striking simile comparing the sequential origination of the factors to the gradual descent of rainfall from a mountain, through the graded ponds, lakes, streams, and rivers to the great ocean at the mountain's base.
Thus the series of conditions presented in the sutta can be mapped out in the abstract as follows:
Transcendental Order
For ease of explanation we will examine the links of transcendental dependent arising in direct order.
However, before doing so, it is instructive to note that there is special significance in the initial presentation of the series in reverse.
Such a presentation serves to throw an important spotlight on the nature of the causal relation obtaining between the path to liberation and its goal.
It shows that the type of causal development displayed by this progression is quite different from the pattern of blind efficient causality which involves the incidental emergence of an effect out of its causal matrix, as for example when a series of geological changes triggers off an earthquake or a number of atoms combine to form some new molecule.
The relationship between the path and the goal belongs to a more complex order of causality, one which can perhaps be pictured as a set of prior causes giving rise to an effect but can never be adequately and correctly comprehended in terms of this model.
What we have here is not an instance of simple, one-directional causality proceeding forward unmodified in a straight line; we have, rather, a species of teleological causality involving purpose, intelligence, and planned striving simultaneously projected towards and refracted from the aimed at effect in a process of reciprocal determination.
In the workings of this relationship not only does the path facilitate the achievement of the goal, but the goal as well, already present from the outset as the envisaged aim of striving, itself bends back to participate in the shaping of the path.
Starting from man's awareness of the painful inadequacies of his existence, and his intuitive groping towards a condition where these are allayed, the formula proceeds to trace back, in terms derivative from and constantly checked against the goal, the series of alterations he must induce in his cognitive and emotive makeup to bring the goal into his reach.
We see this pattern illustrated in the traditional account of prince Siddhartha's great renunciation.
When the future Buddha leaves his palace, he goes forth in the confidence that beyond the perishable, defective, and substanceless things of the world there is accessible to man an unperishable and self-sufficient state which makes possible deliverance from suffering.
What he needs to discover, as the objective of his “holy quest,” is the path bridging the two domains.
This he does by pursuing backwards from the goal of striving the obstructions to its attainment and the steps to be taken to remove those obstructions.
One line of exploration begins with aging and death as the fundamental manifestation of the suffering which weighs upon the world, and follows its chain of conditions back to ignorance as the underlying root.
Another, complementary line starts with the defilements as the principal obstruction to emancipation.
It then finds the defilements to be sustained by ignorance, ignorance by the distracted mind, and the distracted mind by a causal nexus going back to lack of faith in the true Dhamma.
From this the conclusion follows, as shown in the Upanisa Sutta, that to achieve deliverance the defilements must be removed through dispassion, to reach dispassion ignorance must be overcome by correct understanding, to arouse understanding the mind must be concentrated, and so on through the counter-conditions down to the gain of faith in the true Dhamma.
In both cases the reverse direction of the sequential logic reveals the peculiar nature of the path-goal relationship.
The two stand together in a bond of reciprocal determination, the path leading to the achievement of the goal and the goal giving form and content to the path.
In addition to the forward thrust of the path, there is thus a basic feedback emanating from the goal, so that the goal can, in a sense, generate out of itself through the circuit system of man's constitutional capacities the series of measures needed to bring about its actualization.
This relationship is analogous to the relation between a guided missile and its mobile target.
The missile does not reach its target merely through its own initial thrust and direction.
It finds it precisely because it is being controlled by signals the target is itself emitting.
“Suffering is the supporting condition for faith”: After asserting as the last step in the mundane sequence that birth is the supporting condition for suffering, the sutta switches over to the transcendental series with the pronouncement that suffering is the supporting condition for faith.
With respect to both assertions the present formulation diverges from the usual version of twelve-factored dependent arising.
In the usual version the forward sequence ends with the statement that birth is the condition for aging-and-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair.
With this it concludes, leaving unstated the implied aftermath — that this “mass of suffering” will generate anew the fundamental ignorance at the head of the whole series, thus beginning another run through the cycle.
The fact that suffering here replaces aging-and-death as the last member of the samsaric part of the series therefore has a special importance.
It cautions us to the impending change, signaling that we are about to witness, in the progression of links to follow, not just one more turn of the wheel but an interruption of its forward spin and a struggle to reverse its natural direction of movement.
The Buddha's declaration that suffering is the supporting condition for faith points to the essential backdrop to the awakening of the religious consciousness.
It reveals that spiritual awareness and the quest for enlightenment do not arise spontaneously in harmony with our natural modes of world-engagement, but require a turn “against the current” a break away from our instinctual urges for expansion and enjoyment and the embarkation in a different direction.
This break is precipitated by the encounter with suffering.
Suffering spurs the awakening of the religious consciousness in that it is the experience of suffering which first tears us out of our blind absorption in the immediacy of temporal being and sets us in search of a way to its transcendence.
Whether in the form of pain, frustration, or distress, suffering reveals the basic insecurity of the human condition, shattering our naive optimism and unquestioned trust in the goodness of the given order of things.
It throws before our awareness, in a way we cannot evade, the vast gulf stretching between our ingrained expectations and the possibilities for their fulfillment in a world never fully susceptible to domination by our wills.
It makes us call into question our schemes of values built upon the bedrock of personal expedience.
It leads to a revaluation of all values and a new scale of worth indifferent to the claims of self-concern.
And it opens us to confidence in an unseen order of relations and inter-connections, an order in which the values that emerge, so often in forceful opposition to the old, will find their proper justification and reward.
Yet for suffering to become an effective spur to spiritual awakening it is not enough merely to encounter it.
For the religious consciousness to be aroused suffering must be not only met as a constant liability of our existence, but confronted and grappled with in the arena of thematic reflection.
As long as we engage suffering simply in its superficial modes, as felt pain and sorrow, we will react to it in one of two ways, both of which operate at a purely psychological level.
In the first case we will react to suffering in an unhealthy manner, as when we arouse resentment against the source of our displeasure and seek relief by annihilating it, ignoring it, or running away in pursuit of some easy escape.
In the second case we will react to suffering in a mentally healthy way, as when we fortify our minds with patience and courage, strengthen our capacities for endurance, and seek to resolve the problem in a realistic manner.
But though the second approach is definitely to be preferred to the first, in neither case does that inward revolution take place which awakens us to our extreme need for deliverance and compels us to set off in a new direction previously unknown and unexplored.
The urge for liberation can only set in when pain and sorrow have been confronted with reflective awareness and recognized as symptoms of a deeper ailment demanding a radical therapy.
The quest for a conclusive solution to the problem of suffering begins with an act of understanding, not with mere tribulation.
It starts from the realization that suffering is more than a chance encroachment upon a state of affairs otherwise felicitous, that it is a malady which infects our being upwards from its very root.
We must come to see that the breeding ground of suffering lies not so much in the outside world as at the base of our own being, and that any cure that is to be permanently effective must uproot it at this inward source.
The arising of such a realization depends upon the adoption of a new perspective from which the fact of suffering can be faced in its full range and universality.
Though single in its essence, suffering or dukkha yet divides into three stages or tiers in accordance with the level of understanding from which it is viewed.
At the most elementary level suffering appears as physical pain and oppression, manifest most clearly in the events of birth, sickness, aging and death, as well as in hunger, thirst, privation, and bodily discomfort.
At a higher level it comes to be seen as a psychological fact — as the sorrow and frustration springing from our separation from what is desired, our meeting with what is disliked, and the disappointment of our expectations.
And at the third and highest level suffering becomes manifest in its essential form, as the inherent unsatisfactoriness of the samsaric round in which we turn without purpose on account of our ignorance and attachments.
These three tiers are not mutually exclusive.
In each case the lower level serves as basis for the higher, by which it is absorbed and comprehended.
Thus, though the penetration of the highest stage, the essential suffering comprised in the “five clinging aggregates”, represents the climax of understanding, this realization comes as the fruit of a long period of preparation grounded upon the first flash of insight into the basic inadequacy of the human condition.
Such an insight usually dawns through particular experiences typical of the first two stages of suffering — through sudden pain, loss or disappointment, or through chronic anxiety, confusion, and distress.
But in order to become the stimulus to a higher course of development, our vision must be capable of rising from the particular to the universal.
It is only when we see clearly for ourselves that we are “sunk in birth, aging, and death, in sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair, sunk in suffering, overcome by suffering”, that we are really ready for the means to bring this unsatisfactory condition to an end.
Since it is suffering that impels us to seek the way to liberation, suffering is called the supporting condition for faith.
By itself, however, the confrontation with suffering even at the level of mature reflection is not sufficient to generate faith.
For faith to arise two conditions are required: the first is the awareness of suffering, which makes us recognize the need for a liberative path; the second is the encounter with a teaching that proclaims a liberative path.
Thence the Buddha says that faith has for its nutriment hearing the exposition of the true Dhamma.
Saddha, the faith that comes into being as a result of hearing the exposition of the true Dhamma, is essentially an attitude of trust and commitment directed to ultimate emancipation.
In order for such faith to arise and become a driving force of spiritual development, it must meet with an objective ground capable of eliciting its forward leap into the unknown and of prompting its inner urge towards liberation.
From the Buddhist perspective this objective ground is provided by the three objects of refuge — the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha, that is, the enlightened Teacher, his teaching, and his community of noble disciples.
The faith to be placed in them must not be blind and uncritical.
Though initially requiring consent born out of trust, it also must be based on critical scrutiny — the Teacher tested to determine his trustworthiness, his doctrine examined to decide on its cogency, and his disciples interrogated to ascertain their reliability.
As a result of such examination, conducted either through personal confrontation whenever possible or through scrutiny of the scriptural records, faith becomes settled in the Buddha as the Perfectly Enlightened One, the unerring guide on the path to deliverance; in the Dhamma as his teaching and the path leading to deliverance; and in the Sangha as the community of the Buddha's disciples who have verified his teaching through their own direct experience, and hence may be relied upon for guidance in our own pursuit of the goal.
As the first requisite of spiritual development, faith is compared to a hand in that it is needed to take hold of beneficial practices, and to a seed in that it is the vitalizing germ for the growth of the higher virtues.
Beneath its seeming simplicity it is a complex phenomenon combining intellectual, emotional, and conative elements.
Intellectually faith implies a willingness to accept on trust propositions beyond our present capacity for verification, propositions relating to the basic tenets of the doctrine.
Through practice this assent will be translated from belief into knowledge, but at the outset there is required an acceptance which cannot be fully corroborated by objective evidence.
Emotionally faith issues in feelings of confidence and serene joy, coupled with an attitude of devotion directed to the objects of refuge.
And at the level of volition faith reinforces the readiness to implement certain lines of conduct in the conviction they will lead to the desired goal.
It is the mobilizing force of action, stirring up the energy to actualize the ideal.
“Faith is the supporting condition for joy”: Faith functions as a support for the next link in the series, joy or gladness, by permitting an outlet from the pent-up tensions of an existential impasse brought on by the reflective encounter with the problem of suffering.
Prior to the discovery of the true Dhamma two alternatives present themselves to the thoughtful individual as he struggles to work out a viable solution to the problem of suffering once it has emerged into the open in its full depth and universality.
One alternative is compliant submission to a justification of suffering developed along traditional theological lines — that is, a theodicy which sees evil and suffering as detracting from the goodness of the created order only superficially, while ultimately contributing to the total perfection of the whole.
This solution, though generally aligned with the higher ethical values, still appears to the sensitive thinker to be a facile answer constantly provocative of a gnawing sense of doubt and disbelief.
The other alternative is resignation to suffering as a brute fact unintelligible to man's moral sense, an incidental offshoot of a universe totally indifferent to any structure of spiritual or ethical values.
This solution, though not internally inconsistent, clashes with our basic moral intuitions so sharply that the result, for the sensitive thinker, is often a turn to nihilism in one of its two forms — as reckless license or ineffectual despair.
Neither the theological nor the materialistic answers can show the way to an actual escape from suffering.
Both, in the last analysis, can only hold out a choice between resignation and rebellion.
The gain of faith in the true Dhamma spells the end to this quandary by pointing to a solution which can admit the pervasive reality of suffering without needing to justify it, yet can give this suffering a cogent explanation and indicate an escape.
Suffering, from this perspective, is traceable to distinct causes endowed with ethical significance; it is the inevitable result of our own immoral actions returning to ourselves.
Our actions, when viewed from the standpoint of the Dhamma, are neither threads in some invisible handiwork of divine perfection, nor meaningless pulsations of nerves and brain, but expressions of ethically significant decisions having an integral place in a morally intelligible world.
They are seen as choices for which we bear full responsibility before an impersonal universal law that ensures the preservation of an equilibrium between deeds and their results, so that virtuous deeds bring forth happiness and evil deeds suffering.
The round of becoming in which we are immersed — where we are born, grow old, suffer, and die — this round is created by ourselves, fashioned out of our own blindness and craving.
We build the round ourselves and we can bring it to an end by ourselves, by eradicating this world-sustaining ignorance and desire.
The path to liberation is revealed in all its practical details with full precision and clarity.
It is a path of conduct and insight each man must tread for himself, success being dependent entirely on his own diligence, sincerity and energy, and on his capacities for renunciation and understanding.
The gain of faith in the true Dhamma thus points to an outlet from the contention of opposed alternatives, neither of which can be happily embraced.
It exhausts the pressures of an apparent dead-end, and as the stress and tension fall away there springs up a surge of joy conditioned by the acquisition of faith.
This incipient swell of joy grows by degrees as the aspirant's contemplation focuses more sharply upon the objects in which confidence has been reposed.
Sustained reflection on the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha gradually dispels the darkness of doubt and indecision.
It issues in an effusion of light, of peace and inner clarity, when as a result of such reflection the defilements are attenuated and the mind's impulsion towards the elevating qualities the refuges represent gains in forward momentum.
For this reason faith is compared to a miraculous water-clearing gem.
According to Indian legend, there is a special gem possessed by the mythic universal monarch which, when thrown into a stream of turbid water, immediately causes it to become clear.
The strands of vegetation float away, the mud settles, and the water becomes pure, serene, and sweet-tasting, fit to be drunk by the monarch.
Similarly, it is said, when the gem of faith is set up in the heart it causes the hindrances to disappear, the defilements to settle, and the mind to become clear, lucid, and serene.
The strengthening of confidence in the objects of refuge becomes the incentive for a firmer dedication to the practice of the teaching.
Thence the texts ascribe to faith the characteristic of “leaping forward.” Faith leaps forward in that “when the yogin sees that the hearts of others have been set free, he leaps forward, by way of aspiration, to the various fruits of a holy life, and he makes efforts to attain the yet unattained, to find the unfound, to realize the unrealized.” This aspect of faith is illustrated by a courageous hero who lunges across a turbulent river to escape from danger, saving himself thereby and inspiring others by his example.
At this stage, in particular, the aspirant's faith creates a readiness to undertake the basic rules of moral training.
Through his settled faith in the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha he is prepared to enter the path of practice, which requires at the start that he train in the foundation of the path, the observance of moral discipline.
For this reason the acceptance of moral restraint is said to be undertaken out of faith.
Moral restraint is taken up by accepting rules of discipline designed to inculcate an inner disposition of virtue by controlling bodily and verbal actions.
The codes of rules vary in scope from the five basic precepts of the Buddhist layman to the more than training rules undertaken by the bhikkhu or fully ordained monk, but all share the common characteristic of disciplining behavior.
Each of the basic precepts involves an explicit principle of abstinence requiring to be observed and an implicit mental attitude to be cultivated through such abstinence.
The former consists in abstention from the unwholesome actions of taking life, stealing, sexual abuse, false speech and partaking of intoxicants; the latter calls for a persistent effort to develop a mind of compassion, honesty, purity, truthfulness, and sobriety.
The immediate result of living in conformity with these guidelines to right action is the arising of a sense of freedom from remorse.
Remorse, a feeling of regret over moral transgression and neglect, tends to provoke guilt, agitation, and self-recrimination.
When, through close adherence to the precepts, the mind is freed from remorse, an ease of conscience and “bliss of blamelessness” set in born of the knowledge that one's actions are beyond reproach.
Thence the Buddha declares wholesome rules of conduct to have freedom from remorse as their benefit and reward.
The joy that comes through realizing one's purity confirms the confidence originally placed in the teaching.
Thereby it arouses still stronger faith and a desire for further application to the practice.
“Joy is the supporting condition for rapture”: Though for certain individuals serene faith in the objects of refuge and a clear conscience are sufficient to transform joy into rapture, such cases are the exception rather than the rule.
Generally, in order for the emotional tone of the spiritual life to be lifted to that pitch of intensity suggested by the term “rapture” a further commitment to the training is necessary.
This commitment takes the form of deliberate application to the practice of meditation.
Methods of meditation contributing to the attainment of liberation are classified into two systems — serenity meditation and insight meditation.
Serenity meditation aims at the creation of a state of calm concentration by unifying the mind in focus on a single object.
Insight meditation aims at insight into the nature of phenomena by directly contemplating the bodily and mental processes as they occur on the successive moments of experience.
Though there is a system which employs mindfulness as a direct means to the awakening of insight, in the usual pattern serenity is cultivated first as a preliminary measure, since the unification and purification of consciousness effected by concentration facilitate correct penetration of the nature of things through contemplative insight.
This is the sequence utilized by the present sutta, the stages from “rapture” through “concentration” covering the systematic development of serenity, the two following stages the development of insight.
Serenity meditation is cultivated on the basis of a single object selected from a standard set of objects reserved exclusively for the development of concentration.
These objects, traditionally numbered at forty, include the colored and elemental circles called kasinas, the cemetery contemplations, the recollections of the three refuge objects, meditation on the sublime abodes of love and compassion, mindfulness of breathing, etc.
After taking up one of these objects as his field of work, the yogin strives to unify his mind by fixing his attention on his object to the exclusion of all sense data, concepts, thoughts, memories, projections, fantasies, and associative thinking.
His aim is to make his mind one-pointed, and this forbids at once its dispersal among a multiplicity of concerns.
Success in the practice depends on the harmonization of the mental faculties in the work of concentration.
Through mindfulness the yogin bears the object in his field of awareness and prevents it from slipping away; through discernment he maintains a cautious watch upon the mind, noting its tendencies to stray and swiftly correcting them; and through energy he strives to dispel the impediments to mental unification, and to maintain his awareness at a pitch which is simultaneously taut but relaxed.
The impediments to meditation are classified into a group of five factors called the “five hindrances”.
These are sensual desire, ill-will, stiffness and torpor, restlessness and regret, and doubt.
The Buddha calls these five hindrances “corruptions of the mind” and “weakeners of wisdom.” He says they are conducive to pain, blindness, and ignorance, and compares them respectively to a debt, a disease, imprisonment, slavery, and the dangers of a desert journey.
Their removal by unremitting exertion is the first task facing the meditator.
As he proceeds in his practice, striving with patience and diligence, there come suddenly momentary breaks in the course of his efforts when the hindrances fall away, the flow of inner verbalization stops, and the mind abides one-pointedly on the object.
The achievement of this momentary concentration, brief as it is, gives immense satisfaction.
It is a powerful experience unleashing spurts of mental energy which flood up to the surface of consciousness and inundate the mind with waves of joyous refreshment.
It brings an elating thrill bordering on ecstasy, crowning the yogin's previous endeavors and inspiring further effort.
This experience marks the arising of rapture.
The distinguishing feature of rapture is a strong interest and delight directed to the object of attention.
Its function is to give refreshment to the body and mind.
It can assume both wholesome and unwholesome forms, depending on whether it is motivated by attachment or detachment with respect to its object, but on occasions of meditative consciousness it is always wholesome.
The commentaries distinguish five degrees of rapture which make their appearance in the successive stages of mental unification.
“Minor rapture,” the lowest on the scale, is said to be able to raise the hairs of the body.
“Momentary rapture,” the next degree of development, rushes through the body with an intensity likened to streaks of lightning flashing forth in the sky at different moments.
“Showering rapture,” the third degree, breaks over the body again and again with considerable force, like the waves on the seashore breaking upon the beach.
“Uplifting rapture” is so-called because it is credited with the ability to cause the body to levitate, and the Visuddhimagga cites several cases where this literally occurs.
And “pervading rapture,” the highest on the scale, is said to completely fill the whole body as a huge inundation fills a rock cavern.
Since the commentary to our sutta defines joy, the prior link in our sequence, as weak rapture, we may assume this to signify the delightful interest preceding the deliberate development of meditation, that is, in the stages when faith in the Dhamma was just acquired and the purification of moral discipline commenced.
The five degrees of rapture presented here would then pertain exclusively to the rapture found in meditative consciousness.
And since the last degree of rapture only gains ascendancy with the attainment of full absorption, which does not come until later, it seems that the degrees of rapture which are distinctive of the present stage of progress are the four beginning with minor rapture and reaching their peak with uplifting rapture.
“Rapture is the supporting condition for tranquillity”: While the appearance of rapture indicates a definite advance in the work of concentration, its coarser modes still contain an element of exuberance which is in constant danger of slipping out of control and spilling over into unwholesome states of mind dominated by restlessness and agitation.
For rapture involves an intense delight in the object coupled with an anticipation of even greater delight to come.
The experience of present delight can often be accompanied by an underlying worry that this pleasure will disappear, while the expectation of further delight can stimulate a subtle grasping at the future.
Both states, the anxiety and the grasping, bring along an excitation inimical to the centering of the mind in one-pointed calm.
For this reason, as the yogin progresses in his practice a point is reached where the ecstatic exultation sparked off by rapture becomes felt as an obstruction to the development of mental unification, a corruption of the training which must be pacified and stilled.
Rapture itself will remain as a factor of meditative development up to the third absorption, but to permit further progress its detrimental tendencies have to be sublimated.
Through continued application to the practice rapture becomes more refined, shedding the heated zest of its initial forms.
With its refinement it increasingly evokes along with itself another quality called “tranquillity”.
Tranquillity is characterized by the quieting down of mental disturbances.
It removes agitation and restlessness, imparting to the mind a soothing calm comparable to the cool shade offered by a tree to travelers oppressed by the sun's heat.
Tranquillity operates in two co-occurrent forms, “tranquillity of body” and “tranquillity of mind,” where “mind” signifies the aggregate of consciousness and “body,” not the physical organism, but the group of consciousness-adjuncts included in the aggregates of feeling, perception, and mental formations.
Thence the arising of tranquillity results in the subsiding of disturbances throughout the full extent of the psychodynamic system.
It allays the propensity towards excitement, soothes the innervations brought on by rapture, and casts over the meditative endeavor a profound stillness paving the way for deeper states of concentration to follow.
Tranquillity further induces in both consciousness and its adjuncts the qualitative factors of lightness, malleability, wieldiness, proficiency, and rectitude.
These factors, present to some extent in every wholesome state of consciousness, perform the respective tasks of eliminating sluggishness, rigidity, unwieldiness, disability, and insincerity.
By holding at bay these mental corruptions destructive to moral and spiritual progress, they enhance the functional efficiency of the mind, rendering it a more tractable instrument for application to the higher stages of the path.
“Tranquillity is the supporting condition for happiness”: As the yogin's psychosomatic system is brought to a state of tranquil composure, a feeling of inner happiness or bliss, unobtrusively present from the start, gains in prominence until it emerges in its own right as a salient feature of the training.
Though closely associated with rapture, happiness is not identical with the latter and can arise in its absence.
Rapture denotes a mental factor belonging to the fourth of the five aggregates into which Buddhism classifies the psycho-physical organism, namely, the aggregate of mental formations.
It is a conative rather than affective phenomenon, which fuses zestful interest with a sense of joyous delight.
Happiness, on the other hand, is a purely hedonic factor belonging to the second aggregate, the aggregate of feelings.
It is pleasurable feeling, here, as the happiness conditioned by tranquillity, the pleasure which springs up in meditation as disturbances subside.
Rapture is relatively coarse in quality and happiness subtle.
Thence, though rapture is always accompanied by happiness, in the higher meditative attainment of the third jhana happiness can remain even after rapture has faded away.
The Atthasalini, a commentary to the Abhidhamma-pitaka, illustrates the difference between them with a vivid simile:
— Maung Tin, trans.
The Expositor,, Vol.
I, pp -.
Despite the simile's suggestion, rapture and happiness are not necessarily asynchronous, and are in fact only sundered with the attainment of the third jhana.
The presentation of happiness as arising subsequent to rapture only means that happiness becomes the salient feature of the path after rapture has already made its own distinctive contribution and settled back to a subsidiary place.
In the present stage rapture still persists, only its exuberance has now been toned down by the prevailing quiescence developed in the stage of tranquillity.
The subcommentary to the Upanisa Sutta explains sukha as the happiness of the access to absorption.
The term “access” denotes the stage in the cultivation of serenity immediately preceding full absorption, the intended goal of serenity meditation.
Access is characterized by the abandonment of the five hindrances and the arising of the “counterpart sign,” the self-luminous object of interior perception which is the focal point for the higher stages of concentration.
The abandoning of the hindrances began already with the gain of faith, which conferred a serene lucency suspending their turbulence, and each ascending rung along the path marked their attenuation to a further degree.
Since the hindrances are the principal obstructions to both serenity and insight, the early stages of the path are primarily concerned with their debilitation and elimination.
The elimination of the hindrances prior to attaining access is brought about by means of two methods, one specifically directed to each hindrance separately, the other applicable to all at once.
The former is to be employed when a particular hindrance obtrudes itself with persistent force, the latter on other occasions when no one hindrance seems especially conspicuous.
The specific method involves the reversing of the causal situation out of which the hindrance develops.
Since each defiling factor is a conditioned phenomenon coming into existence through distinct causes, the key to its elimination lies in applying the appropriate antidote to its causal base.
Thus sensual desire arises on account of unskillful attention to the attractive features of things, to alluring objects and physical bodies.
It is attenuated by considering the impermanence of the objects of attachment, and by reflecting on the repulsive nature underlying the attractive appearance of the bodies which arouse desire.
Ill-will or anger also springs up from unskillful attention, in this case to the unpleasant aspects of persons and things; it is reversed by developing loving kindness towards disagreeable people and patience in the face of unfavorable circumstances.
Stiffness and torpor become prominent by submitting to moods of sloth and drowsiness; they are dispelled by the arousal of energy.
Restlessness and regret arise from attending to disturbing thoughts and are eliminated by directing the mind to an object conducive to inner peace.
And doubt, grounded upon unclarity with regard to fundamental points of doctrine, is dispelled by clear thinking and precise analysis of the issues shrouded in obscurity.
In contrast to these techniques, which counter the hindrances separately, the practice of concentration on one of the prescribed objects of serenity meditation inhibits them all simultaneously.
Though only affective so long as no particular hindrance impedes the meditative progress, this method, drawing upon the power of mental unification, is capable of bringing tremendous force to bear upon the struggle against their supremacy.
Since the latent defilements can crop up into the open only so long as the mind is driven by discursive thinking, the unification of the mind upon a single object closes off the portal through which they emerge.
As the mind descends to increasingly deeper levels of concentration, the hindrances are gradually made to subside until, with the attainment of access, their suppression becomes complete.
Held at bay in the base of the mental continuum, the latent defilements are no longer capable of rising to the surface of consciousness.
For as long as the suppressive force of concentration prevails, their activity is suspended, and the mind remains secure in its one-pointed stabilization, safe from their disruptive influence.
This abandonment of the hindrances through the power of suppression brings a feeling of profound relief accompanied by a blissful effusion born from the newly accomplished purification.
The Buddha compares the happiness of abandoning the hindrances to the happiness a man would experience if he were unexpectedly freed from debt, cured of a serious illness, released from prison, set free from slavery, or led to safety at the end of a desert journey.
“Happiness is the supporting condition for concentration”: The attainment of access signals a major breakthrough which spurs on further exertion.
As a result of such exertion the bliss generated in the access stage is made to expand and to suffuse the mind so completely that the subtlest barriers to inner unification disappear.
Along with their disappearance the mind passes beyond the stage of access and enters into absorption or full concentration.
Concentration itself denotes a mental factor present in both the attainments of access and absorption.
Its salient feature is the wholesome unification of the mind on a single object, and it brings about a harmonization between consciousness and its concomitants to a degree sufficient to free them from the distraction, vacillation, and unsteadiness characterizing their normal operations.
The mind in concentration, fixed firmly on its object, is like the flame of a candle shielded from the wind or the surface of a lake on which all the waves and ripples have been stilled.
However, although both access and absorption partake of the nature of concentration, an important difference still separates them, justifying the restriction of the term “full concentration” to absorption alone.
This difference consists in the relative strength in the two attainments of certain mental concomitants called the “factors of absorption” or “jhana factors” — namely, applied thought, sustained thought, rapture, happiness, and mental one-pointedness.
These factors, aroused at the very beginning of serenity meditation and gradually cultivated through the course of its progress, have the dual function of inhibiting the hindrances and unifying the mind on its object.
According to the commentaries, the factors are aligned with the hindrances in a direct one-to-one relation of opposition, such that each jhana factor has the specific task of countering and occluding one hindrance.
Thus applied thought counteracts stiffness and torpor, sustained thought doubt, rapture ill-will, happiness restlessness and regret, and one-pointedness sensual desire.
At the same time the factors exercise a consolidating function with respect to the object, applied thought directing the mind to the object, sustained thought anchoring it there, rapture creating an interest in it, happiness experiencing its affective quality, and one-pointedness focusing the mind on the object.
In the access attainment the jhana factors are strong enough to keep the hindrances suppressed, but not yet strong enough to place the mind in absorption.
They still stand in need of maturation.
Maturation comes as a result of continued practice, which gives them the power to lift the mind beyond the threshold plane of access and plunge it into the object with the unshakable force of full absorption.
In the state of absorption the mind fixes upon its object with such a high intensity of concentration that subjective discriminations between the two no longer occur.
The waves of discursive thinking have at last subsided, and the mind abides without straying even the least from its base of stabilization.
Nevertheless, even full concentration admits of degrees.
At the plane of absorption concentration is divided into four levels called the four jhanas.
These are distinguished by the aggregation of factors present in each attainment, the order of the four being determined by the successive elimination of the comparatively coarser factors.
In the first jhana all five jhana factors are present; in the second applied and sustained thought are eliminated, in the third rapture is made to fade away; and in the fourth the feeling of happiness is replaced by equanimity, the peaceful feeling-tone which veers neither toward pleasure nor toward pain.
One-pointedness remains present in all four jhanas, the one constant in the series.
To rise from the first jhana to the second, the yogin, after emerging from the first jhana, must reflect upon the coarseness of applied and sustained thought and the first jhana's inadequacy due to the proximity of the hindrances.
Then he must consider the second jhana as more peaceful and sublime, arouse the aspiration to attain it, and exert his energy to achieve a stronger degree of mental unification.
Similarly, to rise from the second to the third jhana he must repeat the same procedure taking rapture as the coarse factor needing to be eliminated, and to rise from the third to the fourth jhana he must reflect on the coarseness of happiness and the superiority of neutral, equanimous feeling.
Beyond the fourth jhana lie four even subtler stages of concentration called the four formless attainments.
In these attainments the luminous counterpart sign serving as the object of the jhanas is replaced by four successively more refined formless objects, which give their names to their respective attainments — the base of infinite space, the base of infinite consciousness, the base of nothingness, and the base of neither perception nor non-perception.
At the peak of this scale of meditative equipoise consciousness arrives at a point of unification so fine that, like the geometric point, it eludes detection, and its presence can be neither affirmed nor denied.
“Concentration is the supporting condition for the knowledge and vision of things as they really are”: Despite the loftiness and sublimity of these exalted attainments, immersion in deep concentration is not the end of the Buddhist path.
The unification of consciousness effected by serenity meditation is only a means to a further stage of practice.
This stage, ushered in by the next link in the series, “the knowledge and vision of things as they really are”, is the development of insight.
Through his deep concentration the yogin is able to suppress the defilements, to bring them to a state of quiescence where they no longer invade the active processes of thought.
But beneath the surface stillness the defilements lie latent, ready to spring up again if provoked.
As long as the defilements remain present, even if only in dormant form, release from suffering has yet to be achieved, for the latencies of the defilements lying quietly in the mental continuum can still regenerate the samsaric round of continued birth and death.
The latent tendencies are the seeds of renewed existence, which bring about a re-arising of the stream of consciousness and thence of all the remaining links in the samsaric chain.
To end the round and attain deliverance the defilements must be completely destroyed; it is not enough merely to suppress them.
The destruction of the defilements cannot be brought about by concentration alone, for concentration, even at its deepest levels, can only effect the suspension of their activity, not their eradication.
To destroy the defilements down to their bottommost stratum of latency something more is needed — pañña, the wisdom which penetrates the true mark of phenomena.
Concentration gains its place in the Buddhist discipline in so far as it induces the mental one-pointedness of at least the access level required as the support for wisdom.
Thus the Buddha enjoins his disciples to develop concentration, not as an end in itself, but because “one who is concentrated understands things as they really are.” Only a mind which has been rendered pure and calm can comprehend things in accordance with actuality, and the discipline of concentration, by suppressing the hindrances, engenders the required purity and calm.
The actual work, however, of extricating the defilements is performed exclusively by wisdom.
Wisdom is “the one thing needed” to cut off the defilements because the most fundamental of all the mental depravities is ignorance.
Ignorance is the kingpost upon which all the other defilements converge and the lynchpin which holds them all in place.
While it remains the others remain, and for the others to be destroyed it must be destroyed.
Doctrinally defined as nescience with regard to the four noble truths, ignorance signifies not so much the lack of specific pieces of information as a basic non-comprehension regarding the true nature of things as expressed in the four truths.
Since the eradication of the defilements depends upon the eradication of ignorance, the one factor capable of abolishing the defilements is the factor capable of abolishing their fundamental root, and that is the direct antithesis of ignorance — wisdom or “the knowledge and vision of things as they really are.” For this reason, at the beginning of our sutta, the Buddha proclaims: “The destruction of the cankers is for one who knows and sees, I say, not for one who does not know and does not see.” The defilements, epitomized in the “cankers,” are only destroyed for one who overcomes ignorance by the wisdom which knows and sees things as they are.
The compound expression “knowledge and vision,” indicates that the kind of knowledge to be developed is not mere conceptual understanding, but knowledge which in its directness and immediacy is akin to visual perception.
Conceptual understanding is often needed to clear away the intellectual obstructions to a correct perspective, but it must eventually yield to the light of direct experience.
To achieve this experiential understanding it is necessary to enter upon the practice of the second system of Buddhist meditation, the development of insight.
The practice of insight meditation aims at dislodging the defilements by eradicating the ignorance at their base.
Ignorance is overcome by generating, through mindful observation, a direct insight into things as they really are.
The material upon which insight works is precisely the sphere where ignorance is concealed, our own psycho-physical experience.
Its method is the application of mindfulness or discerning awareness to this sphere without interruption and in all activities.
In the discourse the Buddha states that what must be known and seen as they are is the five aggregates — their nature, their arising, and their passing away.
The five aggregates — material form, feeling, perception, mental formations, and consciousness — are the basic categories structuring the Buddha's analysis of experience.
Each experiential occasion, from the Buddhist perspective, is a complex process involving a number of factors functioning in unison.
To normal, non-analytical consciousness this unified complex appears as a uniform mass, a false appearance which, when accepted at face value, leads to the assumption of a simple solid self as the permanent subject of cognition.
The assumption of permanent selfhood Buddhism holds to be the basic conceptual error dominating our mental horizon.
It is the outermost shell of egoistic projection shielding the pre-conceptual ignorance, and thus the first of the ten fetters to be broken along the path to liberation.
To dispel the illusion of independent selfhood the experiential process must be submitted to searching scrutiny which rectifies the false perceptions contributing to its formation.
The first phase in this examination is the dissection of the cognitive fabric into the distinct threads entering into its make-up.
These “threads” or components are the five aggregates.
The aggregate of material form covers the physical side of experience, comprising both external material objects and the body together with its sense faculties.
The other four aggregates constitute the mental side of experience.
Feeling is the affective quality of pleasure or pain, or the neutral tone of neither pleasure nor pain, present on any occasion of mental activity.
Perception is the selective faculty, which singles out the object's distinctive marks as a basis for recognition.
The formations aggregate is a comprehensive category incorporating all mental factors other than feeling and perception; its most conspicuous member is volition.
And consciousness is the faculty of cognition itself, which sustains and coordinates all the other factors in the task of apprehending the object.
These five aggregates function in complete autonomy, entirely through their reciprocal support, without need for a self-subsistent unifying principle to be identified as a self or subject.
In order to develop the knowledge and vision of things as they really are with respect to the aggregates, the yogin must first emerge from his state of deep concentration, for the analytical faculty — silenced in the folds of serenity — has to be brought into play to effect the required dissection.
With his mind made clear and pliant as a result of concentration, the yogin attends to the diverse phenomena coming into range of his awareness.
The phenomena are attended to as they become manifest to determine their salient characteristics; then, on this basis, they are assigned to their appropriate place among the aggregates.
Whatever is physical belongs to the aggregate of material form; whatever registers affective tone is feeling; whatever notices the object's marks is perception; whatever wills is a mental formation; and whatever cognizes is consciousness.
The aggregates may further be grouped into a simpler scheme by placing material form on one side and the four mental aggregates on the other, the two being coupled as mentality-materiality.
They are then correlated with their causes and conditions to expose their dependently arisen nature.
The analytic procedure generates the realization that experience is just a double stream of material and mental events without a subsisting self.
The synthetic procedure makes it clear that all these events are conditioned phenomena which arise when their conditions are present and cease when their conditions disappear.
This last realization becomes the portal to the next major stage in the development of understanding, the contemplation of rise and fall.
As the yogin attends to the states that appear, he sees how each undergoes the same process of coming into being, altering, and passing away: “Such is the arising of material form, feeling, perception, formations, and consciousness.
Such is the passing away of material form, feeling, perception, formations, and consciousness.” The contemplation of rise and fall brings into focus three marks common to all conditioned phenomena — their impermanence, unsatisfactoriness, and selflessness.
Impermanence is generally the first characteristic to be discerned, as it becomes clear through the immediate attention given to rise and fall.
The perception of impermanence leads directly to insight into the other marks, which follow naturally from the first.
The notion of “happiness,” or “pleasure,” at the level of philosophical understanding rather than mere feeling, hinges upon an implicit notion of permanence.
If something is to be truly a source of happiness it must be permanent.
What is impermanent is incapable of yielding lasting happiness and security, and therefore turns out, under examination, to be really unsatisfactory, a potential source of suffering.
The notion of selfhood in turn rests upon the two pillars of permanence and pleasure.
What is impermanent and unsatisfactory cannot be identified as a self, for it lacks any solid unchanging core upon which the notion of selfhood can be grounded.
Thus the impermanent, unsatisfactory phenomena comprised in the five aggregates turn out to have a third characteristic, the aspect of selflessness.
The realization of these three characteristics — impermanence, unsatisfactoriness, and selflessness — through unmediated insight is the knowledge and vision of things as they really are.
“The knowledge and vision of things as they really are is the supporting condition for disenchantment”: As the yogin contemplates the rise and fall of the five aggregates, his attention becomes riveted to the final phase of the process, their dissolution and passing away.
This insight into the instability of the aggregates at the same time reveals their basic unreliability.
Far from being the ground of satisfaction we unreflectively take them to be, conditioned things are seen to be fraught with peril when adhered to with craving and wrong views.
The growing realization of this fundamental insecurity brings a marked transformation in the mind's orientation towards conditioned existence.
Whereas previously the mind was drawn to the world by the lure of promised gratification, now, with the exposure of the underlying danger, it draws away in the direction of a disengagement.
This inward turning away from the procession of formations is called nibbida.
Though some times translated “disgust” or “aversion,” the term suggests, not emotional repugnance, but a conscious act of detachment resulting from a profound noetic discovery.
Nibbida signifies in short, the serene, dignified withdrawal from phenomena which supervenes when the illusion of their permanence, pleasure, and selfhood has been shattered by the light of correct knowledge and vision of things as they are.
The commentaries explain nibbida as powerful insight, an explanation consonant with the word's literal meaning of “finding out.” It indicates the sequel to the discoveries unveiled by that contemplative process, the mind's appropriate response to the realizations thrust upon it by the growing experiences of insight.
Buddhaghosa compares it to the revulsion a man would feel who, having grabbed bold of a snake in the belief it was a fish, would look at it closely and suddenly realize he was holding a snake.
As our rendering implies, disenchantment marks the dissipation of an “enchantment” or fascination with the kaleidoscopic pleasures of conditioned existence, whether in the form of sense enjoyments, emotions, or ideas.
This fascination, resting upon the distorted apprehension of things as permanent, pleasurable, and self, is maintained at a deep unverbalized level by the hope of finding self identity in the conditioned.
As the enchanted mind presses forward seeking explicit confirmation of the innate sense of selfhood, everything encountered is evaluated in terms of the notions “mine,” “I,” and “my self,” the principal appropriative and identificatory devices with which the inherent sense of personal selfhood works.
These three notions, imputed to phenomena on account of ignorance, are in actuality conceptual fabrications woven by craving, conceit, and speculation, respectively.
The insight into impermanence, unsatisfactoriness, and selflessness cuts the ground out from underneath this threefold fabrication, reversing the mode in which phenomena can be viewed.
Whereas before the development of insight the aggregates were regarded as being “mine,” “I,” and “self,” now, when illuminated with the light of insight knowledge, they are seen in the opposite way as “not-mine,” “not I,” and “not self.” Since the fascination with phenomenal existence is sustained by the assumption of underlying selfhood, the dispelling of this illusion through the penetration of the three marks brings about a de-identification with the aggregates and an end to their spell of enchantment.
In place of the fascination and attraction a profound experience of estrangement sets in, engendered by the perception of selfessness in all conditioned being.
The suttas present this sequence thus:
Material form, monks, is impermanent, suffering, and non-self.
Feeling, perception, mental formations, and consciousness are impermanent, suffering, and not-self.
What is impermanent, suffering and non-self, that should be seen with correct wisdom as it really is: “This is not mine, this am I not, this is not my self.” So seeing, the instructed noble disciple becomes disenchanted with material form, disenchanted with feeling, disenchanted with perception, disenchanted with mental formations, and disenchanted with consciousness.
“Disenchantment is the supporting condition for dispassion”: In the trail of disenchantment there arises a deep yearning for deliverance from the round of samsaric becoming.
Previously, prior to the arrival at correct knowledge and vision, the mind moved freely under the control of the impulses of delight and attachment.
But now, with the growth of insight and the consequent disenchantment with conditioned existence, these impulses yield to a strong detachment and evolving capacity for renunciation.
Whatever tends to provoke grasping and adherence is immediately abandoned, whatever tends to create new involvement is left behind.
The old urges towards outer extension and accumulation give way to a new urge towards relinquishment as the one clearly perceived way to release.
Every motion of the will becomes subordinated to the newly ascendant desire for liberation: “Just as a fish in a net, a frog in a snake's jaws, a jungle fowl shut into a cage,… — just as these are desirous of being delivered, of finding an escape from these things, so too this meditator's mind is desirous of being delivered from the whole field of formations and escaping from it.
The desire for deliverance leads to a quickening of insight.
The capacity for comprehension picks up new speed, depth, and precision.
Like a sword the mind of insight-wisdom cuts through the net of illusions fabricated on account of ignorance; like a light it illuminates phenomena exactly as they are.
As the power of insight mounts, driven by the longing for liberation, a point is eventually reached where a fundamental turn-about takes place in the seat of consciousness, effecting a radical restructuring of the mental life.
The beam-like radiance of insight expands into the full luminosity of enlightenment, and the mind descends upon the supramundane path leading directly and irreversibly to final deliverance.
This transformation, signified by viraga or dispassion, is the first strictly supramundane stage in the progression of transcendental dependent arising.
The earlier links in the sequence leading up to dispassion are all technically classified as mundane.
Though loosely called “transcendental” in the sense that they are directed to the unconditioned, they are still mundane in terms of their scope since they operate entirely within range of the conditioned world.
Their objects of concern are still the five aggregates, or things derivative upon them.
But with the attainment of dispassion consciousness passes clear beyond the mundane level, and for a fleeting moment realizes as its object the unconditioned state, nibbana.
The shift in standpoint comes about as the immediate consequence of the preceding stages of development.
Through insight into the three marks the basic distortions covering over the true nature of phenomena were exposed; with the uncovering of their true nature there set in a disengagement from phenomena.
This disengagement led to an attitude of relinquishment and a fading out of desire.
Now, having released its grip on the conditioned, the mind turns to the unconditioned, the deathless element, focusing upon it as the only state fully adequate to itself:
Whatever is there of material form, feeling, perception, mental formations, and consciousness — he beholds these phenomena as impermanent, suffering, as a disease, a boil, a dart, a misfortune, an affliction, as alien, as decomposing, as empty, as selfless.
He turns his mind away from these phenomena; and when he has turned his mind away from them, he focuses his mind on the deathless element, thinking: “This is the peaceful, this is the sublime, that is, the stilling of all formations, the relinquishing of the foundations, the destruction of craving, dispassion, cessation, nibbana.
Though the realization of the unconditioned requires a turning away from the conditioned, it must be emphasized that this realization is achieved precisely through the understanding of the conditioned.
Nibbana cannot be reached by backing off from a direct confrontation with samsara to lose oneself in a blissful oblivion to the world.
The path to liberation is a path of understanding, of comprehension and transcendence, not of escapism or emotional self-indulgence.
Nibbana can only be attained by turning one's gaze towards samsara, and scrutinizing it in all its starkness.
This principle — that the understanding of the conditioned is the way to the unconditioned — holds true not only in the general sense that an understanding of suffering is the spur to the quest for enlightenment, but in a deeper, more philosophical sense as well.
The path to nibbana lies through the understanding of samsara for the reason that the experiential realization of the unconditioned emerges from a prior penetration of the fundamental nature of the conditioned, without which it is impossible.
The states of mind which realize nibbana are called liberations, and these liberations are threefold according to the particular aspect of nibbana they fix upon — the signless, the wishless, and emptiness.
The signless liberation focuses upon nibbana as devoid of the “signs” determinative of a conditioned formation, the wishless liberation as free from the hankering of desire, and the emptiness liberation as devoid of a self or of any kind of substantial identity.
Now these three liberations are each entered by a distinct gateway or door called “the three doors to liberation,”.
These three doors signify precisely the contemplations of the three universal marks of the conditioned — impermanence, suffering, and selflessness.
Insight into each mark is a different door leading into the realization of the unconditioned.
The profound contemplation of impermanence is called the door to the signless liberation, since comprehension of impermanence strips away the “sign of formations” exposing the markless reality of the imperishable to the view of the contemplative vision.
The contemplation of suffering is called the door to the wishless liberation, since understanding of the suffering inherent in all formations dries up the desire that reaches out for them.
And deep contemplation of selflessness is called the door to the emptiness liberation, since it exposes the voidness of substantial identity in all phenomena and hence the unviability of the self-notion in relation to the unconditioned.
In each close the understanding of the conditioned and the realization of the unconditioned are found to lock together in direct connection, so that by penetrating the conditioned to its very bottom and most universal features, the yogin passes through the door leading out of the conditioned to the supreme security of the unconditioned.
The supramundane consciousness that realizes nibbana directly penetrates the four noble truths, illuminating them all at once with startling clarity: “Just, O monks, as a man in the gloom and darkness of the night, at the sudden flashing up of lightning, should with his eyes recognize the objects; just so the monk sees, according to reality: 'This is suffering, this is the origin of suffering, this is the cessation of suffering, this is the path leading to the cessation of suffering.'” The penetration of the truths simultaneously performs four functions, one with respect to each truth.
It fully understands the first noble truth, the truth of suffering, since by taking nibbana as its object it acquires a perspective from which it can directly see that in contrast to the unconditioned every thing impermanent, defiled, and conditioned is marked with suffering.
It abandons the second noble truth, the truth of the origin, since it eradicates the craving and defilements which originate suffering so that they can never arise again.
It realizes the third noble truth, the truth of cessation, by apprehending nibbana in which all the suffering of samsara is permanently cut off.
And it develops the path, the fourth noble truth, since at the moment of penetration the eight mental factors comprised in the noble eightfold path concurrently arise performing the task of realization.
Right view sees the unconditioned; right thought directs the mind upon it; right speech, right action, and right livelihood eradicate their opposites; right effort invigorates the mind; right mindfulness fixes attention on the unconditioned, and right concentration unifies the mind in absorption on the unconditioned.
The ancients compare the mind's ability to perform this fourfold function to the burning of a lamp.
Just as a lamp simultaneously burns the wick, dispels the darkness, creates light, and uses up the oil, so the supramundane knowledge simultaneously understands suffering, abandons craving, realizes nibbana, and develops the path.
The breakthrough to the unconditioned comes in four distinct stages called the four supramundane paths.
Each momentary path-experience eradicates a determinate group of defilements ranked in degrees of coarseness and subtlety, so that the first path eliminates the coarsest defilements and the fourth path the most subtle.
The defilements cut off by the paths are generally classified as ten “fetters”, receiving this designation because they fetter sentient beings to samsara.
With the first path the yogin eradicates the first three fetters — personality view, doubt, and misapprehension of rules and observances.
Thereby he becomes a “stream-enterer”, one who has entered the stream of the Dhamma and is bound for final deliverance in a maximum of seven more lives passed in the human or heavenly worlds.
The second path weakens all the remaining fetters to the point where they no longer arise frequently or obsessively, but cuts off none completely; with its attainment the yogin advances to the stage of a “once-returner”, one who is due to return to the sense sphere world only one more time.
By eliminating sensual desire and aversion by means of the third path, he attains the state of a non-returner, no longer bound to the sense sphere but heading for rebirth in a pure divine abode, where he will reach the final goal.
The fourth path cuts off the remaining five fetters — desire for existence in the fine material and immaterial planes, conceit, restlessness, and ignorance.
With its attainment the yogin becomes an arahant, who has destroyed all the defilements and reached the state of perfect purification.
“Dispassion is the supporting condition for emancipation”: Each of the supramundane path-moments is immediately followed by several moments of a different kind of supramundane experience called “fruition”.
Fruition marks the enjoyment of the realized degree of release effected by the path's work of eradicating defilements.
Whereas the attainment of the path is an extremely intense exhilarating experience requiring the expenditure of a tremendous quantum of energy, the attainment of fruition is characterized by its peacefulness, relaxedness, and blissful quiescence.
If the path-attainment be illustrated by a captive's sudden bursting of the chains that hold him in captivity, fruition may be compared to his savoring the taste of freedom that lies beyond the captive state.
The completion of the fourth path and fruition results in full emancipation: “With the destruction of the cankers, he directly realizes for himself, enters, and abides in that emancipation of mind, emancipation of wisdom, which is cankerless.” The subtlest and most tenacious fetters have been broken, and there is nothing now that makes for further bondage.
Having destroyed the mental corruptions at their basic level of latency, the yogin has completed his task.
There is nothing more to do, and nothing to add to what has been done.
He abides in the living experience of deliverance.
The emancipation realized by the arahant has a twofold aspect.
One aspect is the emancipation from ignorance and defilements experienced during the course of his lifetime, the other the emancipation from repeated existence attained with his passing away.
Through his complete penetration of the four noble truths, the arahant has eradicated ignorance and released his mind from the grip of the passions.
The fading away of the passions issues in a stainless purity called emancipation of mind; the fading away of ignorance issues in a radiant awareness called emancipation of wisdom.
The mind of the arahant is at once impeccably pure through the absence of attachment and radiantly bright through the luminosity of wisdom.
Endowed with this emancipation of mind and of wisdom, he can move and act in the world without being soiled by the mire of the world.
He chooses, thinks, decides, and wills free from the compulsion of egoistic habits.
The grasping of “I” and “mine” has ceased, the inclination to conceit can no more obsess him.
Having seen the egoless nature of all phenomena he has cut through the tangle of egoistic constructs and become “a sage who is at peace”.
Since he has destroyed the defilements, whatever disturbances might assail a person on their account no longer assail him.
Even though sublime and striking sense objects come into range of his perception they cannot overwhelm his mind: “His mind remains untouched, steadfast, unshakable, beholding the impermanency of everything.” In the arahant greed, hatred, and delusion, the unwholesome roots which underlie all evil, have been totally abandoned.
They are not merely suppressed, but withered up down to the level of their latencies, so that they are no longer able to spring up again in the future.
This destruction of greed, hatred, and delusion is called the nibbana realizable during life-time; it is nibbana visible here and now.
“In so far as the monk has realized the complete extinction of greed, hatred, and delusion, in so far is nibbana realizable, immediate, inviting, attractive, and comprehensible to the wise.” Because in this attainment the five aggregates continue to function, sustained by bodily vitality, it is also called “the nibbana element with a residue remaining.
But though for the arahant disturbances due to the defilements do not arise, he is still subject to “a measure of disturbance” conditioned by the body with its six sense faculties.
Though he cannot be overcome by greed and aversion he still experiences pleasure and pain; though he cannot generate kamma binding to samsara he must still choose and act within the limits set by his circumstances.
Such experience, however, is for the arahant purely residual.
It is merely the playing out of his stored up kamma from the past, which can still fructify and call forth responses so long as the body acquired through prior craving stands.
But because craving has now been inwardly exhausted, there lies ahead for him no renewal of the round of birth and death.
All feelings, being experienced with detachment, not being delighted in, will become cool.
They arouse no new craving, provoke no new expectations, lead to no new accumulations of kamma; they merely continue on devoid of fecundity until the end of the life span.
With the break-up of the body at his passing away, the arahant makes an end to the beginningless process of becoming.
This is the second stage of his emancipation — emancipation from renewed existence, from future birth, aging, and death: “The sage who is at peace is not born, does not age, does not die, does not tremble, does not yearn.
For him there does not exist that on account of which he might be born.
Not being born, how can he age?
Not aging, how can he die?” Because, with the emancipation from continued existence, no residue of the aggregates persists, this attainment is called “the nibbana element without residue remaining.
“Emancipation is the supporting condition for the knowledge of destruction”: Following each of the four paths and fruits there arises a retrospective cognition or “reviewing knowledge” which reviews the defilements that have been abandoned by the particular path and the defilements remaining to be eliminated.
In the case of the last path and fruition, the path and fruition of arahatship, the reviewing knowledge ascertains that all defilements have been eradicated and that there are none left to be destroyed.
This knowledge certifying the abandonment of the defilements arises immediately after the mind has been liberated from their grip by the full penetration of the four noble truths:
As the text indicates, this cognizance of the mind's liberation is direct and personal, without dependence on others.
Just as a keen sighted man can look into a pool of clear, limpid water and see for himself the shells, pebbles, gravel and shoals of fish.
The liberated person can look into himself and see that his mind has been set free from the cankers.
The retrospective cognition of release involves two acts of ascertainment.
The first, called the “knowledge of destruction”, ascertains that all defilements have been abandoned at the root; the second, the “knowledge of non-arising”, ascertains that no defilement can ever arise again.
The two together are also called the “knowledge and vision of emancipation”, the use of the word “vision” again underscoring the perceptual immediacy of the cognition by which the mind verifies its own release from the defilements.
By possessing this knowledge, one who has destroyed the defilements not only experiences the freedom that results from their destruction, but acquires as well an inner certitude with respect to their destruction.
If a liberated individual only enjoyed liberation from the defilements without also enjoying indubitable knowledge that he is liberated, his attainment would always be haunted by an inner suspicion that perhaps, after all, some area of vulnerability remains.
Even though no defilement ever came to manifestation, the shadow of uncertainty would itself mar the attainment's claim to completeness.
However, because the attainment of arahatship automatically generates a retrospective cognition ascertaining the final abandonment of all defilements, there is no room for such a suspicion to arise.
Like a deer in a remote forest far from the reach of hunters, the one who has crossed over attachment to the world walks in confidence, stands in confidence, sits down in confidence, and sleeps in confidence.
He is out of reach of the defilements, and knows he is out of their reach.
Though the knowledge of the destruction of the cankers is not always set up in the arahant's awareness, it is permanently available to him, and awaits only his advertence to make itself present.
Since the cankers have been eradicated, whenever the arahant looks into his mind he can see at once that they have been cut off.
The suttas illustrate this with a bold simile:
The arahant understands that the defilements he has eradicated brought bondage to the round of existence.
He sees them as “defiling, conducive to renewed existence, afflictive, resulting in suffering, leading to future birth, aging, and death.” Thence, by witnessing their utter eradication in himself, he gains certainty of his emancipation from the round: “Unshakable is my emancipation.
This is my last birth.
There is now no renewal of existence.” Such knowledge remains an inalienable part of the arahant's spiritual inheritance.
It is the basis for his assurance of immunity from future becoming.
By reason of this knowledge he sounds the lion's roar with which he seals his triumph over the cycle of repeated births: “Destroyed is birth, lived is the holy life, the task has been completed, there is no returning to this state.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
The course of spiritual training taught by the Buddha is a double process of self-transformation and self-transcendence issuing in complete emancipation from suffering.
The process of self-transformation involves the elimination of unwholesome mental dispositions and their replacement by pure dispositions conducing to the benefit of oneself and others; the process of self-transcendence focuses on the abandoning of egocentric notions by seeing with direct insight the essenceless nature of the bodily and mental processes we normally take to be “I” and “mine.” When this double process is brought to its culmination, suffering is extinguished, for with the awakening of wisdom the basic root of suffering — craving backed by blinding ignorance — falls away never to rise again.
Because the unwholesome tendencies and selfish clinging spring from seeds buried deep in the bottom-most strata of the mind, to eradicate these sources of affliction and nurture the growth of the liberating vision of reality the Buddha presents his teaching in the form of a gradual training.
Buddhist discipline involves gradual practice and gradual attainment.
It does not burst into completeness at a stroke, but like a tree or any other living organism, it unfolds organically, as a sequence of stages in which each stage rests upon its predecessor as its indispensable foundation and gives rise to its successor as its natural consequent.
The principal stages of this gradual training are three: the training in sila or virtue, the training in samadhi or concentration, and the training in pañña or wisdom.
If we follow through the comparison of the Buddhist discipline to a tree, faith would be the seed, for it is faith that provides the initial impulse through which the training is taken up, and faith again that nourishes the training through every phase of its development.
Virtue would be the roots, for it is virtue that gives grounding to our spiritual endeavors just as the roots give grounding to a tree.
Concentration would be the trunk, the symbol of strength, non-vacillation, and stability.
And wisdom would be the branches, which yield the flowers of enlightenment and the fruits of deliverance.
The vigour of the spiritual life, like the vigour of a tree, depends upon healthy roots.
Just as a tree with weak and shallow roots cannot flourish but will grow up stunted, withered and barren, so a spiritual life devoid of strong roots will also have a stunted growth incapable of bearing fruit.
To attempt to scale the higher stages of the path it is essential at the outset to nourish the proper roots of the path; otherwise the result will be frustration, disillusionment, and perhaps even danger.
The roots of the path are the constituents of sila, the factors of moral virtue.
These are the basis for meditation, the ground for all wisdom and higher achievement.
To say that sila is the precondition for success, however, does not mean, as is too often believed in conservative Buddhist circles, that one cannot begin to meditate until one's sila is perfect.
Such a stipulation would make it almost impossible to start meditation, since it is the mindfulness, concentration, and wisdom of the meditative process that bring about the gradual purification of virtue.
But to say that virtue is the basis of practice does mean that the capacity for achievement in meditation hinges upon the purity of our sila.
If our roots of virtue are weak, our meditation will likewise be weak.
If our actions repeatedly clash with the basic principles of right conduct, our attempts to control the mind in the discipline of meditation will turn into a self-defeating enterprise, since the springs of our conduct will be the same defiled states of mind the meditation is intended to eliminate.
Only when we secure our cultivation upon the foundation of blameless principles of right action can the inward endeavor of meditation prosper and issue in success.
With true principles of conduct as the base, the roots of virtue will give birth to the trunk of concentration, the concentrated mind shoot forth the branches of wisdom, and the branches of wisdom yield the flowers and fruits of enlightenment, culminating in total freedom from bondage.
Therefore, just as a skillful gardener brings a sapling to growth by first tending to the roots, so the earnest seeker of enlightenment should begin his cultivation by tending to the roots of his practice — that is, to his sila or moral virtue.
The Pali word sila originally meant simply conduct.
But in the context of the Buddhist spiritual training the term is used to signify only a specific kind of conduct, i.e., good conduct, and by an extension of meaning, the type of character for which such conduct stands, i.e., good character.
Hence sila means both moral conduct, a body of habits governed by moral principles, and moral virtue, the interior quality the regular observance of these principles is intended to produce.
Both shades of meaning are essential to understand the place of sila in the spectrum of Buddhist discipline.
Sila in the former sense consists in the non-transgression through body or speech of the basic precepts regulating the moral life.
It is moral discipline in deed and word, beginning as the inhibition of immoral impulses seeking an outlet through body and speech, and developing into the habitual conformation to the principles of righteous conduct.
But the full range of sila is not exhausted by mere outward behavioral control, for the term has in addition a deeper, more psychological significance.
In this second sense sila is moral purity, the inner purification of character which results from a life consistently moulded upon moral principles.
This aspect of sila places the stress on the subjective, motivational side of action.
It looks not towards the outward act itself, but towards the rectitude of mind from which good conduct springs.
Upon inspection sila thus reveals itself to be a two- dimensional quality: it contains an external dimension consisting in purification of conduct, and an internal dimension consisting in purification of character.
However, in the Teaching of the Buddha, these two dimensions of experience, the internal and the external, are not torn apart and consigned to separate, self-sufficient domains.
They are recognized, rather, to be two facets of a single whole, complementary poles of a unified field which mirror one another, implicate one another, and penetrate one another with their own respective potentialities of influence.
Actions performed by body and speech are not, from the Buddhist standpoint, so many detachable appendages of a distinct spiritual essence, but concrete revelations of the states of mind which stand behind them as their activating source.
And states of mind, in turn, do not remain closed up in a purely mental isolation, but spill forth according to the play of circumstances from the fountain of consciousness where they arise, through the channels of body, speech and thought, out into the world of inter-personally significant events.
From the action we can infer the state of mind, and from the state of mind we can predict the probable course of action.
The relationship between the two is as integral as that between a musical score and its orchestrated performance on the concert stage.
Because of this mutual dependence of the two domains, moral conduct and purity of character lock up with one another in a subtle and complex interrelationship.
The fulfillment of the purification of virtue requires that both aspects of sila be realized: on the one side, behavior of body and speech must be brought into accord with the moral ideal; on the other, the mental disposition must be cleansed of its corruptions until it is impeccably pure.
The former without the latter is insufficient; the latter without the former is impossible.
Between the two, the internal aspect is the more important from the standpoint of spiritual development, since bodily and verbal deeds acquire ethical significance primarily as expressions of a corresponding disposition of mind.
In the sequence of spiritual training, however, it is moral discipline that comes first.
For at the beginning of training, purification of character stands as an ideal which must be reached; it is not a reality with which one can start.
According to the Buddhist principle of conditionality, the actualization of any given state is only possible through the actualization of its appropriate conditions, and this applies as much to the achievement of the various stages of the training as to the bare phenomena of matter and mind.
Since beginningless time the consciousness-continuum has been corrupted by the unwholesome roots of greed, hatred and delusion; it is these defilements which have functioned as the source for the greatest number of our thoughts, the ground for our habits, and the springs for our actions and general orientation towards other people and the world as a whole.
To uproot these defiling afflictions at a single stroke and reach the peak of spiritual perfection by a mere act of will is a well-near impossible task.
A realistic system of spiritual training must work with the raw material of human nature; it cannot rest content merely with postulated paragons of human excellence or demands for achievement without showing the method by which such demands can be realized.
The Buddha rests his teaching upon the thesis that with the right method we have the capacity to change and transform ourselves.
We are not doomed to be for ever burdened by the weight of accumulated tendencies, but through our own effort we can cast off all these tendencies and attain a condition of complete purity and freedom.
When given the proper means in the context of right understanding, we can bring about radical alterations in the workings of consciousness and mould a new shape out of the seemingly immutable stuff of our own minds.
The first step on this path is the purification of character, and the efficient means for the restructuring of character the Buddha provides in the observance of sila as a set of precepts regulating bodily and verbal conduct.
Sila as moral discipline, in other words, becomes the means for inducing sila as moral virtue.
The effectiveness of this measure stems from the reciprocal interlocking of the internal and external spheres of experience already referred to.
Because the inner and outer domains are mutually implicated, the one can become the means for producing deep and lasting changes in the other.
Just as a state of mind expresses itself outwardly in an action — in deed or speech — so too the avoidance and performance of certain actions can recoil upon the mind and alter the basic disposition of the mental life.
If mental states dominated by greed and hatred can engender deeds of killing, stealing, lying, etc., then the abstinence on principle from killing, stealing and lying can engender a mental disposition towards kindliness, contentment, honesty and truthfulness.
Thus, although sila as moral purity may not be the starting point of spiritual training, conformity to righteous standards of conduct can make it an attainable end.
The medium which bridges the two dimensions of sila, facilitating the translation of outward behavior into inner purity, is volition or cetana.
Volition is a mental factor common to every occasion of experience, a universal concomitant of every act of consciousness.
It is the factor which makes experience teleological, i.e., oriented to a goal, since its specific function is to direct its associated factors towards the attainment of a particular end.
All action, the Buddha teaches, is in essence volition, for the act itself is from the ultimate standpoint a manifestation of volition through one of the three doors of action — body, speech or mind: “It is volition, bhikkhus, that I call action.
For having willed, one performs an action through body, speech, or mind.
Volition determines an action as being of a definite sort, and thence imparts to action its moral significance.
But since volition is invariably present in every state of consciousness, it is in its own nature without ethical distinctiveness.
Volition acquires its distinctive ethical quality from certain other mental factors known as roots, in association with which it always arises on occasions of active experience.
Roots are of two morally determinate kinds: unwholesome and wholesome.
The unwholesome roots are greed, hatred and delusion; the wholesome roots are non-greed, non-hatred and non-delusion.
These latter, though expressed negatively, signify not merely the absence of the defiling factors, but the presence of positive moral qualities as well; generosity, loving-kindness and wisdom, respectively.
When volition is driven by the unwholesome roots of greed, hatred and delusion, it breaks out through the doors of the body and speech in the form of evil deeds — as killing, stealing and fornication, as lying, slander, harsh speech and gossip.
In this way the inner world of mental defilement darkens the outer world of spatio-temporal extension.
But the defiled trend of volitional movement, though strong, is not irrevocable.
Unwholesome volition can be supplanted by wholesome volition, and thence the entire disposition of the mental life made subject to a reversal at its foundation.
This redirecting of volition is initiated by voluntarily undertaking the observance of principles of conduct belonging to a righteous order — by willing to abstain from evil and to practice the good.
Then, when volition tending to break out as evil action is restrained and replaced by volition of the opposite kind, by the will to behave virtuously in word and deed, a process of reversal will have been started which, if followed through, can produce far-reaching alterations in the moral tone of character.
For acts of volition do not spend their full force in their immediate exercise, but rebound upon the mental current which gave birth to them, re-orienting that current in the direction towards which they point as their own immanent tendency: the unwholesome volitions towards moral depravation, and the wholesome volitions towards moral purification.
Each time, therefore, an unwholesome volition is supplanted by its wholesome opposite, the will to the good is strengthened.
A process of factor substitution, built upon the law that incompatible mental qualities cannot be simultaneously present on a single occasion of experience, then completes the transformation through the efficacity of the associated roots.
Just as unwholesome volitions invariably arise in association with the unwholesome roots — with greed, hatred and delusion — so do wholesome volitions inevitably bring along with them as their concomitants the wholesome roots of non-greed, non-hatred and non-delusion.
Since opposite qualities cannot co-exist, the replacement of unwholesome volition by wholesome volition at the same time means the transposition of the unwholesome and the wholesome roots.
Continually called into play by the surge of volition, the wholesome roots “perfume” the mental stream with the qualities for which they stand — with generosity, loving-kindness and wisdom; and these, as they gather cumulative force, come to prominence as regular propensities of the personality, eclipsing the inclination towards the unwholesome.
In this way the exercise of wholesome volitions on repeated and varied occasions effects a transformation of character from its initial moral susceptibility to a pitch of purity where even the temptation to evil remains at a safe remove.
Though volition or cetana is the primary instrument of change, the will in itself is indeterminate, and requires specific guidelines to direct its energy towards the actualization of the good.
A mere “good will,' from the Buddhist standpoint, is altogether inadequate, for despite the nobility of the intention, as long as the intelligence of the agent is clouded with the dust of delusion, the possibility always lies open that laudable motives might express themselves in foolish or even destructive courses of action.
This has been the case often enough in the past, and still stands as the perennial bugbear of the ethical generalist.
According to the Buddhist outlook, goodness of will must be translated into concrete courses of action.
It must be regulated by specific principles of right conduct, principles which, though flexible in their application, possess normative validity independently of any historical culture or existing scheme of values, entirely by virtue of their relation to a universal law of moral retribution and their place in the timeless path of practice leading to deliverance from suffering and the samsaric round.
To guide the will in its aspiration for the good, the Buddha has prescribed in definite and lucid terms the factors of moral training which must be fulfilled to safeguard progress along the path to enlightenment.
These factors are comprised in the three items which make up the aggregate of virtue in the Noble Eightfold Path: namely, right speech, right action, and right livelihood.
Right speech is the avoidance of all harmful forms of speech — the abstinence from falsehood, slander, harsh speech and idle chatter.
The speech of the aspirant must be constantly truthful, conducive to harmony, gentle and meaningful.
Right action applies a brake upon unwholesome bodily action, by prescribing abstinence from the destruction of life, from stealing, and from sexual misconduct; the latter means incelibacy in the case of monks, and adultery and other illicit relations in the case of householders.
The behavior of the aspirant must always be compassionate, honest and pure.
And right livelihood requires the avoidance of trades which inflict harm and suffering upon other living beings, such as dealing in meat, slaves, weapons, poisons and intoxicants.
Avoiding such harmful trades, the noble disciple earns his living by a peaceful and righteous occupation.
The training factors embedded in these components of the Noble Eightfold Path simultaneously inhibit the base, ignoble and destructive impulses of the human mind and promote the performance of whatever is noble and pure.
Though worded negatively, in terms of the types of conduct they are intended to shut out, they are positive in effect, for when adopted as guidelines to action, they stimulate the growth of healthy mental attitudes which come to expression as beneficient courses of conduct.
Intensively, these training rules reach into the recesses of the mind, blunt the force of unwholesome volition, and redirect the will to the attainment of the good.
Extensively, they reach into the commotion of man's social existence, and arrest the tide of competition, exploitation, grasping, violence and war.
In their psychological dimension they confer mental health, in their social dimension they promote peace, in their spiritual dimension they serve as the irreplaceable foundation for all higher progress along the path to emancipation.
Regularly undertaken and put into practice, they check all mental states rooted in greed, hatred and delusion, promote actions rooted in non-greed, non-hatred and non-delusion, and lead to a life of charity, love and wisdom.
From this it will be seen that from the Buddhist point of view formulated rules of conduct are not superfluous accessories to a good will, but necessary guidelines to right action.
They are an essential part of the training, and when implemented by the force of volition, become a fundamental means to purification.
Especially in the context of the practice of meditation, the training precepts prevent the eruption of defiled actions destructive to the purpose of the meditative discipline.
By following carefully the prescribed rules of conduct, we can rest assured that we are avoiding at least the coarser expressions of greed, hatred and delusion, and that we will not have to face the obstacle of guilt, anxiety and restlessness that comes in the trail of regular moral transgressions.
If we return to our earlier comparison of the Buddhist discipline to a tree, and take virtue to be the roots, then the principles of right conduct become the soil in which the roots grow.
Just as the soil contains the nutritive essences required for the tree to sprout and flourish, so do the precepts contain the nutriment of purity and virtue required for the growth of the spiritual life.
The precepts embody the natural conduct of the arahant or perfected saint.
For the arahant, his conduct flows outward as the spontaneous expression of his innate purity.
By his very nature, all his deeds are flawless, free from blemish.
He cannot follow any course of action motivated by desire, ill will, delusion or fear — not through any forced conformity to rules, but by the very law of his being.
The worldling, however, is not immune from the possibility of immoral conduct.
To the contrary, because the unwholesome roots remain firmly planted in the makeup of his mind, he is constantly prone to the temptation to moral transgression.
He is liable to kill, steal, commit adultery, lie, drink, etc.; and in the absence of any sound moral code prohibiting such actions, he will often succumb to these liabilities.
Hence the necessity of providing him with a set of ethical principles built upon the pillars of wisdom and compassion, by which he can regulate his actions and conform to the natural, spontaneous behavior of the Liberated One.
A precept is, therefore, from the Buddhist perspective much more than a prohibition imposed upon conduct from without.
Each precept is a tangible expression of a corresponding attitude of mind, a principle which clothes in the form of concrete action a beam of the light of inward purity.
The precepts render visible the invisible state of purification.
They make it accessible to us by refracting it through the media of body and speech into specific rules of conduct we can apply as guides to action when we find ourselves in the diverse situations they are designed to cover.
By bringing our conduct into harmony with the precepts, we can nourish the root of our spiritual endeavors, our virtue.
And when virtue is made secure, the succeeding stages of the path unfold spontaneously through the law of the spiritual life, culminating at the crest in the perfection of knowledge and the serene azure of deliverance.
As the Master says:
For one who is free from remorse, no deliberate volition need be exerted: “Let gladness arise in me.” This is the natural law, bhikkhus, that gladness arises in one free from remorse.
For one who is gladdened, no deliberate volition need be exerted: “Let rapture arise in me.” This is the natural law, bhikkhus, that rapture arises in one who is gladdened.
For one filled with rapture, no deliberate volition need be exerted: “Let my body become tranquil.” This is the natural law, bhikkhus, that for one filled with rapture the body becomes tranquil.
For one tranquil in body, no deliberate volition need be exerted: “May I experience bliss.” This is the natural law, bhikkhus, that one tranquil in body experiences bliss.
For one who is blissful, no deliberate volition need be exerted: “Let my mind become concentrated.” This is the natural law, bhikkhus, that for one who is blissful the mind becomes concentrated.
For one who is concentrated, no deliberate volition need be exerted: “May I know and see things as they really are.” This is the natural law, bhikkhus, that one who is concentrated knows and sees things as they really are.
For one knowing and seeing things as they really are, no deliberate volition need be exerted: “May I become disenchanted and dispassionate.” This is the natural law, bhikkhus, that one knowing and seeing things as they really are becomes disenchanted and dispassionate.
For one who has become disenchanted and dispassionate, no deliberate volition need be exerted: “May I realize the knowledge and vision of deliverance.” This is the natural law, bhikkhus, that one who is disenchanted and dispassionate realizes the knowledge and vision of deliverance…
Thus, bhikkhus, one stage flows into the succeeding stage, one stage comes to fulfillment in the succeeding stage, for crossing over from the hither shore to the beyond.
Anguttara Nikaya,:
As we cast our gaze out upon the landscape of animate nature, it does not take long before our attention is struck by the tremendous diversity of forms the animate order displays.
The folds of nature's lap, we find, teem with a multitude of living beings as staggering in their range of specific differentiation as in the sheer impression of their quantitative force.
Before our eyes countless varieties of creatures — insects and reptiles, fish and birds, mammals domestic and wild — turn the earth With its seas and skies into a complex metropolis, throbbing with the pulse of sentient life.
But realms of being beyond sight — vouched for by spiritual cosmology, folklore, and the reports of seers — are no less crowded, and no less diversified in their composition.
According to this testimony, gods, Brahmas, angels and demons populate boroughs of the city of life invisible to fleshly eyes, while other creatures, such as fairies, ghosts and goblins, fill up unfamiliar pockets of the same borough.
The human world, again, is itself far from homogeneous.
The family of man breaks down into a great diversity of types — into people black, white, brown, yellow and red, dividing still further, according to their fortunes and faculties, into the long-lived and the short-lived, the healthy and the sickly, the successful and the failures, the gifted and the deprived.
Some people are intelligent, others are dull-witted, some are noble, others ignoble, some are spiritually evolved, others spiritually destitute.
Human beings range all the way from mental retards who can manage their bodily needs only with great difficulty, to sages and saints who can comprehend the deepest secrets of the universe and lift the moral outlook of their less acute brothers and sisters to heights undreamed of in the common stream of thought.
To the thinker who would dig below the surface presentations and discover the reasons for the manifest phenomena, the question naturally arises why life exhibits itself in such variegated apparel.
Reflection upon this question has given birth to a multitude of schools of thought, religious and philosophical, each offering its own speculations as the key to unravel the riddle of nature's kaleidoscopic design.
In the intellectual history of humanity, the two dominant positions around which these schools cluster are theism and materialism.
Pitted against one another by their antithetical tenets, the two have come down in different guises from ancient times even to the present.
Theism refers the diversity of sentient life, including the disparities of fortune evident in the human world, to the will of God.
It is God, the theist holds, the omnipotent, omniscient author of the universe, who creates through the fiat of his will the variety of natural forms, allots to beings their respective shares of happiness and suffering, and divides people into the high and the low, the fortunate and the miserable.
Materialism, in contradistinction, rules out any recourse to an extraterrestrial agency to account for the differentiation in the faculties and capacities found amongst living beings, and attempts to provide in its place a system of explanation which works exclusively with naturalistic principles, pertaining to the material order.
The entire gamut of living forms together with all life's modes of expression, the materialist claims, can be effectively reduced in the end to the adventures of matter governed by physical, chemical and biological laws.
Even consciousness represents, for the materialist, only a secondary superstructure built upon a material base devoid of any larger significance in itself.
It is not our present purpose here to examine at length these two rival doctrines.
Let it suffice to note that both, in different ways, throw into jeopardy the postulate of a progressive spiritual evolution of beings by withholding, implicitly or explicitly, the necessary condition for such a course of evolution — namely, an inwardly autonomous will which finds in the diversity of the sentient order the field for the working out of its own potentialities for growth and transformation, in accordance with laws governing freely chosen possibilities of action.
Theism withholds this condition by its basic postulate of an omnipotent deity directing the entire field of nature from above.
If all of nature runs its course in obedience to divine command, then the individual will, which belongs to the natural order, must be subject to the same divine supervision as the rest of animate nature.
The autonomy of the individual will and its direct impact on the sentient sphere are excluded, and with them also goes the thesis of a genuine long-term spiritual growth, to which they are essential.
Materialism likewise shuts out the notion of a progressive spiritual evolution of beings, but more simply and directly, by explicitly denying the basic presupposition of such a notion.
The will's claim to freedom is here rejected, its autonomy usurped by the irresistible pressure of the determinative influences at its base.
Consciousness becomes a mere by-product of material processes; the individual life-stream leaves no impact on any continuous current of experience enduring beyond the grave.
Both conscious action and evolution in the biotic sphere proceed in the grip of the same play of cosmic forces — blind, brute, and insentient in their fundamental mode of operation.
Buddhism also offers an explanation for the diversity of the sentient order, an explanation which bridges the gap between volition and the diversity and thus opens up the prospect for long-term spiritual development.
According to Buddhism, the explanation for the variegation of sentient beings — in their kinds, faculties, and fortunes — lies in their kamma, that is, their volitional action.
Beings are, in the words of the Buddha, “heirs of their action.” They spring forth from their store of accumulated action as a matrix out of which they are fashioned, inheriting the results proper to their deeds even across the gulf of lifetimes.
